Chapter 200




Inside the room that was merely old rather than retro, was illuminated by orange light of fluorescent lamp. The wall was wooden and looked thin, only the synthetic leather sofa with fading coloration and the bed looked excessively big, but the sheets and curtain with the same color gave worn out impression vaguely.



「As expected from a cheap hotel. It really gives the atmosphere like hotel in movie where fugitive will take refuge in.」



The floor was creaking. Kousuke who threw his body on the bed was smiling wryly while speaking to himself a sentence that sounded like a flag. The spring of the ancient bed was making creaking sounds as though to protest to the one treating it roughly.



Because Kousuke had a need to stay for one night due to his plane's schedule, he rented a hotel room like this. And why was he intentionally choosing this kind of dilapidated hotel when he had just received a considerable amount of request fee from Hajime that someone with social status of a student wouldn't be able to normally obtain? That was merely because of Kousuke's poor person's mentality.



Even if he stayed in a high class hotel without any particular necessity just because he had much money, Kousuke would definitely be unable to calm down coupled with the gaudiness of the room. Staying in a capsule hotel……isn't it strangely calming? Those were the words that Kousuke once said to his parents when they were going in a family trip.



The parents of Kyousuke at that time was as expected a little bit solemn at their son's sense that was somewhat too small as a person, at the very least he should be demanding for business hotel or pension.



「But well, I at least splurged a little and rented the upper floor. This is nice scenery.」



The reason Kousuke picked this hotel was because this hotel had fifteen floors relatively to its oldness. The higher the floor, the more expensive the cost for just a smidgen, but after thoroughly worrying, Kousuke finally decided「A, around floor ten, this is a rare chance so it should be fine……」so that he could enjoy the scenery. If his classmates or his family knew that, surely they would be looking at him with a lukewarm gaze.



When he opened the worn-out curtain, there the lighting of the city was like stars that were spread on the ground, they were sparkling with glitters. It was quite a night scenery that he could be satisfied with, just like what he expected and hoped for.



「……Next time let's look at this with Rana for sure, yup.」



Kousuke spoke to himself once more. Inside his mind, the imagination of him doing romantic this and that with his older rabbit ear lover were rushing about. ……If Juugo and Kentarou were at his side, they would surely give a retort that before things like night scenery and so on, he should at least raise the hotel's grade a little bit higher.



He was enjoying the night scenery for a while having a wild delusion inside his brain about rendezvousing with Rana, during that time he took out his smartphone and smiled cheerfully while looking at his photo with Rana that they took the last time the gate was opened to Tortus, he repeated those kind of things for several hours.



Kousuke headed toward the bathroom, thinking that he should take a shower soon and retire to bed.



The bathroom also had antique structure, There was a shower nozzle that could be directly taken on the wall and several handles below it. For the time being he would first ascertain the knack of the old shower, when he rotated the handle which played *kiko-kiko* sound, water gushed out rapidly. While saying「Naïve-, you think I'll get my head drenched just like the cliché huh!」by himself futilely, he adjusted the handle *kiko-kiko* so that the warmth would be the optimum temperature.



He ascertained the warmth with his hand while whispering 'This temperature is enough I guess', it was at that time――



Noisy hustle and bustle and fierce shaking came from upper floor. The troubling thing was that dust fluttered down in sprinkles from the ceiling.



「Kehoh. What's this, don't make a racket in this kind of worn-out hotel you there. ……The ceiling won't be thin like the wall right?」



He had finished confirming the thinness of the wall. He wanted to believe that this building wouldn't go as far as having even its ceiling selling a fight right from the front toward the law regarding construction standard. Kousuke's expression was turning slightly anxious while he was looking up at the ceiling that was energetically spraying down dust.



There was no way, that the people at upper floor was intensely making love, where the excessive intensity would cause the ceiling to came off and fell down, where Kousuke would face the couple――ain't no way such thing would……while Kousuke was having wild delusion that would make him red faced if his acquaintance asked him about it, for some reason a bad premonition was welling up inside his chest, then he shook his head like dog in order to shake off the dust raining down on his head.



Instantly, *pan-pan-pan* bursting sound that he was familiar with struck Kousuke's eardrum.



「E, ee? Wai-, just now was that gunshot? Isn't that too intense for love making!?」



Kousuke looked up at the ceiling again from being startled. Even during that time the gunshot continued to sound without pause. No matter how he thought about it, the guest at the upper floor was doing a fierce gunfight with someone else. Moreover, *papapapapa* from how even consecutive bursting sound like that could be heard, one of the sides, or possibly both sides were even coming there equipped with machine gun type.



「I, I just witnessed a car chase at the afternoon you know? Just how dangerous foreign country can be huh. Or else, is it Japan that is too peaceful!?」



Thinking that it would be unbearable if bullets pierced the ceiling and rained down at him, Kousuke made his body smaller while exiting the bathroom. And then, just to be sure he should look at the situation of his own room's floor whether it was safe or not, so he quietly opened the room toward the corridor. His face peeked out a bit and he ran his gaze to the left and right of the corridor, but for now it seemed there was no one at the corridor.



Kousuke went「Who can stay longer than this in a hotel that have guys having gunfight like that!」, he was raising a weird flag while deciding to start to run away.



But, before he could do that, from the direction of the window there was a flash that was too intense bursting out. It appeared that the guest upstair was even using flashbang. Right after that,



「Doctor Grant-, hold on! We are jumping!」



「We, we'll really do it!? Ya, wait, wait I told youuuuuuu~~~」



Just when he heard such loud voice and scream coming from the window, right after that, *pan-pan-pan* the window of Kousuke's room had several holes opened on it and it cracked in spider web shape, right at the next instant, *gashaaan-* the window glass was blown away inside along with that pulverization sound.



――Along with a woman in black suits, and a blonde haired side tail girl that was being held by that woman.



「Are you injured, Doctor Grant?」



「Uu, I'm fine here Vanessa. But, my life span is shrinking.」



The tall woman wearing black suits――an agent of state security bureau Vanessa Paradis helped the blonde haired side tail girl wearing lab coat――Emily Grant to stand up.



Emily was making a pale face while shaking her head around, Vanessa was giving that a glance while quickly replacing the magazine of the automatic gun she was holding with her gaze moving at the entrance.



「Let's hurry Doctor Grant. We will be surrounded soon.」



「Yes, I understand. Even so, I'm glad that there is no one in the room below.」



「Yes. Thinking of their method, they will be willing to involve even civilian after all……」



Both of them was jumping down with comparatively reckless method of using bed sheet as extempore rope to leap down from upper floor to lower floor, but they stroke down their chest in relieved sigh that there was no one in that lower floor room.



Whether it was with the car chase at the afternoon and also the attack before that, the pursuer of Emily and Vanessa was gradually growing to not choose their method. If there was civilian not at a public place but in a inconspicuous place like this room of a dilapidated hotel, those guys would undoubtedly remove that person without any second thought.



(……No, well, this happen every time, so it's not like I'm bothered. But I entered your field of vision right in front of you here, and it's not like I'm putting on invisibility or anything you know?)



The sudden situation caused a certain someone with thin shadow somewhere who stiffened while half opening the door's room to slip out grumble while his cheeks were convulsing. And then, he thought that instead it was better like this that he wasn't noticed by this two females who were intensely smelling of troublesome thing, perhaps he ought to plan to flee right away without delay.



However, Kousuke's luggage――although there was nothing really valuable in it, but he couldn't leave behind his passport and wallet that were in there.



Besides,



(……These two, aren't they the two at the car chase this afternoon?)



Yes, Kousuke remembered. These two were the females who witnessed his beautiful midair sandwich catch and ginger ale catch, and then they exposed silliness of getting dazed with mouth wide open regardless that they were in the middle of a car chase.



They gave intense smell of troublesome thing, one of them was obviously not a person with a respectable position, while the other one, even though she was around the same age with Kousuke yet she was wearing a worn-out lab coat. But even so, for some reason Kousuke was paying attention to these two who were in a desperate situation.



That was perhaps because he had seen the figure of these two feeling relieved that no unrelated person was getting dragged into their situation even while they were confronting an outrageous situation like gunfight in an intense action movie.



(But, I won't be moved. Even though this is a coincident that looks like there is even some kind of compelling force working in it, but a coincidence is a coincidence. These two look like they are good people, and they are beauty, they are beauty! But me who am a riajuu and have Rana as lover won't be swayed! I will also have summer cram school short course the day after tomorrow. And so, I'm going home!)



Kousuke proclaimed such thing inside his heart while using stealthy footsteps, stealthy footsteps, sloo~wly and quii~etly he returned inside the room. It wasn't like he had a callous sense of value who would cast away everything unrelated to him like Hajime when he was at Tortus.



However, Kousuke who was at earth was a man of valor at supernatural level who could annihilate the main base of a secret society that possessed history of several hundred years by his lonesome. Someone who possessed such power could do almost anything. And then, in this world, everywhere there were troubled people asking for help, and someone like Kousuke who was traveling around here and there would witness that to a "frequent" degree whether he wanted it or not.



If he moved just because of his emotion to all of those with only the reason of "because they are in trouble", then there wouldn't be an end to it. Something like pursuing his own dream would become secondary or tertiary.



And above all, Kousuke also wasn't someone like Hajime who possessed strength to a degree that was almost almighty. In addition, he didn't happen to have a sense of value of relying upon others just for his own objective that would let him say「Something that can make me almighty」and request artifact to Hajime.



There were several times until now where he had bad aftertaste from turning a blind eye or feeling ashamed due to his action, but, even so, what was the thing that ought to be prioritized, and where he should draw the line……the importance of those had been carved into his heart by his days at the other world, the way of the demon king that guided them, and the time that he spent with Rana and family of Hauria.



Like that, Kousuke decided to not get involved with Emily and Vanessa. Right at that time the two females were being on guard while moving toward the entrance――in other words, toward Kousuke's direction, the two sides passed each other, and it was at that time, a situation arose as though to ridicule that decision of Kousuke.



「VANESSAAAAA-!!!」



「-!?」



An angry voice was thrown toward Vanessa. The origin of that voice was the window with nice ventilation that Vanessa and Emily had just jumped through. Seeing at that direction, there was a man who was wrapping his hand with bed sheet as rope replacement similarly like Vanessa, using centrifugal force to leap into the room.



Vanessa reflexively aimed her gun to shot the man. But, the gun muzzle of the handgun that the man's other hand was holding was aimed not at herself but toward Emily, seeing that Vanessa immediately jumped and pushed Emily down.



The man grinned widely at that reaction of Vanessa, in the end he didn't pull the trigger and like that he rushed into the room agilely, with a forward roll he killed his momentum while his gun was thrust out with a flowing motion right toward Vanessa who had just lifted her face.



「……Tsk. So you are faster even in this situation. As always, it's only your technique that is first class.」



The man dropped his gaze toward his own chest along with a click of his tongue. There he found Vanessa's gun silently propped.



「That word "only" is saying too much, Kimberly. I'm also planning to have the sincerity to not betray my comrade unlike you.」



「Hah. That is not called "sincerity". That's called "naivety". Just like how you covered that missy just now even while you understood that I wouldn't shot.」



The man called Kimberly lambasted like that at Vanessa with a tone that sounded as though spit would spittle out. Brown short hair and toned body that was obvious even behind the suits he wore. Eyes that looked like bird of prey and lips with their corner raised cynically. Seeing objectively, he had a well-ordered feature of wild type that could even pass off as actor.



Judging from their way of speaking, it was obvious that Vanessa and Kimberly knew each other, no, that they were coworker. At the same time, Kimberly who seemed to be the pursuer of Emily and Vanessa could also be seen to have a turbulent background of having betrayed Vanessa.



(Waiiit! What the hell keep happening one after another here! Is this a movie-, am I in the middle of action movie that excited the whole America huh-! Are you two aiming for this scene where you point gun at each other while cracking jokes huh! Aren't you two cool huh!)



Vanessa and Kimberly both slowly stood up while aiming their gun at each other. Right around the middle of them was a man with thin shadow who were furiously making retort even though he didn't say it out loud. He should be inside their field of vision normally but……



「Give up already Vanessa. Hand over the doctor. You too, come with me. You can get lot of money that will still have change left even if you used them for playing your whole life you know? That's far better than eating lead bullet in this kind of place right?」



「Did you kill everyone in the team for that kind of reason? Just because of money? There is no way I'll be swayed by that kind of vulgar reason. I'll accomplish my duty. I won't let you lay your hand on the doctor.」



Kimberly clicked his tongue once again in irritation. Behind Vanessa, Emily whose face was stiffened in nervousness was directing her gaze at Vanessa with face that looked like wanting to cry.



「Uhah, this woman is so cool……. If this is a movie filming then you must be the protagonist for sure, yep.」



Someone somewhere spontaneously let out his impression.



Kimberly glanced at Emily while continuing his words with mocking tone.



「Duty is it. Hah, do you seriously think that something like that is still valid?」



「……What do you mean?」



「Who knows? Just what does that mean I wonder? Won't you get it if you return to the headquarter?」



「Don't tell me……」



Vanessa whose expression was scarce in variation even through all these chain of events opened her eyes slightly wider at this point. The words of Kimberly gave light to the possibility that perhaps they were already falling into a hopeless and isolated situation. Even though it was already hopeless to break through the current situation, to lose even her backing would be the same as being placed in a check for real.



Were Kimberly's words the truth? Who was her ally and who was her enemy? Who could she believe?



In contrast with Vanessa's scarce expression, inside she was wracking her brain. It was at that time sounds of footsteps running from corridor reverberated like time limit ticking down. While Kimberly was obstructing them here, the other pursuers were using the stair to come here.



「tsu」



「This is the end Vanessa. I understand you know? Normally, you wouldn't follow along with this kind of pointless task and would try to suppress me swiftly. You didn't do that because you are injured somewhere aren't you? My surprise attack at the research lab――seems like you didn't manage to deal with that completely huh. Your driving at the afternoon too, you were continuously making mistakes that is unlike you.」



Kimberly quickly ran his gaze all over Vanessa's body, then he said「Is it your side?」while laughing. Vanessa didn't show any reaction, but in exchange Emily's sorrowful expression completely exposed the truth in Kimberly's words.



「Aa, then that accident at the afternoon, so that wasn't simply because she is unskillful in driving huh.」



Inside that strained situation, a certain someone with thin shadow who was sneakily and quietly collecting his luggage was whispering such thing with small voice. As expected, surely someone would noti……



「Even so you aren't pulling the trigger, is that because you don't think that you will for sure even against the wounded me?」



「……I wish you'd say that I'm careful instead. There is no need for me to intentionally brave more danger even though it will be checkmate already soon.」



「No, that attitude of yours isn't what is called "careful", but "cowardice".」



Perhaps that was her payback for before. Kimberly who ate a splendid word counter narrowed his eyes looking daunted. 「That's really an excellent payback. You're doing great, do it more! Get humiliated, you handsome!」Such small voice that cheered Vanessa and cursed Kimberly resounded, but the voice was normally passing into right ear and came out from the left ear unnoticed.



Right after that, six armed men rushed into the room with noisy footsteps. Vanessa frowned and Emily turned pale while huddling close to Vanessa, Kimberly's expression became completely filled with joy, and the young man with thin shadow had shouldered his baggage unnoticed while looking back from nearby the door with an awkward expression.



「Now then, this is the end of the road of your meaningless escape drama. Sorry, but I won't ask you already whether you will join me or not. I'll kill you here and take away the missy. You had spat at your last chance just now. You stupid woman.」



「Vanessaa!」



「tsu, Doctor-」



When Kimberly signaled with his eyes, a man with solid built wearing leather jacket caught Emily's arm and tore her away from Vanessa. Vanessa gritted her teeth and then she took a deep breath as though resolving herself before,



「Doctor Grant, my apologize. It seems that I cannot protect you until the end. But, that doesn't mean I have run out card. Please don't give up.」



Saying that, she smiled faintly while taking off her gaze completely from Kimberly, she defenselessly turned around toward Emily. She casually slid out something from her pocket while――



「Do you think, how many times I have teamed up with you?」



「tsk, guh」



Instantly a gunshot echoed, at the same time Kimberly's kick stabbed onto Vanessa's flank. The gunshot came from Vanessa. She pretended to avert her attention toward Emily while firing at Kimberly, then she tried to use her last flashbang.



But, Kimberly appeared to have predicted that, he brushed off Vanessa's gun with his gun that he pointed at her and simultaneously he launched a fierce kick at her flank.



Vanessa fell on her knee due to the intense pain and red stain seeped out on her flank. At her side *clonk* a small flashbang with its pin still attached rolled. Vanessa was drenched in sweat, even so she tried to aim her gun muzzle toward Kimberly but her arm was kicked once again and her arm let go of the gun.



And then, Kimberly's gun muzzle pushed grindingly at Vanessa's forehead, as though to show that it was checkmate for sure this time.



「I got no carelessness and opening. That's my respect to you.」



「……」



Kimberly looked down at Vanessa with a gaze that contained no more emotion. Emily was being pinioned from behind while desperately raising her voice to stop him, but Kimberly didn't even spare a glance at her. His unwavering gaze that informed the checkmate glared at Vanessa's long slit eyes that reflected no despair which also glared back at him.



Like that, in a moment Kimberly narrowed his eyes in displeasure and his finger on the trigger tightened. There was no more margin between on and off of the trigger. With a click, the internal mechanism's operating sound rang.



「Stooop! Vanessa! Run away-!」



Emily's scream reverberated. 'No matter what happened', the woman who had said that to her and protected her just as those words meant, was going to have her head blown up in front of her eyes. Even though she had already had a lot of her important people died, yet fate was still going to expose another tragedy in front of her eyes again. Emily's heart creaked.



「See ya, Vanessa.」



「Fall to hell, ugly man.」



A betrayer, and a knight of a girl, they exchanged the last words.



Someone, anyone is fine. Anyone is fine so. She is expressionless, blunt, but this really good natured and sincere woman, please save her. Just like how this person saved me, please save her-!



Emily screamed. She wished for salvation. That her wish would reach a miracle, that surely should exist somewhere in this world.



「Someone-, save――――!!」



「Aaa, geez-. Come one, don't say something like that!」



Instantly, a single gunshot echoed. It was small embodiment of death that scattered human's life easily, however, the room wasn't dyed red.



Sprinkle of woodchips fell from the ceiling.



「He?」



「Ha?」



「Wha, what is……」



Vanessa leaked out a stupid voice that was unlike the clever beauty that she was, Kimberly raised an astonished voice that was unable to understand the situation, while Emily unconsciously slipped out a question. The man who was restraining Emily, and the other men too, they were dumbfounded still, with their eyes turned into dot at the strangeness that suddenly happened inside this room.



「Haah, I did it. But, a man, or rather a human that doesn't react in this situation, they are just no good huh.」



「tsu, yo, you-. Just where in the world, did you come from――」



Kimberly stepped back. But he couldn't step back further than that. The reason was, because while everyone in that room was focusing their attention, he――Kousuke who suddenly appeared and grasped his arm that was holding the gun and moved it to aim at the ceiling.



Just where in the world did you come from, those words that expressed the agitation of Kimberly caused Kousuke to smile wryly.



「From where you ask? This place is my room. I am here right from the start. Can you spare me from using other person's room for a Hollywood scene as you please?」



「Chih, so you hid somewhere-」



Kimberly tried to shake off Kousuke's hand, but even though he had the appearance like a Japanese boy who wasn't even a young man yet, the trained arm of Kimberly felt like it was being constricted tightly by a vise that he couldn't move even for a bit.



The other men who returned to their senses with 'hah' aimed their gun at Kousuke in panic, but at that time Kousuke smoothly moved behind Kimberly and turned him into a shield. With that the men hesitated to pull their trigger.



Using that opening, Kousuke twisted Kimberly's wrist and restrained his hand to the back. Kimberly grimaced from the pain at his wrist while raising his voice to ask the identity of this intruder.



「You-, who are you! Your movement just now……you aren't a civilian huh!?」



「No no, I am a normal student that you can found anywhere――」



Kousuke took Kimberly hostage for the time being while his gaze urged Vanessa to take Emily and escape quickly.



However, the Vanessa in question, right after she received Kousuke's gaze, her expressionless face crumbled for some reason to be replaced with relieve. And then, she cut off Kousuke's words and said something like this.



「Fuh. So it seems you made it in time aren't you, Mr. K.」



Her way of speaking was as though she knew from the start that support would arrive. Now that she mentioned it, just now she said something like she still hadn't run out of card yet, however, there was no way she was referring to Kousuke. Kousuke being her was a coincidence, there should be no way for her to recognize Kousuke's existence, in various meanings.



For some reason there was this unpleasant coincidence where she called him with just his initial even though it was the correct one……



「Eh? No no, you are absolutely mistaking――」



「What-!? Mr. K, you said!? You are that person!?」



Kousuke's words were cut off once more, by Kimberly who was shocked and got taken aback for some reason.



「Wait a second! You guys are absolutely misunderstanding here! Indeed, my initial is K but――」



「Just as I thought, you are really Mr. K!? It's no wonder that I got taken by surprise……. This way of killing your presence, I have never seen something like this before. Shit-, Vanessa. I detected you making contact somewhere while you were fleeing this afternoon but, who'd ever think that you are bringing in a support like this man-」



Unstoppable misunderstanding. Kousuke's words was easily treated like passing wind similar with how thin his presence was. Inside his heart he went「Or rather, just who is this Mr. K!?」, screaming at the situation that was showing him with this unexpected development.



「The freelance hit man that won't show his figure no matter what……. He will accept a hit for anyone depending on the reward. Honestly, I hesitated until the end whether to request assistance or not from someone that has been blacklisted by the security bureau. But, to protect Doctor Grant, this is unavoidable. ……Although, I never thought that Mr. K is a Japanese and he is someone this young, it shocked me.」



Kousuke thought. Thank you for the explanation, like that.



It appeared this Mr. K was a hit man that was put in the blacklist of government.



For Vanessa who wouldn't desert Emily no matter what, this was a really difficult situation that she would even rely on this option although it pained her. Most likely she was thinking that this person who would kill anyone depending on the reward, someone who absolutely wouldn't betray his client, and would accomplish the request without fail, would be someone that was relatively easier to request from compared to other characters that were put in the blacklist.



「Oi, notice already the inconsistency inside your own words. You said that this Mr. K won't show his figure, but here he is showing himself normally see. A Japanese this young, this kind of Japanese youngster, I don't know from which organization he came from but there is no way he is a hit man that is put inside black――」



「I, I remember! He, at the café that Vanessa crashed into this afternoon, he is the person who caught sandwiches and drink from midair!」



「From the afternoon, you say? Shit, so even the escaping route was predicted and you were observing us! We were planning to pursue, but actually we are the one that is being pursued here huh.」



The misunderstanding was accelerating. Emily-chan, what an exquisite interruption in unbelievable timing. Kimberly gritted his teeth and Kousuke's cheeks were grandly convulsing.



「Excuse me, I beg you please listen to my sto――」



「Kimberly. I requested Mr. K to murder the attackers who come in the middle of Doctor Grant's protection. You understand what is the meaning of that aren't you? Although he is a young hit man that rose to prominence in this two, three years, it's already proven that his skill is the real deal. In front of this cruel and heartless person, I cannot recommend you to do anything rash.」



Kousuke, was a cruel and heartless young hit man……. Something shiny was starting to gather faintly at the corner of Kousuke's eyes. The hand that was restraining Kimberly was shaking as though expressing the inside of his heart.



Seeing that, the armed men went「Kuh, this is bad. That guy, he is desperately holding back his urge to kill」etc., they were making expression that shuddered with fear and whispered to each other. Kimberly too, the shaking that he felt was starting to make him flustered while saying「Kuh, what a crazy guy-」.



「Vanessa. Just what is different between you and me? You are insane, using this kind of fiend for the sake of your objective. In the end, you are going to do anything if it's for your objective aren't you?」



「Wai-, calling me fiend is rud――」



「Indeed, perhaps that is so. But, I plan to at least discern the line that shouldn't be crossed. If, he is really a fiend in the true meaning, and he directed that killing intent to Doctor Grant or people who are not related at all, at that time I'll stake my life to stop him.」



「Listen here, can you stop so naturally calling me fiend, fiend like――」



「Don't lump Vanessa together with someone like you! Someone like you after all is just a wretched petty scoundrel whose eyes are blinded by money! That devilish homicide, -san over there is still better than you!」



「Oy you, I'm going to cry here. Do you think that if you add "-san" it's okay to call other people devilish homici――」



「Hmph, those are words of a kid who doesn't know the value of money. But, do you forget? The one who create that devil medicine is no other than you missy. If you are talking about fiend, then it's you yourself who――」



Beautifully ignoring a certain someone somewhere. Kimberly's words became an unseen blade that hurt Emily. Emily's expression distorted in pain and guilt and her hand unconsciously gripped on her chest……but, at that time, suddenly Kimberly's words stopped and in exchange a scream of「Ouchh-」was raised.



Finally everyone noticed with that scream, the figure of Kousuke behind Kimberly with his eyes getting teary, while his hand was carrying a glittery object that he was holding before anyone noticed.



「I don't know the circumstances of you all? I am an outsider? That's why, I was thinking to let these two escape without harming both sides with my all, yet? For some reason I am got normally leave behind? No, it's not like I'm bothered though. I am used to it. I am not bothered at all. I'm totally fine. But, because I think that communication is important, I say that ignoring someone is no good, yep.」



「Mr, Mr. K?」



「tsu, calm down Mr. K. We doesn't mean to make light of――」



Somehow feeling the atmosphere that seemed to be dangerous, Vanessa spoke with halted words while Kimberly was spinning his words with cold sweat trickling from his body. The gaze of these two was looking at the same direction with Emily and the armed me, all their attentions were poured at the thing that was being carried by Kousuke while he was trembling all over as though to display the emotion inside his heart.



Amidst the running nervousness, the lips of Kousuke who finally obtained everyone's attention burst out in a smile looking just a smidgen happy. Seeing that, Kimberly and others showed a faint relieved express――



「And so, eat this-! The insane lethal weapon that produced fire ash――Ashtray Assault!」



「What do you mean 'and so', wai-, wait a-――goheeh!?」



The sparkling object――the excessively heavy glass ashtray that for some reason was put inside the room even though this was a worn out hotel, it was swung down by Kousuke whose expression was still smiling broadly toward Kimberly's head.



*gochin-* Such painful sound echoed, at the same time stars floated in front of Kimberly's eyes. Like that Kimberly powerlessly slumped down hard to the floor powerlessly. Seeing how the white of his eyes were fully exposed, it seemed that everyone's beloved lethal weapon of Tuesday had properly accomplished its role. (TN: The Tuesday is some kind of word play I think. Tuesday in Japan is written with the kanji of fire, maybe that's why it was related with ashtray here.)



The gazes of the armed men were lured toward Kimberly, right after that, they re-aimed their gun nuzzle with the intention of turning the intruder who had lost his shield into swiss cheese for sure this time.



But, a small object lightly danced at the height of their gaze.



「You two-, we are running away now!」



The moment Kousuke yelled that, the object midair exploded with a flash. Intense flash that burned the retina trampled the inside of the room. Yes, that was the brightness of flash hand grenade. That thing which Kousuke nonchalantly picked up was tossed at the same time when he gave a blow to Kimberly.



The armed men screamed「Not again-」while covering their eyes, during that time *goin-* a painful sounding sound and「buberah」a short scream became audible once more. Kousuke's Tuesday lethal weapon sent the men who were nearby Emily flying.



「Mr. K! Take Doctor Grant-」



「Yes yes, I know. Also, don't call me Mr. K.」



「Fuwah, wh, who!? Mr. K!?」



「……」



While light was trampling the room's inside, it seemed Emily was flinching from having her eyesight stolen because her eyes got done in by the flashbang that was thrown without any advance arrangement at this second time, so she made her body as small as possible by squatting with both her hands holding her head. Somehow it was a defensive posture that made anyone looking at her felt a charisma without reason.



Kousuke cursed while carrying her on his shoulder. The truth was he yelled at them with a plan of having the two protect their eyes from the flash just like they had done the first time, using that opening he would quickly mask their whereabouts, but it seemed that his plan couldn't proceed that well.



Vanessa also had her eyesight robbed, but it appeared that she had memorized the position of all the people inside the room and their distances from her accurately using the measurement of the number of her steps, that she was able to quickly move even while having her eyesight crushed, it was just as to be expected from her.



The armed men, even while being unable to see they immediately aimed their gun toward the direction of the voice, but there would be no meaning if they didn't capture Emily alive. Therefore they could only move about in confusion without pulling their trigger. Seeing how they were unable to immediately chase these two to this room from upper floor like Kimberly, and how their eyesight was easily crushed for the second time like this, it appeared that they weren't at the level where they could introduce themselves as agent.



「To outside. There is a car at the street one block from here.」



「Roger. Or rather, you can run really well huh. Aren't you still unable to see?」



「E, excuse me, M, Mr. K-. Can you, stop your shoulder-, from bumping my stomaaach!? M, mhy schomach is-, heguh」



「I can see a little, and I have grasped the approximate number of step. Please guide me in the case I make a mistake.」



「Got it.」



「Tha, that, that's why-, my schomach is-, heguu. Before, I missed, going to toileeet-. I'm in a bad situation hereee」



It seemed that Emily's stomach was in a pinch, but in the case they encountered enemy, Vanessa who wasn't carrying gun couldn't really be counted as battle strength nor did Kousuke wanted to, so there was a need for him to keep one of his hands empty. And so, he couldn't carry Emily on his back when she could slip off anytime or carrying her in his arms which would make both his hands full.



That was why, even though Emily who were attacked just on the verge of her going to toilet now had her bladder screaming, there was no way he could listen to her request. In no way at all that because his words were ignored or Emily brought up the subject of him at the café this afternoon with miraculous timing that he was doing this for a meager revenge. If he said it was not then it was not.



「Muh, just as I thought there are some more. Eat this-, sure kill, Tuesday's unpredictable attaaack!」



While Emily-chan was in the middle of a desperate battle which concerned the protection of her dignity, Kousuke threw the lethal weapon of Tuesday toward the armed man that appeared from the door that connected to the stair. The Tues――ashtray that soared while displaying splendid rotation like a boomerang splendidly made a clean hit at the nose of the man who had just peeked out his face.



*docha-* The ashtray fell beside the man who was collapsing in a heat with blood spurting out grandly from his nose. The ashtray was already dyed red from absorbing the blood of several people. It was worrying whether that would cause it to become like a cursed katana or rather a cursed ashtray.



Vanessa casually stepped on the crotch of the collapsed man and approached the stair. For an instant Kousuke thought of giving a warning toward the woman whose eyesight was declining, but Vanessa was descending down the stair with lightness that made him doubted whether she was really being unable to see.



「M, Mr. K? I vaguely gussed it. I'm begging you here please let me do――」



「I'm not Mr. K.」



「Do, don't! The stair is no good I told youuu! I beg younyaaAAAAAAAAA-」



Kousuke ran down the stairs by skipping steps. That movement was truly nimble, chasing Vanessa from behind gallantly as though he was performing dance steps. It must be remembered that he was rushing like this only to match Vanessa's pace, he had no ulterior motive, not in the least.



Even though hearing Emily-chan's sorrowful voice like「Stoooop-~」, or「Fo, forgive me alreadyyyy~」, or「My schomach, stop tapping thereeee~」, or「It's comiiiing, it's coming alreadyyyyy-」, or「Mr. Kee, I'll kill you after thiiiiiis」, or「Ah, that's a lie, I'm not seriouuuss! I'm sorryyyyy-」caused his heart to flutter for a bit, but he had no ulterior motive at all and that was that!



「Doctor Grant, please lower your voice a little. Perhaps there is still enemy around.」



「Tha, that's what you are saying, in this kind of situation!?」



「It's okay. The situation is like this so……there is nothing to be ashamed of at all.」



「Right now, I understand! I have, no ally at all hereeee~~~」



Emily-chan's sorrowful voice knew no end. This was concerning the dignity of a girl. Although right now was an emergency situation, but in a sense this was a critical moment for the inexperienced Emily.



As expected, even for Kousuke it would be unbearable if Emily really did that while she was still on his shoulder, so he was thinking of changing the posture into carrying her under his arm soon. Kousuke was very much a normal person. Although Emily was a beautiful girl, he didn't happen to have a fetish of feeling happy if she was *peep*-ing on him at all.



However, regardless of Kousuke having ulterior motive or not, that decision of his seemed to be just a bit late.



「Hm? Wait a second lab coat miss? Can you release me? I'll carry you under my arm now okay.」



「I, impossible……if I move……it will come out.」



「Wait wait wait, there is no shaking anymore right? I'm properly descending the stair softly here.」



「Impossible……I, I'm sorry, father, mother……Emily is……a bad daughter.」



Emily was clinging on Kousuke tiiiiiightly while staying unmoving without even a twitch. Seeing from Kousuke's view point, her eyes were empty, while her lips were making a dry smile.



Emily who was suddenly whispering repentance to her parents caused Kousuke to make a flustered expression that said「Shit, I overdid it!?」. He had even used his skill so that no vibration was transmitted to Emily in the middle, but it seemed that Emily had been comparatively in her limit from the beginning.



「Do, do your best lab coat miss! Don't give up-, if you give up, that will be the end of your dignity!」



「……(shiver shiver)」



「You cannot even speak anymore!? Wait the person in suits over there! This child is seriously at her limit here! Stop for a bit! Let's stop at the corner over――」



「There is no time for that. Mr. K. If you are a man, then please shut up and accept it like one.」



「You, what are you saying!? Eei, lab coat miss! I'll put you down right now so――」



「――a」



「Wai――」



Escape drama that happened late at night in a worn-out hotel.



Kousuke and others who splendidly escaped was pursued by Kimberly and others who regained their consciousness.



……while following the water trail that stood out with its pungent smell.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Now then, this is quiz about heroine attribute from previously, you already understood the correct answer right?



The correct answer is,



Blonde side-tail + Lab coat girl + unyielding cat eyes + peeing + charisma guard (however defense power is zero) (TN: Search カリスマガード at google to look at the image. The term came from a fighting game of Touhou where the guard pose of Remilia is called as charisma guard.)



Like that. How was it? Was it just as you imagined?



I’ll be happy if you readers have fun.



Now then, a bit of report, the third volume was released.



This too is thanks to the people who kindly picked up the book (probably it’s especially with the power of the reader from Narou-san).



‘The extra story is terrible (lol)’, that is something that I and others are recognizing, but if you readers can have fun with it then it will make me happy.



Please take care of me from here on too.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 201




「I'll kill you, Mr. K, kill. What virtuoso hit man. Don't make light of researcher. I'll absolutely, kill you dead.」



With only the occasional lamp in the street and the light of the car coming from opposite lane as the source of light, from the back seat of the quiet car interior, words that sounded like curse were spun in whispers.



Vanessa who was driving was sending her glances at the back mirror repeatedly, looking alternately at the figure of Emily who made herself tiny at the back seat by holding her knees together, her eyes looking like dead fish with her mouth continuously spouting out resentment and bitterness, and the figure of Kousuke beside Emily, drenched in cold sweat while taking as much distance as possible from her.



Seeing at Kousuke's coat that was being placed at his feet, and the window that was opened regardless of the cold air flowing into the car, as though to disperse some smell from inside the car, it could be understood that the reason of this situation should be rather left unsaid.



The gaze of Kousuke and Vanessa met through the back mirror. Kousuke was shaking his head while trembling with teary eyes, his gaze was directed toward Vanessa as though seeking help.



Vanessa quietly averted her gaze. *gon-* From behind there was a sound echoing that sounded like head knocked into the glass window.



(……Nevertheless, Mr. K. He is, really……a mysterious person isn't he.)



While feeling the gaze from the back seat that was sending SOS signal stabbing on her cheek, Vanessa talked to herself like that inside her heart.



――Mr. K



He was a hit man with unknown history and appearance that appeared since around two years ago, assassinating big shots with strict security one after another. It seemed that he wasn't attached to any organization, if someone made a request to him using the specified method, then he would carried out any kind of murder no matter how difficult it was depending on the amount of the reward.



Even the security bureau that Vanessa belonged to put him in a blacklist as a dangerous person since around one year ago. His skill in killing was without question, but in addition even when intelligence agency of state investigated him the information grasped was always dummy information, full-scale investigation had been started since half a year ago and it was still continuing until now, but his true identity still hadn't come to light. It was enough to comprehend how dangerous this person was just from that fact.



However, while Mr. K was in possession of that much skill, even when his description was analyzed and compared to all the people registered in the existing blacklist, but there was not even a single person who could be thought of as him there, the intelligence department was now putting their attention to Mr. K, considering him to be a wholly big rookie.



By the way, the national security bureau possessed the right to investigate and the right to arrest in wide area regarding serious crime that concerned with the state's security, furthermore the national intelligence department which was an agency that carried out things like the protection of important person was literally a secret service. Each department was further divided into subdivision, but let's omit it for now.



For a time, Vanessa entered an investigation team that investigated a assassination case that was caused by this Mr. K. The modus operandi of the murder was exceedingly simple and trace of him playing around in his work was nonexistent, two bullets to vitals, killing the target with accurate shot. He left no message that seemed like a killer who take delight in murder or made any declaration of his crime. And then, after he accepted a request and agreed to it, no matter how difficult it was, or even when the contract detail was mistaken and the difficulty level jumped up, he would never stop until he succeeded, his professional policy could be seen from there.



Mr. K was undoubtedly an atrocious killer. However, no matter how much of a coldhearted and inhuman person he was, he was a professional who would comply only to his contract no matter what happened.



She was betrayed by Kimberly, her comrades were annihilated, before she was able to link up with the reinforcement from headquarter, the continuous attacks without pause from enemy found her and she was forced to flee, unable to break out from the isolated and helpless situation. In order to protect Emily in such situation, there was a need to spent trump card even just by one more.



Permitting murder in the process of guarding――it was a choice that Vanessa made with bitterness. When this case was over, a disciplinary measure would surely wait for her.



In the first place she didn't understand whether her request would reach Mr. K, or even if it reached him would he accept it and was he within the range where he would be able to link up with them immediately, and would he who was hiding his true identity respond to the contract, by that point of time this choice of hers was already a gambling.



After all, the content of her request was a guard mission. Naturally in such mission the protector had to be nearby the protection target, and that mean that Mr. K would inevitably need to expose his true identity. Mr. K was also analyzed to be an expert in disguise, but it was still a risk nevertheless for him to expose himself in the open.



To say nothing of how if Mr. K investigated for a little, then for him who was strong in information war he would surely notice that the client was a person related with government right away.



Therefore, Vanessa made contact under the faint hope of luring Mr. K somehow with reward amount, but unexpectedly the reply from Mr. K was "I accept". Vanessa was suspicious, but Mr. K demanded large amount of money and explained that his protection would be done fundamentally while hiding, so Vanessa accepted it for the time being and tied a contract with him.



(Yet despite so, he exposed his figure in that place. I never even imagined that he is Japanese in the age that can still be called as teenager though……. Is he in disguise? Still, I cannot spot any disguise even from this range, that face only look like natural face……. If that is his natural face, then, just what in the world is he thinking about?)



It was difficult to guard someone indoor from distance. There was no way someone could protect someone indoor from outdoor using sniping method and the like. Mr. K should have understood that from the start. That was why, Vanessa thought that maybe she was just deceived by Mr. K and made the preparation and advance arrangement with Emily about using flashbang and jumped to the room downstair.



Inside her heart she was thinking that her profiling of Mr. K was mistaken, it was possible that he was a devilish homicide who was just greedy for money. Vanessa didn't discard the possibility that Mr. K might bare his fang to them.



(Even now, looking from his personality there is the possibility that he is in disguise……)



When Vanessa glanced once more at the back mirror, Kousuke's expression was visibly getting brighter in a flash, as though it was saying「Finally you look here!」. And then, he was sending eye contact at Vanessa while sending brief glances at Emily.



……A virtuoso hit man who was greatly perplexed against a single girl and looking for help desperately.



(I don't understand……)



From the back seat a small voice of「Oy you, just now, your eyes met me right? Why are you averting your eyes!」was calling at her. The Mr. K that she had imagined before, and the figure of teenager Japanese who was whispering「Heey, wait-. Don't ignore me. ……Don't tell me, even though we are riding the same car but I'm already out of your awareness……?」with teary eyes, those two images couldn't be connected inside Vanessa no matter who she pondered about it.



「Excuse me, Mr. K.」



「! I'm not Mr. K but, what?」



Seeing Kousuke who leaned his body forward looking a bit happy when he was addressed, Vanessa once again made the request that she had already made and rejected just now.



「My apologize but, can I ask you to replace me driving the car? As expected, it has become a bit hard for me.」



「Eh? No, I told you already just now, but I cannot drive, I have never even drive until now. I haven't taken my driving license yet. Or rather, even if I have taken license at Japan, is it okay for me to drive car at foreign country?」



「……You really, have never drive a car before?」



「Never. I have never even drive a scooter. That's why it's impossible. Sorry to make you drive while injured but……」



「No, it's not like there is any problem with my consciousness, and I also able to stop the bleeding.」



After they escaped from the worn-out hotel, Vanessa and others arrived until their car. At that time, Vanessa was injured, although it wasn't a big problem but in preparation of pursuer she asked Kousuke to drive, but at that time he refused with the same reason like now.



At first Vanessa thought that he was joking or he was keeping himself free in case of battle, but when she saw Kousuke who was frowning even now looking apologetic, she came to think that it was the truth that he really couldn't drive.



Mr. K who carried out assassination of important people not just at Britain, but at all over the world, there was no way he was unable to drive car but……



(Or rather, why is he still obstinately denying that he is Mr. K even in this situation……. By some chance, is he thinking that he can hide his true identity like that? No no, no way that's true……)



Inside Vanessa, Mr. K was increasingly turning into a stupid person.



For just a little, a thinking that said「Perhaps, he is really not Mr. K?」just like Kousuke told her floated inside her mind, but that terrific concealment to the degree that no one noticed him, his experienced aura that didn't flinch even when gun was pointed at him, and then his skill that enable them to escape without firing a single shot but instead using only the hotel's ashtray……no matter how she looked, it was unthinkable that this person could possibly be "ordinary person".



Therefore, inside Vanessa, her impressions of Kousuke couldn't mesh at all into a complete picture and her evaluation of him was going toward the direction of "mysterious" or "bizarre".



There was no way for Vanessa to think even in her wildest imagination that the concealment ability was his sorrowful ability that he possessed from birth or that there was person close to him that fired railgun so he was used to gun. Also, it wasn't that Kousuke didn't fire gun, but her simply didn't have gun and he couldn't fire gun or anything, as expected Vanessa wouldn't even think of such possibility……



Mr. K was a hit man. Kousuke was certainly a virtuoso hit man, but he wasn't Mr. K. He was unable to do feat that could be done ordinarily by earth's hit man. But, he had plenty of experience if it was killing and carnage.



Like this, Vanessa's impression toward Kousuke's character spurred her confusion.



「He, hey, this topic has been left alone until now but, this girl, what to do with her? It looks like, her grudge to me has already reached a level that can only be considered as curse here. Even though her eyes are dead, it looks like she is starting to make a faint smile here. Ah, just now, she is chuckling『kekeke』you hear that!? That is absolutely a bad news somehow!」



Kousuke glanced at Emily with convulsing expression and shivering body. Vanessa looked at the figure of Emily who even now looked like she could fall into the dark side anytime, so she put aside her discomfort that she felt toward Kousuke for the time being and she finally talked to Emily.



「Doctor Grant. Please cheer up. I told you already at that time, the situation was as it was. It's not something to be ashamed for.」



「……Vanessa.」



Inside Emily's empty eyes, a smidgen of light was lit and she lifted her face. Vanessa whose gaze met Emily through the back mirror, her expressionless face crumbled a little and her eyes loosened up, she then further formed words of consolation to her.



「Besides, didn't you also pee when you met me? At this late hour――」



「Uwaaaaaaaan-, I'm just a peeing girl after alllllllll」



Correction, she formed words of finishing blow. Kousuke put a retort「What are you doing adding blow like that!?」. Emily buried her face into her knees once more and this time she was holding her head with both her hands while turning even smaller than before.



The chaos at the back seat was making Vanessa's expression to become somewhat flustered and she did her best to recover the situation somehow.



「It, it's fine you know, Doctor Grant. If I and Mr. K stay silent, then nobody will know. Something not known is the same like it doesn't exist.」



It was a really forceful line of argument. It gently reached Emily's stormy heart like a refreshing breeze. Although, maybe that reasoning would work if it was just Vanessa, but as expected, if it was known by someone of different gender, and in addition it was a different gender whose age was close with her, the damage to her mind was just that great. She couldn't be convinced that simply.



「Bu, but……」



Emily's gaze glanced repeatedly at Kousuke. But, as though to say that she had already calculated that factor too, this Vanessa spoke comforting words to Emily with an expression that could be seen as self-satisfied look this time.



「Doctor Grant. Please rest assured. Mr. K is Japanese.」



「A, and?」



「At Japan, there is this kind of phrase. ――"Rather that is a reward".」



「Wha. what is the meaning of that?」



Kousuke's pleading words of「I told you already, I'm not Mr. K. I'm Kousuke」were beautifully ignored like a passing air, Emily was tilting her head at Vanessa's continuing words. And then, Kousuke who guessed the meaning of Vanessa's words tried to held her back with「Wait a secoooond!」but……



「It means, if it is done by beautiful girl, then whatever it is will bring joy, a side benefit. Yes, if the other party is a beautiful girl, then even if they get their crotch stepped on, even if they get punched in the face, even if they are abused with harsh words, and then, even if they are peed on! Rather that will mean as reward for them!」



「Wha wha wha wha wha, what did you saaaay!?」



The world that was unknown from the genius girl Emily Grant. Just how deep the karma of Japanese. Shudder ran through Emily's expression. Kousuke yelled「Stoooop! Don't lump together all Japanese into one category!」, but such thing was beautifully ignored and Vanessa's words continued.



「Doctor Grant. You are a beautiful girl. And then, Mr. K is Japanese. In other words, Mr. K who was peed on by Doctor Grant is dancing madly with joy inside his heart!」



Truly, a perfect logic. There was no chink on it! Vanessa unusually snorted *mofufun-* proudly and concluded her consolation words.



「Therefore, Doctor Grant. Even though you had grandly peed while being carried by Mr. K, even though because of that he became completely drenched, for him that was an unanticipated reward. He owe you one. If you use that as pretext and tell him to keep his silence, he will surely agree to it happily. No, rather he will even be happy with that comma――」



「You shut up alreadyyy! Or rather, why do you know about that kind of subcultre――」



「Thi thi thi thi this, pervert-. How can you be happy having m, my, pe, pee――something like that getting on you! Just what kind of nerve you have there!」



Kousuke cut off Vanessa's words, but immediately after, Emily whose face was bright red grasped Kousuke's collar and she began shook him back and forth, causing Kousuke to groan「gueh」and his words got caught up in his throat. Emily was yelling「Forget it! Forgeeet it! Just forget it alreadyy!!」while rocking Kousuke desperately.



It seemed that after catching a glimpse of the abnormal world, Emily's mental state that was already at the limit finally entered half-deranged state. The back of Kousuke's head was banged *gon-gon-* on the door, but Emily didn't show any sign of noticing that.



Furthermore,



「……Doctor Grant.」



「What!」



「It's not like I don't understand of your attempt to send Mr. K's memory flying but……」



「That's why what!」



「No, if you take mounting position like htat……Doctor Grant, you haven't even taken off your stocking right now, so Mr. K's clothes, it's now soaked even further by Doctor Grant's "that", I think.」



「!?」



「Mr. K, won't he become even happier?」



「You, it seems you want to frame me as pervert to the end huh-. Bring it on then, if you are picking a fight then I'll take you on! Come outside! I'll beat you up black and blue!」



Emily who jumped in panic got the back of her head hitting the door due to her overenthusiasm, she was holding her head while writhing. By doing that her skirt got flipped up, the black stocking enveloping her slender legs was exposed, its color was strangely changed, but it was fortunate that Kousuke's mind was now like a warrior who just had met his bitter enemy and was directed to Vanessa so he didn't notice.



Although, just as Vanessa warned, "that" was firmly soaked into Kousuke's trousers……



The groaning voice of Emily who felt pain at the back of her head and her shame entering mach speed due to her that soaking other once more, and the angry yell of Kousuke toward Vanessa, those caused Vanessa to tilt her head wondering「Just what in the world is he getting angry about?」……



It was a motel along the highway, with dazzling billboard lighted by showy and stale neon. Inside one of the room there, there were the figures of Vanessa whose upper body was only in underwear, and Kousuke right beside her with his face strangely blushing.



「Nn-」



「Oops, sorry. Does it hurt?」



「No, there is no problem. Rather than that……you are skilled.」



「Well, it's just this much. I have a lot of chance to practice.」



「Indeed, your movement seem experienced.」



It wasn't like the two of them were doing anything indecent. After they entered the motel and calmed down for the moment, Kousuke treated Vanessa's flank with the emergency kit that Kousuke happened to have.



In the first place, he was taught first-aid treatment to a certain degree at Tortus (they were taught that in the case that they ran out of magic power and couldn't use healing magic), and after returning to earth he also learned by self-education and going around the medical treatment spot in battlefield, so Kousuke's first-aid skill was high. His return from his personal trip of going around battlefield's medical treatment spot was also bearing fruit.



He spread haemostatic agent, pressed a clean gauze and wrapped bandage around. During that time he also stimulated her healing just a little with a method that didn't exist in this world



「Yosh, something like this I guess. It missed your vitals, and the important vein is also uninjured. The bullet, you treated that yourself huh. I guess you will be fine because your first aid in the beginning was done properly. But, there is the risk of infection, and it's not a light wound by any mean. You need to receive medical treatment soon.」



「I understand. However, right now is not the time to say that. Although you have come for us, it can be said that we are still in an isolated and helpless situation……at the very least until the reinforcement can take over the protection of Doctor Grant, there is no way I can rest.」



「That's, well, perhaps that's so.」



Vanessa wore her shirt while showing a grave expression, however, next she showed a wry smile while turning her gaze to Kousuke.



「Having said that, I don't think that I can even operate at my original 50%, so from here on, it seems that Mr. K, you will be considerably burdened.」



「……No, look here, I've said this many times but, I'm not Mr. K. I'm Kousuke. I'm a student at Japan. In this kind of situation, isn't it better to contact that real Mr. K one more time――」



Kousuke who didn't admit that he was Mr. K no matter what caused Vanessa to think of speaking the doubt that she was harboring. Her penetrating gaze was attempting to grope around for Mr. K's true intention.



But, before she could start, the *shaaaa* water sound that Kousuke tried to ignore to the best of his ability stopped at the same time with the *kyu-kyu-* sound of handle turned. Kousuke twitched in reaction and he suddenly became quiet. For some reason his expression was turning strangely nervous but……that couldn't be helped. Because, he was a boy.



Like that, a vivid rustling sound from the other side of the thin glass door slightly leaked out and became audible……



「……What's the matter you two, staying silent like that?」



From the door that was only half-opened, only half of Emily's face peeked out dubiously. Her eyes were containing a clear wariness. Especially toward Kousuke.



Kousuke settled the figure of Emily who had just finished taking a shower only for a moment in his eyesight, then he quickly averted his face to the side. The sight was relatively brutal for him.



Emily was undoubtedly a beautiful girl. Such girl was showing an appearance that was only wearing blouse and short skirt with her damp hair let down. Two buttons around her chest were unbuttoned and her beautiful nape was exposed. Her black stocking was dirty so naturally she didn't wear it. In other words, the bare slender and supple legs of Emily were being exposed with nothing to spare.



「Doctor Grant, it's nothing. Right now I have just received treatment.」



「I see. Vanessa, are you okay? You were shot you know? Are you really okay?」



「Yes, perhaps it should be called a small mercy. I'm still not feeling at my limit currently. It's not a wound that can threaten my life.」



Emily rushed at Vanessa still barefooted, she climbed on the bed while looking worriedly at Vanessa's wound.



At that time, Kousuke's gaze that was similarly returning to Vanessa sharply noticed. The skirt of Emily who was on all fours peering at Vanessa's flank. The light bulb of the room had warm color type so the room was dim, "that part" became dark and couldn't be seen but……



(Oy wait, the dirty stocking was thrown away but, then, the dirty underwear……what happened to it?)



Electricity ran through Kousuke's muscle. No way, no way……



「You are……not wearing it?」



「!?」



Emily pressed down on her skirt with a force that seemed like it could make *hyuba-* sound while taking a girl sitting posture. Her face was dyed bright red, her almond-shaped eyes glared up with shame and rage.



「Ah, no, just now……」



「I can't help it! It's still not dry right now!」



「Ah, yes.」



「Mr. K, as expected, just now is too lacking in delicacy.」



「Yes, I'm ashamed.」



The person who she had just grandly peed on now pointed out her no-panty state, however, for the moment it was someone who had saved them so she also couldn't frankly throw her anger at him, the peeing no-panty Emily-chan crawled into the bed and turned small while holding her head.



As expected, Kousuke was also aware that he had made a verbal slip, so he apologized at Emily who was trembling *purupuru* beneath the blanket while leaking out his impression「This girl, he is a girl that often turn small huh」. Of course that one was said inside his heart.



「I want to talk about what we will do from now on, is it fine?」



Seeing Emily who heard Kousuke's apology and peeked out her face from inside the blanket like a cat with its wariness in full alert, Vanessa opened her mouth with serious expression.



In contrast with the nodding Emily, Kousuke lifted up his hand to hold them for a bit.



「Before that, can you teach me something first? Can't you contact people who can help you two right away? Since we arrived her I saw no sign of Vanessa-san contacting anyone……I guessed it somehow but, Vanessa-san, you are a member of state organization right? Why don't you report and request reinforcement from your organization?」



That was the major premise needed to let their talk progress. Kousuke saved the two of them was because Vanessa was almost killed and also because Emily seek help. As expected, Kousuke couldn't draw a line from other people to the degree that he could pretend not to see someone else getting killed in front of his eyes.



But, at the same time he also couldn't continue helping Emily and Vanessa and judged Kimberly and his group as evil without grasping the situation. He chose to flee with these two at that scene, but if Vanessa contacted her comrade and arranged a force that could oppose Kimberly and others, Kousuke planned to vanish right away then.



For that reason, before he heard about the detail of the circumstance, he asked Vanessa to quickly contact her comrade but……



「Doctor Grant, I will talk about that matter――about【Berserk】. Is it fine?」



「……Yes. In any case, we have passed the stage where it can be hidden. I don't mind.」



「Oi you. What are you doing ignoring me so naturally like that. Just quickly contact your comrade already.」



Vanessa asked Emily(ignored Kousuke) with a serious air, Emily looked down while agreeing(ignoring Kousuke) with a voice that was vanishing down. Her expression was shaded with dark shadow that was darker than the shadow created by the room's coarse light bulb. Kousuke's shadow was getting thinner.



Kousuke who until now only saw the figure of Emily flustered, or shaking all over, or snapping in anger was feeling concerned that such girl was covered with this much deep shadow, even so he demanded explanation to Vanessa「Heey, why aren't you contacting your comrade? Heey, come on tell mee-」.



「The start of this matter, is the medicine that is the byproduct created from the course of Doctor Grant's research――【Berserk】getting out to the outside.」



「I cannot hear-. I cannot hear anything! Something like that medicine with naming that sound chuuni, I don't know any――」



「【Berserk】――it is the word root of berserker, the powerful warrior of god that rampaged in the battlefield without differentiating enemy or ally. It's unknown who named it with that word, but it's a naming that really to the point. After all, 【Berserk】is the worst medicine with the effect of "Berserkerification" just like the meaning of that name, where the victim cannot return into normal human for the second time.」



「……」



Beside Emily who was holding her knees with dark expression, Kousuke was also sitting down with the same posture while blocking her ears and shaking his head in refusal. The sound of the talking Vanessa was piercing into the ears of such Kousuke, as though the sounds was forcefully being screwed in,



「Doctor Grant is being targeted by the people who is pursuing that knowledge. This is a serious incident that concerned with the country's safety, so, for her protection, we, the national security bureau moved but……Kimberly's betrayal annihilated the whole team except me.」



Perhaps thinking of her comrade, Vanessa slightly narrowed her eyes while adding more words.



「At first, I thought that it was only Kimberly's betrayal but……thinking back now, I couldn't link up with the reinforcement so unnaturally. That is also the reason that I contracted you in the preparation of the worst case……anyway, this situation is enough to make me think of "possibility" toward the headquarter. Until I can be clear about this matter, I cannot make contact with headquarter that easily.」



「Aa, yes. You more or less answer my question. But, there were a lot of unnecessary things included there……」



Kousuke who was turning over the content of what he head inside his head while hanging his head down crestfallenly, and then he slowly looked up to the ceiling.



Ahead of his gaze was the ceiling that was blotted with stain at various spots, and the electric light bulb that was earnestly driving off the night's darkness. The deep black stains that represented ill will, and the night's darkness that was trying to swallow the light of hope……it was as though those things were representing the current situation of Emily and Vanessa.



He accidentally came to this country due to demon king-sama's instruction to him, he accidentally encountered these two at the café that he stopped by at, he accidentally needed to wait for airplane schedule, and he accidentally entered the hotel where these two were at.



What a prank of fate.



Even though he was burdened with the unpleasant title of man with world's thinnest shadow, the world discovered him only at this kind of time.



Even so,



「It's already too late by the point of time I got summoned to another world huh.」



Yes, for the demon king party who survived that rigorous world, getting involved with this kind of case was certainly, something too late.



「? Mr. K?」



「What's the matter?」



Vanessa and Emily tilted their head, unable to understand the meaning of Kousuke's whisper.



Shaking his head saying「It's nothing」while smiling wryly to those two, thinking that it was hard for his conscience to just run away from this matter without hearing their story, for the time being Kousuke decided to lend his ear to these two's explanation.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Above a bookshelves fully loaded with light novel (area fill type), coffee splashed……



The light novels dyed black. Hakumei’s heart is also dyed black.



The world, is always filled with things that shouldn’t be like so……



The march of self-destruction, will also be at 6 z Saturday too. Perhaps, surely, if I revived.





Chapter 202




「Why……why is that……how……」



While whispering under her breath, Emily Grant was walking on the path that was leading to the research building of the university with fast steps that raised loud clopping sound. Her blue eyes were swimming around without composure due to her mind that was thinking in hectic pace, as though to display the impatience and irritation inside her heart, her mouth was busily biting on the nail of her thumb repeatedly.



――Emily Grant



A girl with blonde hair tied into a side tail and almond shaped eyes like a cat, and then white lab coat as her trademark. A genius that in her eleven years of age managed to enroll into Percival University which have prominent research facility of medicine even in this Britain, she was a first class researcher that had already published several thesis which were highly evaluated.



When she enrolled at first, because of her age and her examination result that was standing out, she received a lot of attention, not a little jealousy, and treated like a tumor. Therefore, the girl who was still young laid out defensive wall using bluff and stubbornness and composed expression, making a habit of not letting what inside her heart came out onto her expression.



Because she was a girl like that, that her current situation where she had no leeway to hide the agitation and impatience inside her heart was something unusual, it caused several students that could be seen scattered inside the campus to blink in surprise.



The surrounding students sent Emily puzzled or curious gaze, however Emily didn't notice at all seeing how immersed she was inside her mind. But her who was like that suddenly returned to her senses due to the melody that abruptly echoed from her small feminine pouch.



Emily who stopped still without even getting bothered to her shaking side tail searched for her pouch a little flustered and took out the smartphone that was her aim.



「Ye, yes, this is Emily. Is this, teacher?」



『Aa, it's me Emily. Where are you now? Are you still in your place? Have you seen the news this morning?』



Teacher――Professor Reginald Down who was normally giving off atmosphere of a good natured old man in contrast with his age that was at his fifty, was now asking question rapidly with voice that was a mix of impatience and bewilderment that was similar with Emily until just now.



Professor Down was a professor in this Percival University, and the person in charge of the laboratory Emily belonged to. He had a habitual "professor" appearance with short black hair that had white hair mixed among it, a body that was slightly widening to the side, thick glasses, and tobacco pipe. In fact, if someone merely spoke "professor" in this Percival University, most students would be reminded of Professor Down.



His appearance that was "really" like professor was also the cause, but more than that it was because he was someone that was very excellent as an educator. It wasn't like Professor Down himself had great achievement, but many of his pupils were first class researcher who made great contribution to society, and everyone of them spoke unanimously. That "Professor Reginald Down is exactly their teacher they were indebted with".



Even though he didn't leave behind particular result in scientific society, seeing from his professor status, the fact that he was given a laboratory, how all other professors would take off their hat to him at the university's faculty meeting, it was clear just how high his ability as an educator.



「No, I will arrive soon at the lab. What about teacher?」



『I too will be at the lab soon. From your voice, it seems you have seen the news then.』



「Yes, I saw it together with Hendricks-senpai and Lizzie-senpai. Both of them are contacting all the other senpai. I left the home ahead of them.」



『I see……. Then, everyone will come to the lab won't they?』



「Yes, after meeting Rod-senpai and others, Hendricks-senpai and the rest will also head toward the lab right away.」



『Got it. Then, let's talk in detail at the lab. ……Emily, sorry. Surely you are really anxious right now. Although I had conference, but I'm sorry that I didn't return home yesterday.』



Professor Down's caring words that seemed like it came right from his heart almost caused Emily's gaze to burst into tear for a moment.



Emily's home was really far from this university. In order to make her dream came true, she departed away from her parents, alone in the age of eleven years old, and then she entered dormitory at the same time with her enrollment to the university.



At first, Emily who received inquisitive gaze, thoughtless whisper, jealousy, and treated like a tumor, she put up bluff and obstinacy「I came here to study! I'm-, totally fine-」, but such bluff of a little girl who felt loneliness from being distanced from family, and her heart exhausted from solitude every day of just coming and going between university and dormitory, it couldn't be sustained for long.



Because she had intellect that towered above the rest, to a certain degree she was used to excessive expectation and special treatment from the surrounding. So that her heart wouldn't be warped due to such environment, both her parents education policy that endeavored so Emily could live a life that wasn't any different from normal children, and then their deep love raised Emily to have the same sensitivity with normal girl.



Because of that, Emily's heart that was only being supported by the letter from her parents that would surely reach her once a week with not only writing, but also with pocket money……was close to the limit.



Such scream of a young heart, suddenly stopped in a certain day.



――If you like, how about doing homestay in my house?



The one who called at her with that offer was Professor Down. As someone who had the reputation as Percival University's greatest educator, he had a relatively large residence located in a quiet residential area as his house. Professor Down whose wife died early due to sickness with no child of his own often explained with a wry smile that it was lonely to live in a spacious house with himself alone, so he offered homestay to students with circumstances and really had no financial surplus.



It just happened that there was a vacant room, and at the time a young researcher in the making who attended his lecture looked like she was going to be crushed anytime, Professor Down who couldn't bear to see that spoke such offer and held out his hand toward Emily.



There were a lot of elder brother and sisters at the house. Rather than calling it a homestay, they were mostly like a family. They ate meal together, they studied together, and they made memory as university student together.



Those words of Professor Down was an irreplaceable treasure for Emily.



『Emily? What's the matter? Are you okay?』



「……I'm fine teacher. Thanks you very much.」



Four years since her homestay began. As always, even now in this situation he racked his brain for her sake as though she was his own daughter. For Emily, he was like one more father. To the degree that her real father Carl Grant was plainly feeling vexed「My father role is stolen-」.



She felt her heart that was disarrayed by the shocking news that she saw this morning with Hendricks and Lizzie, was slowly calming down.



A large facility located inside Percival University――Research facility building C. Inside one of the room there, an oppressive atmosphere was hanging in the air.



The people here, was the person in charge of this laboratory, Professor Down and Emily, and then the students of Professor Down who like Emily were having homestay at Professor Down's house――Hendricks Wesk and Lizzie Ashton. In addition, there were Rod Hurst and Dennis Litton who were also Professor Down's students.



「Tha, that's just coincidence right? Right? Isn't that so?」



Rod who was handsome but had frivolous air was speaking wishful thinking with unusually stiff expression.



He who was a self-styled feminist had a personality just how his appearance suggested, someone who couldn't help to call out if he saw girl, but at the same time he was also the mood-maker of the class, in a serious mood like this he would be the first one who cracked jokes to melt the atmosphere.



But, even someone like him, when he saw the PC monitor displaying the news of this morning that was picked from internet, as expected even his usual talkativeness was lacking in luster.



「The "cause" that caused this phenomenon, do you think there are that many of them? Furthermore in this kind of timing?」



Dennis tilted up his glasses with his middle finger while rebutting without even hiding his bitter expression. His hair was cut short, his shirt was buttoned properly until his neck, and then his glasses. He who was the most serious in Down's classroom just like his appearance often quarreled tit for tat with Rod, but his rebuttal this times was obviously different with his usual war opening signal.



Because Rod understood it, he too closed his mouth with the same expression like Dennis.



「Rapid muscle swelling, abnormal recovery power, behavior without reasoning in it……I don't know any sickness or medicine that give those kind of symptoms. Except "that"……」



Hendricks stiff words caused Emily at the side to twitch and tremble. Hendricks was a senior who had homestay at Down house since before Emily came, an existence that was already like real big brother for Emily who supported her both at home and also at university.



Hendricks himself also didn't understand at first how to approach a young genius girl and only looked at her from afar, but with the homestay as the impetus, he knew that other than her intellect Emily was a girl with really normal emotion, and since then he took care of her like she was his real little sister.



It was a common knowledge between the members of Down classroom and close friends that when Emily simply spoke "senpai" then she was referring to Hendricks.



The words that came from the senior that Emily trusted and loved dearly from her heart caused Emily, the creator of "that" to shake like a kitten. Hendricks immediately noticed that patted Emily's head with gentle motion while saying「Sorry Emily. I didn't mean to blame you.」.



「Hendricks. Pay attention to what you say. After all my little sister is delicate.」



「No, Lizzie. It's not like she is your little si――」



「Shut up! Or rather, you patted her too much already! Come on, Emily, come to big sis here?」



Emily who was obediently receiving the pat of Hendricks was stolen in a flash by Lizzie who hugged her into her breast. She then said「It will be okay you know~, big sis is with you after all~」while consoling her like a little child with 'good girl, good girl'.



As expected, that treatment was embarrassing for a girl who had turned sixteen, that Emily forgot the serious atmosphere and ran away from Lizzie's breast saying「Wait, Lizzie-nee! I told you to stop treating me like a child! It's embarrassing!」.



Lizzie who had long red hair that was tied with scrunchie, dangled from her shoulder to the front loosely, although her attitude was strict, but actually she was an extremely helpful woman with deep emotion. She was in the same year with Hendricks and homestay at Down house from the same period, the truth was she had feeling of love toward Hendricks.



At first with how Hendricks was taking care of Emily, Lizzie's relationship with Emily was strained, but Emily's figure that was chasing her dream with her all gradually moved Lizzie and now she was completely Emily's big sis.



Emily too, she knew about Lizzie's love, so sometimes she teasingly said「You should just marry him already」and so on, but each time Emily teased like that, Lizzie's face would blush bright red and she would be fidgeting, that appearance was that of a lovely woman that even Emily who was the same gender would feel something.



Currently the scrunchie that had also become Emily's trademark just like her lab coat, although she had never said it to anyone but it was something that she imitated from her prayer of wanting to become a kind and lovely woman just like Lizzie. However, it was somewhat embarrassing to imitate exactly the same appearance so Emily didn't dangle her hair to the front from her shoulder but making it into side tail instead.



Inside the room the mood softened slightly from the dialogue of the two sisters. Professor Down who smiled slightly to that made a small cough. Just with that Emily and others immediately focused their attention to him. Even though they had harmonious relationship, but they wouldn't make light of the words of Professor Down that they respected. His cough was the signal for them to switch their relaxing mind.



「Just as Hendricks said, there is only one phenomenon that can turn a human into this. I won't say that there is nothing else that can do this, but even so, this kind of radical transformation――is impossible. In all probability, this is【H3-α4】.」



Professor Down declared that while his gaze turn at the monitor once more. There, the figure of a man with big build covered in armor of muscle was projected, the man was rampaging like a beast without reasoning.



That man didn't even show any reaction at the voice of the police telling him to stop, far from that he slammed his body toward the nearby street lamp and unbelievably broke it, then he swung around the broken street lamp with one hand and turned the two police cars surrounding him into scrap.



That violence made the polices started shooting all at once, but the man roared, and without even paying attention at the bullets gouging his body, he charge toward the police with unbelievable speed and routed them. The struck police was thrown to the air like a joke with parabolic trajectory. That sight was just like a scene in B-movie.



The person who filmed the video was a passerby who was at that place by chance, the video seemed to be taken using smartphone, because the person ran away as fast as his legs could carry him after the police was sent flying, the video was greatly blurry. Before long, the video taker who had taken enough distance was frequently saying「Oh my god-」while directing his smartphone's camera toward the scene once more.



Scream and angry roar were raised from everywhere, the polices were desperately fighting back which was proven by the resounding sound of gunshots, and amidst all that, that time came before long.



Suddenly the rampaging man stood still, right after that it fell on his knees as though it was a machine that had ran out of electricity. And then, at that place which was in uproar, a faint sound of anguish could be hear coming from the large man, it was a sound as though his neck was being strangled.



Right after that, a transformation appeared in the large man. His muscle that could be mistaken as armor was visibly starting to shrink. No, perhaps it would be more appropriate to express the phenomenon as "withering" instead. In the middle of being observed by the dumbfounded people at the surrounding, the large man covered his face with both his hands and moaned in anguish, his body withered until the size of a normal adult male, and then his hands parted from his face while his body was convulsing in small shivers.



The face of the man that became visible from there was completely different from the brutal face without reasoning that he showed until now, it was the face of a young man that looked ordinary which could be found anywhere, no, rather kindness could even be seen from that face. That young man made an expression that almost burst into tear for a moment――at the next moment, he raised an anguished voice once more while he collapsed down with both his hands covering his face.



The body of the collapsed young man withered in the blink of eye, it lost moisture, deep wrinkles were carved onto his skin, skin and bone that lost the flesh were starting to stand out, like that, the young man didn't move anymore.



The polices looked and nodded at each other, and then they carefully approached the young man. And then, when they didn't receive any response even when they called to him, to make sure a police used his foot to move the hand of the young man who was still stiffened, and then the polices screamed and backed away.



That couldn't be helped. The face of the young man that they caught a glimpse of just now, it was completely desiccated like a mummy, reduced into a tragic state.



The news announcer was speaking about this abnormal incident with a grave expression, speculating whether the cause was a new virus, or else a drug.



「But, but teacher. How can that went outside……. In the first place the only one who know about that's existence are only us……even though the data and the deposited part are scattered and managed strictly yet」



Emily's doubt came out with a voice that sounded strangled. Hearing that, the truth that the members of the laboratory tried to not think about reared its head.



――【H3-α4】



That was the name of the byproduct medicine that was created by accident from Emily's research.



Emily's research was to create a specific medicine for Alzheimer's disease. That disease was the cause that was changing Emily's kind and gentle, beloved grandmother little by little, she was the reason that Emily was determined to enroll into a university in the age of eleven years old, it was a problem in the territory that a lot of researchers hadn't reached yet, and it was also the life work of Emily.



That research which obtained the cooperation of Professor Down and Hendricks and co who were research student was something that put its linchpin on the point that was the regeneration of destroyed neuron. It was also a path that a lot of researchers in the past had tried their hand on it.



What was born from that research process was【H3-α4】. If it was used, muscle would break down and regenerate repeatedly and swelled up in the blink of eye, every kind of external injury would instantly recover due to the cells' super activity.



Of course it had demerit. As the compensation for the drastic muscle strengthening, the user would lose their reasoning and life. If someone was injected with small dose, then they might hold out for around a week until ten days, but in the case someone was injected until it was just barely the limit before the cells were self-destructing from being unable to endure too drastic stimulation, they would die in less than an hour in exchange of obtaining regeneration power that couldn't be compared to the former case.



At first Emily and co thought that they might be able to possibly cut open a path of creating a wonder drug after witnessing the dramatic result of this【H3-α4】, but after seeing the lab rats transforming brutally without being able to stop the too drastic stimulation and the breaking down of the reasoning, they thoroughly hid this drug as something that was too dangerous.



They dispersed the data, disguised even the chemicals used, deposited each data at different places, and put them under strict control.



Therefore, it should be impossible for the medicine to be stolen. Because In the first place the people who knew about the existence of【H3-α4】were only the members of Down laboratory. They were all in this place right now, except several people who couldn't assemble here because they couldn't immediately come.



「……Hey, what about Jessica, Sam, and Milo? Even those guys should know about the news right? Why aren't they coming? By any chance, those guys――」



「Stop that Rod. We cannot doubt our friend in this kind of time.」



Rod was about to say "that possibility" that everyone was intentionally avoiding, but Professor Down stopped him. Everyone was looking at Professor Down with anxious expression.



「There is many other possibilities. We are "Down Laboratory" aren't we? Emily's genius is resounding not just in this university but even throughout the scientific society, it is a well-known fact that all of my prided students are really excellent. It's possible that perhaps someone who came here to steal something else accidently realized the existence of【H3-α4】and stole it. A researcher cannot ignore any possibility no matter what situation they are in.」



The words of Professor Down caused Rod to scratch his face awkwardly. When Dennis spoke sarcastically to Rod, he lashed back saying「What did you say」. However their exchange was done with their usual atmosphere without any sign of paranoia against each other.



「Then……teacher. We, what should do from here on……. As expected, is it better if we go to police?」



Hendricks asked for advice from Professor Down to go back to the topic. Professor Down crossed his arms and groaned「Hmm」while pondering for a while, then before long he suddenly lifted up his face.



「This is my suggestion but, for the time being, I think we should keep this matter a secret.」



「We aren't going to talk to police?」



「Yes. No, sooner or later we will have to talk no matter what. However, I believe that right now what we should prioritize is to make the antidote for【H3-α4】even for a second faster. Surely it would take much time if there is investigation about that kind of uncommon drug. It would be a waste of time.」



「Bu, but, teacher. 【H3-α4】is……」



「I guess. Indeed, we haven't finds the way to stop the stimulation……. However, there are still several approaches that we haven't tested yet. We have talked about destroying the research data and also the materials, but it won't be too late to do that even after we tested those approaches. This research has leaked outside already, there is no guarantee that the second or third victim won't appear. At that time, the scope of the damage will change depending on whether there is antidote or not.」



Hearing Professor Down's suggestion made Emily to desperately restrain her impulse that wished to destroy the research data and product as fast as possible. Hendricks and others were also nodding「Certainly even if we do that after trying out those approaches……」



「Emily. I understand really well your feeling that want to make it gone from this world quickly. I also feel the same. But, the responsibility of creating that lie in us. Then, before we succumb to our terror and erase everything, we should do what we can. Am I wrong?」



「……Teacher. Yes, no, you aren't wrong. I think that the possibility is almost none……but, if we are just trying it……」



Seeing Emily's pained expression, Professor Down's expression also distorted slightly, then she caressed Emily's head with his usual gentleness.



In the end, they decided that their policy from now on was to try the approaches for making antidote of the leaked out【H3-α4】, keeping the whole matter secret from the outside, and also forbidding the members of Down Laboratory that weren't here from speaking. With that decided, each members of Down laboratory began to move to do what they could.



Part 3



「And? I want to ask about the detailed story soon though. Can I ask you to talk?」



Two days later after they day where the members of Down laboratory decided to keep quiet about the drug and continued their research, currently there were two suited men in front of Emily and others. Both of them were police that came here to investigate about『Berserk case』――the case that was caused by the person who consumed【H3-α4】was called like that by the news――that happened two days ago.



If it was asked how the police was able to arrive where Emily and others after only two days, then that must be because someone had squealed to the police. For Emily and others this was a sudden visit that was completely unexpected. Just what was the meaning of that decision that even made them felt guilty feeling if it turned out like this……



Emily sent her gaze toward Professor Down looking for help. Professor Down was crossing his arms while making a complicated expression, but then,



「Well, we can also get a warrant and then search the place whether there is really such drug here or not you know? In case we find the drug, well, I think nine out of ten we'll find it though, but as it is perhaps the professor and others here will be arrested as mad scientist that dragged unrelated people into their experiment for the sake of their own research.」



「Give me a break! There is no way we will do something like that!」



Emily finally snapped hearing the words of the police officer and yelled. The eyes of the middle-aged police officer instantly shined fiercely.



「In other words, you are admitting that the drug itself exist?」



「-, tha, that's……」



Emily immediately turned flustered from that. Professor Down who was beside her shook his head seeing that, and feeling that it couldn't be helped he told the police about the existence of【H3-α4】. He also told about how it was stolen and that they didn't contact the police because they were hurrying to make its antidote.



「……Whether that story is the truth or not, well, how about we listen the detail at the police station to make the judgment?」



「We didn't report this because we thought that it would be like that. Detective, I beg you even knowing that it's unreasonable. Can you wait just a week more? At least until the approach we are trying out right now is showing preliminary result. It's possible that perhaps we will be able to make antidote.」



「Please don't say something so unreasonable professor. No matter how high your position or how prestigious of a teacher you are, you are still the most important witness of a case with a lot of casualties you know? As you can see we are not even calling you a suspect here, we are even giving you an option whether you will come with us or not, I hope you can guess just how much consideration we have given you already.」



「That's……」



Professor Down's expression looked like he was chewing up a hundred bitter bugs all at once. Seeing Professor Down like that, for some reason the middle-aged police officer made a faint smile on his lips. And then, that gaze moved toward professor Down's side, at Emily who looked anxious with her gaze wandering around. And then he said it was fine if it was here, but he wanted to speak with just Emily alone.



When Professor Down suspiciously asked why, the middle aged police officer answered that he wanted to hear the story of the girl who was the linchpin of the drug development in a place without her guardian.



「I……what harm there will be even if she is with her guardian?」



「Let me ask you the opposite, what harm there will be even if professor is not with her?」



After getting told that, the side of Professor Down who claimed that they only got the drug stolen from them couldn't even refuse. When Emily also bravely said「It's fine teacher」, Professor Down could only acquiesce even if he was worried.



Emily and the two polices faced each other inside the room Professor Down had exited from.



「Now then, I find it a little hard to believe but, is it true that you young lady is the developer of that monster transforming drug?」



Right after the professor was gone, the attitude until now that more of less paid attention to decorum completely vanished, the middle-aged police officer suddenly took out a shabby cigarette while asking. His appearance of his swept back hair, loose necktie, and kinked suit really made other people felt unpleasant. The man that seemed to be his partner looking a bit younger sitting quietly at the side while taking memo was also sending an appraising gaze at Emily.



Emily was feeling somewhat scared at the two men who suddenly changed their atmosphere, even so she somehow feigned calmness using the bluff she had learned whether she wanted it or not when she first enrolled into the university.



「That's, right. I, developed it. Or rather, perhaps I should say, that it was by accident, that drug got created.」



「H~mm. How shocking. See here, isn't it completely like in movie? For a drug that can make human into that kind of monster to really exist, I have been a detective for a long time, but I've never heard of anything like that.」



「……Just, what do you want to say?」



The middle-aged police officer that was making a broad grin for some reason was causing Emily's discomfort index to rapidly climb up. Perhaps it was because the police officer was having fun reading inside the heart of such Emily, that in the next moment he said something unbelievable.



「The data of that drug, how about you hand it over to us, all of it.」



「Ha?」



Emily's pupil turned into dot, wondering just what this person was saying. Seeing such Emily, the middle-aged police officer whispered「Even though you are called a genius or something but you are really slow huh」as though he found it troublesome while continuing on.



「Surely there will be a lot of people interested in that kind of abnormally lovely drug. It will be good money. That's why, I'm telling you to hand over all the data.」



「Wha-, what are you saying!? You, you are police right!? Do you know what you are saying!?」



「What a noisy missy that can only go 'gyaa gyaa' huh. When you have become a police officer as long as me, you will meet a lot of delicious story by chance. Missy, do you know how much a policeman's salary is? It's laughable y'know? That's why I'll bet my life for something that will make that much money. You've got to treasure connection with money that you meet by chance. Just this much side benefit is forgivable isn't it?」



There was no way that was forgivable. She didn't know how much the salary of a policeman was, but even so there was no way they who were burdened with the mission to safeguard the people and apprehended the criminal would be all the same like the men before her eyes. These guys were the so called dirty cop or immoral cop! Like that, Emily realized their true nature from her knowledge of drama movie.



「There is no way that's forgivable. I, I'll tell, this matter to other police! I absolutely won't hand over the data! Just go away right now!」



Seeing Emily who stood up right away with the corner of her eyes raised like a threatening cat, the middle-aged police officer shrugged as though he was facing a child that couldn't be reasoned with.



「Then, the professor and the other research students, I wonder, perhaps all of them should take on the sin as killer.」



「Eh……」



「I said it before right? I hope you can guess just how much consideration we have given you already, remember?」



「-, yo, you coward-」



Emily yelled angrily when she heard the middle-aged police officer implicitly threatening that if she didn't want Professor Down and Hendricks and the other to be arrested with a false charge then……. There was even an emotion of hatred welling up inside her toward the scoundrels who were putting on the skin of police officer taking hostage of her important people that were like family for her.



The middle-aged police officer shrugged without even caring of Emily's reaction and stood up with the talk ended.



「Decided it quickly okay? Will it be your important family, or else the drug, yeah?」



「……」



Leaving behind Emily who couldn't say anything, the police officers exited the room. In exchange, Professor Down and Hendricks and others entered inside with worried expression.



Professor Down noticed Emily's unusual state and asked her if something happened. Like that, he showed a shocked expression at the answer that Emily gave him.



「What the hell, just what the hell with that! They are police aren't they! Why the hell they had to threaten us! I don't get it!」



「Calm down Rod.」



「You think I can calm down like this! Dennis-, aren't you irritated huh!?」



「Obviously I am you idiot Rod. But, what are we going to do if we don't calm down. Even though our important little sister was threatened, but if we are all shaken up like that then that will be just what they want.」



「-, that's, you are, right, but……」



Rod whose fist was shaking from frustration, and Dennis who was desperately suppressing the rage in his heart even while sighing.



The unbelievable situation with this threat from the police also visibly shaken up Hendricks and others. Amidst that situation, Professor Down who was wracking his brain with his eyes closed opened his mouth.



「There is also the option to report this to other police but……right now we don't know how many comrade they have, so I cannot say that it's a good option. In the worst case, there is also the possibility that they will arrest just us and take Emily away. Right now, we cannot possibly leave Emily alone.」



「That's, right. But, then, what to do……they will soon come back to hear our reply you know?」



Hendricks asked Professor down with tormented feeling. But perhaps it was as expected from an adult with wisdom of age, the professor seemed to have the answer.



「Let's contact the national security bureau. Now that the case this time has been exposed until this far, then it's not the level where we can keep hiding it or anything. Given how dangerous【H3-α4】is, there is high possibility we can make the security bureau move.」



「I see……. Their system is different with police. If we receive protection from security bureau, then police won't be able to meddle.」



Hendricks nodded in understanding. Lizzie and Dennis and others were also nodding to each other, thinking that there was no other way than that. However, only Emily was still looking down with a complicated expression.



「Emily, it's fine. No matter what happened, I, we will absolutely do something about it.」



「Lizzie-nee……yes, thank you.」



Hearing the words of Lizzie who hugged her to give her assurance, Emily buried her face to Lizzie's chest while returning words of gratitude.



However, the anxiety whirling inside Emily's chest, rather than lessening from her trusted big sister's words, it seemed that it was getting thicker instead. She couldn't help but felt something, like a great bad premonition coiling around her heart, as though something fatal was approaching with loud footsteps.



Emily was staring at the back of Professor Down who was going to contact the security bureau without knowing yet that this creeping ominous feeling would become reality.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



About the drug’s name, I wanted to check up a bit more and write it properly with a name that sounded likely, but……



It was impossible. There ain’t any time. Seriously. The update for next week is also in a dangerous state.



And so, well, this is spin-off, please pardon the flighty explanation.



PS



At Overlap-sama’s homepage, the first part of the comic’s first chapter was updated.



Really dangerous. Kaori and Shizuku are just too cute.



For those who hasn’t seen it, please take a look without fail.



PS 2



Thank you very much for a lot of ‘don’t mind’ comments.



Thanks to that, I was able to update somehow.



The mysterious sense of unity that the honored readers of Narou showed sometimes, Hakumai loves it.



The next update will be at 6 P.M Saturday if possible, desu.





Chapter 203




That day, an investigator of security bureau's dangerous drug countermeasure section Vanessa Paradis was in bad mood. Usually she was someone with limited expression, but right now anyone who looked at her walking in the bureau corridor would immediately understand that her expression was sullen.



「You look really in a bad mood huh, Paradis.」



When Vanessa taken off her gaze toward the voice that suddenly addressed her, she saw a man with goatee around his early forty clad in sharp atmosphere there.



「Hughes-san. No, not really, I'm not in a bad mood……」



「Don't lie. You carried secret investigation for half year, and just when it will be time soon, you got taken off the team. It can't be helped even if you get bad mood. If it's me then there is no doubt I'll be in bad mood.」



「That's……it's」



Vanessa stuttered, feeling lost of what she should say and her gaze wandered.



Davy Hughes. He was a senior investigator in the same security bureau's dangerous drug countermeasure section with Vanessa, a veteran senior who would soon reach his twentieth year in this career. He was also an eccentric that was fixated with his current post to the degree that he refused down the chair of section head regardless of his numerous achievements.



「Well, the one pulling you out was me though.」



「……」



Hearing Hughes exposing his own deed without looking the slightest bit sorry caused Vanessa to be truly wordless this time. She was also staring fixedly at him on the same time.



Hughes made a wry smile at Vanessa who was at such state. He urged Vanessa to continue her walk toward the bureau chief office that was her destination before he started his explanation while walking at her side.



「Don't glare at me like that. My team is in need of you really much right now. I got squad leader Ahmed to reassign you to me while enduring storm of sarcasm from him just so you know.」



「……If I remember correctly, Hughes-san became the leader of 【Berserk Case】investigation team right? Not even two days should have passed since the team's formation……but, is there some development already?」



「Yeah. The situation is confusing in various aspects. From the beginning this case is something unrealistic, so it also can be said that it cannot be helped. There was a report right from the origin cause themselves. It's likely that they will use the protection program but……the protection target is a girl that is still 16 years old.」



「I see. So an agent of the same gender is necessary then.」



「Right. I'll let the chief tell you the detail. I'm also going there now. I'm sorry that I'm asking unreasonable things from you, but there is no female agent stronger than Paradis for protection duty, I'm relying on you.」



「If Hughes-san is evaluating me that high, then I'll also won't throw tantrum. Please take care of me.」



Hughes chuckled from Vanessa's words while replying「Take care of me too」. Regardless of how veteran he was, but he wasn't putting on air against Vanessa who still hadn't graduated from newbie territory, perhaps this too was one of the reasons he was able to leave behind his numerous accomplishments. For a senior investigator leading a team, it was important how one treated their subordinate.



Vanessa's mood that was falling to the bottom took a sudden climb with *gyuin!* sound from hearing the words that were highly evaluating her said by a respected veteran investigator. Unexpectedly this Vanessa was easy to handle.



Although Vanessa's expression didn't change at all from receiving the sharp glint of the gaze of national security bureau chief, Sharon Magdanese, but inside her heart she was tasting a nervousness as though she was made to do a tightrope walking,



Chief Magdanese was a woman with age that looked like she was in her sixty, but she had been entrusted with the seat of national security bureau chief far before Vanessa even entered the bureau. Her pressure and dominating aura that pushed those who faced her into crucible of nervousness didn't seem to weaken throughout her age but even more polished instead.



「Agent Paradis, those are the current state of【Berserk Case】. You understand don't you?」



「Yes.」



It wasn't "Do you understand?" but it was as though she was saying "You understand don't you? Don't you? I won't let you say you don't", Vanessa responded back「Yes」while thinking that if she gave any other reply than that then she might get fired.



Hearing her reply, Chief Magdanese nodded with a single word「Good」really naturally, then her gaze moved to Hughes.



「Senior Agent Hughes.」



「Ma'am.」



「I will recognize the application of the protection program for Emily Grant and her relatives, as well as the people connected with the development of【H3-α4】headed by Professor Reginald Down. However, make Emily Grant as the prioritized protection target. You get it don't you?」



「Roger. Are we going to head there right away? If possible, I want to have a briefing session beforehand with my team first.」



「……I don't mind. It will be conspicuous if several agents of security bureau visited while the sun is still high. Do it late at night. I'll let you know later about the time. If Kimberly is among the current bodyguards then I don't think there will be any problem, but just in case, place some of our men among the university's security and janitor.」



「Understood.」



There was no worry of any complication with Hughes's responsive reply. While Vanessa was staying quiet, Chief Magdanese and Hughes did two, three more exchanges, and in the end Chief Magdanese asked「Is there any question?」.



Vanessa who noticed that the gaze was directed to her gave a nod.



「Chief, in the case that we encountered someone that took that【H3-α4】and become the alias【Berserk】, what will be the method to deal with it and the order of priority?」



「Silence the target. I won't question the method.」



It was an immediate answer. Vanessa who asked the question spontaneously lost for word. The chief telling her to silence the target without questioning her method meant that "it was okay to kill".



「……Is there any method to save the people that is affected by the drug――」



「Agent Paradis.」



「-, Yes.」



「According to Doctor Emily Grant, currently there is no medicine that can return people who turned Berserk back to normal. It's not like I don't understand your feeling that want to apprehend this drug's victim with the hope that someday a cure will be developed. However, that is the role of enforcement section, at the very least that's not your job. I won't let you say that you don't understand you know?」



「Of course, chief. My apologies.」



Vanessa lightly lowered her head while feeling Hughes smiling wryly at her side before she asked one more question.



「Just now, there was the explanation that the culprit that leaked out the drug's data is unclear, but how much the progress of the analysis about that currently?」



「Let's see. Analyst Parker, explain.」



「Yes, chief.」



In respond to Vanessa's question, Chief Magdanese addressed the man standing by beside her who looked like was still in his twenty. The slender young man was wearing glass and looked timid, and for some reason his eyebrows were constantly forming figure '' looking troubled, which further strengthened his timid impression.



Analyst Allen Parker who became the chief's direct subordinate after his excellence was highly evaluated around three years ago, operated the note PC on his hand while starting to explain.



「To inform you first, currently we still haven't obtain information to the degree that we can analyze. After all, it is only two day since the【Berserk Case】, and the notification from the university only came several hours ago so……. Currently rather than an analysis, please think of it as conjecture instead.」



Allen confirmed that Vanessa and Hughes had nodded and projected the content of the note PC he operated into a large display. There, the profiles of Emily, Professor Down, Hendricks and others that were obtained from who know where complete with their photo were projected.



From there, there was brief explanation of the background of Emily and others, and it was reported there that【H3-α4】――nicknamed【Berserk】(it was named so from the media's naming of the previous incident as【Berserk Case】) was kept secret until the incident.



「Based on the present situation, it appeared that the highest possibility is that someone among Down laboratory leaked out the data. The motive is unknown. Grudge, craving for fame, destructive wish, stress venting, or possibly……playfulness, perhaps?」



Allen said something like that while winking, perhaps with joking intention. Vanessa's intensely chilly gaze pierced into him. From behind the tundra gaze of Chief Magdanese stabbed him. It was only Hughes who sent Allen a praising face that said「You, are you a hero」as though he had changed his evaluation to Allen.



「Hn, hn, cough-. E, ee, next possibility, is the case where outside people, or perhaps an organization was involved with this. Those with the high possibility to be able to know about the existence of【Berserk】even if just a fragment of it, we included them and the people related to them――for example, friend, family, the staff of the laboratory, the shop they went to, scientific society, part-time workplace, et cetera~――into the list. And then we eliminated the unlikely possibility by investigation, next we added various conditions, like who wouldn't be able to bring out the data without anyone knowing and produced the rough list of the suspects like this.」



The data on the display was switched with roughly ten enterprises, people, organizations, and so on. Each suspect's display was also accompanied with their respective possible motive and also the conjecture of the method of stealing.



Vanessa came to a comprehension. Certainly this person was in the level that was worthy to be working directly at the side of Chief Magdanese. The person himself said things like「It's not in the level of analysis」or「There is too little time」, but the average analyst would surely be unable to form a logical conjecture to this degree.



「……I see. Thank you very much for the easy to understand explanation, analyst Parker.」



「Ahaha. I said it before that this isn't in the level of analysis or anything. Please don't have something like strange preconception okay? But, if you are giving me thanks, then please, by any means don't be so unfamiliar and call me "Allen"――」



「Hughes-san. Looking from this, even if the protection program is applied to them, there is no way we can let them stay together isn't it?」



「……Yeah, you're right. There is enough possibility of an inside job, and it's unthinkable that the culprit is sane seeing they released Berserk in the middle of city. At the very least Doctor Grant has to be placed separately from the other. But in that case, I'm worried that the girl's mental state would be increasingly burdened. Paradis, I'm really relying on you here.」



「Please leave it to me.」



Analyst Allen's face was twitching from being ignored as though nothing happened. Hughes made a sidelong glance at him with a thought「What a guy……」, his gaze was as though he was looking at a hero as expected. Chief Magdanese was covering her eyes.



Chief Magdanese glared at Allen at the side, then she asked whether Hughes or Vanessa had other question, to which the two shook their head and she commanded them to leave. After lightly bowing their head, the two exited the office, Chief Magdanese saw them off before turning her gaze to Allen who was plainly feeling down.



「Allen.」



「Haa, just why I am having no luck with woman like this? Just what is not good from me? I think my face isn't that bad, and I'm always paying attention to being humorous and friendly, yet――chief, is it okay for me to focus myself in analyzing the method to be a bit popular among women?」



「……It's fine. You don't even need to come anymore tomorrow.」



「Eh!? Why is the talk suddenly about firing me!?」



As I thought, perhaps I'm mistaken with the personnel selection――Chief Magdanese was recalling the thought that she had been thinking about all this time since three years ago while restraining her feeling that was wanting to fill Allen who was vehemently objecting「No way……chief. If you take even my paying job from me, then how will I become popular!?」with lead bullet. She then gave her command.



「Stop joking around with that much. You get it don't you?」



「No, I'm not joking here……no, nothing at all. I totally understood.」



A heavy atmosphere was hanging in the air inside a room of Percival University's research building. Emily was looking down with pale face while her eyes were shaking, Professor Down was holding the girl's hand tightly in kind consideration, at their opposite side was Lizzie who was patting Emily's head.



In this place right now, other than Hendricks, Dennis, and Rod, there were also the remaining members of Down Laboratory whose name were Hessica Cubit, Sam Redman, and Milo Yenny.



Jessica was a female student with relatively light attitude who recently poured her energy into fashion rather than research, but her normally light atmosphere now quietened down and her expression looked grim.



Even Sam who was often told「You are absolutely more suited to be a martial artist rather than researcher」by Dennis and Rod with his muscular body that was taller than 190 cm, and also Milo who was a black person and came from America as transfer student, normally they were youth with bright atmosphere, but now their expression was turning grave.



Inside that heavy air that was catching them into quagmire, a light voice that couldn't read the mood or perhaps it dared to ignore it entirely instead was resounding.



「Well, that's how it is. Missy, you just focus yourself in the research for the antidote alone without worrying about anything. You can look forward for a flawless facility and security there.」



The owner of the voice was an investigator of national security bureau's dangerous drugs countermeasure section――Kimberly Warren.



At the afternoon, he and Hughes came here after receiving the report from Professor Down and questioned everyone about the situation. After that Kimberly remained here in order to guard Emily and others while Hughes finished his report and preparation to lead a team back here.



And then, while Kimberly made arrangements with the dispatched undercover agents and waited for the decision of the concrete planning from here on, finally a communication came from Hughes just now.



According to the communication, the adoption of the protection program was recognized and the team would wait for late night before coming to pick them up. Regarding the protection program, in consideration of the possibility that there was someone among Down classroom aiming for Emily's research, Emily would be protected at another place that had an environment that could be used for research, where she would be asked to endeavor at researching the antidote there. The communication also mentioned that until the antidote was completed, don't mention the members of Down classroom, even her parents wouldn't be able to meet her.



「Agent Warren. Is it possible for even just one person, whether it's me or someone among the students to accompany Emily?」



Professor Down argued vehemently at Kimberly who looked like he wasn't mindful at all about Emily's state. However, Kimberly was making an expression as though he was facing an unreasonable kid while saying「Haa?」and curtly rejected the request.



「I'm troubled here if you are saying stupid question like that, professor. In this situation where the culprit is unclear, even all of you are included among the suspects, you should understand that right? There is no way the missy――the doctor can be left together with you.」



「Then, at least, her parents can――」



「Please spare me from your begging. This is the decision from above, it's not something I can do anything about.」



Kimberly scowled feeling that it was really troublesome and looked away while cutting off Professor Down's words.



「Why-. Emily's parents is not related with this! Then――」



「Teacher, it's okay. I'll be okay! I'll finish right away if it's just making something like the antidote!」



Emily stopped Professor Down who stood up with a menacing face looking as though he would grip Kimberly's collar. Emily puffed up her chest while chuckling「Fufufu」to show that she was okay just like she said, but looking from the viewpoint of Down classroom's members who had accompanied her like family until now, it was obvious that she was forcing herself.



The lonely time when Emily first enrolled into university became a little trauma for her. That little girl in an environment where not only she didn't have any acquaintance, on the contrary everyone around her were all far older than her, caused her to be cornered.



That was why, if she was told that in this kind of urgent situation she would be separated not only from her father substitute and her older siblings substitute, but she would also be unable to contact her parents, then even if she understood that it was only for a limited time until she managed to make the antidote, she couldn't help but feel the great tightening in her heart.



「Well, no matter how much you protest here, the decision stands. Just resign yourself and make the antidote right away. You are genius right? Then you will be able to meet them again before long.」



「Someone like you is……the person with you before, Hughes-san wasn't it? Don't you think you should learn a bit from your superior?」



Professor Down shook his head while sighing hearing the careless remark of Kimberly who irresponsibly made light of Emily's brave bluffing. Kimberly grinned broadly in amusement to that and only shrugged at the fierce glare of the professor.



However, as expected when he was glared not just by Professor Down but also by Hendricks and others, he seemed to feel uncomfortable and lifted both his hands as though he was surrendering before exiting the room right away.



「Perhaps the investigator's quality of the country's organization has been really falling these days.」



Professor Down whispered while sighing.



「But, teacher. Wasn't Hughes-san who came with that person looked like a sincere person? He said that he will also assign a female agent for me.」



「But still, Emily. Agent Warren said it right? It's "the decision from above". The one that decided so that Emily is alone is that agent Hughes. Or perhaps it's a person even more above you know?」



「That's……」



The expression of Emily who bluffed by saying「It's okay!」slightly clouded from anxiety as expected from the words of Professor Down.



Even Hendricks, Lizzie, and others were also making dark expression. Amidst them, Professor Down closed his eyes in worry before he moved his gaze to Emily with a determined expression.



「Emily. I have a really bad premonition. No matter how I think about it, it's strange that they are trying to separate you from even your parents. By any chance, perhaps the security bureau has some other objective, something more than merely protecting Emily to have you create the antidote.」



「Teacher……. But, we have already reported to them……」



Finally Emily's bluffing expression fell off and she displayed a face where anxiety was mixed with bewilderment. Professor Down spoke more words to her.



「We can just deny that. Even so, if they still try to take away Emily alone even after that, then that will proof for sure that they have no good thinking in their mind.」



Professor Down then cut off his words, he crossed his arms and closed his eyes, after falling silent for while, he opened his mouth slowly.



「…………Emily, I have an acquaintance that have a research facility.」



「Research facility?」



「Yes. He also has a high social position, and he is reliable too. He should be able to give us shelter while lending us research facility until we finished making the antidote. What do you think? Though as expected, it's impossible for everyone to go, but if it's there then it's possible for me and your parents to come along. Besides, you will also be able to contact Hendricks and others. That's why, before we are separated from each other, before you are isolated alone, won't you evacuate there for the present?」



Emily stared without moving at Professor Down who made an unexpected proposal with a serious expression. Hendricks and others were also sending shocked gaze at Professor Down.



「I know it's strange coming from me who was the one that suggested to report to the security bureau. But it seems that the government cannot be trusted at all. There is no way I can entrust Emily who is already like my important daughter to that kind of place. To say nothing of how you will be alone there……」



「Teacher……」



Emily's gaze wandered around in hesitation. She could be together with everyone――that plan rang really nicely in her ears, it was a tempting proposal for her……however, it was unthinkable for her that the security bureau would overlook them in this abnormal situation where a drug could change human into a berserker and it was urgent for its antidote to be developed, furthermore it was themselves who reported about it.



Naturally, there was a possibility that she would cause much trouble for Professor Down who said he would shelter her, and also his acquaintance that would be the one actually sheltering her. Perhaps all of their social status and prestige could be destroyed because of that.



However, Professor Down who seemed to guess that thinking of Emily grasped the trembling hand of Emily tightly, and then he sent her a gentle gaze just like when he reached out to her the first time.



「Emily, you don't need to worry needlessly. You are a first class researcher, but at the same time you are also still a sixteen years old child. It's mistaken for a good child like you to shoulder everything in this kind of emergency. That's why, it's okay for you to depend on others. No, rather I beg you as someone that is like family to you. Please, I want you to depend on me.」



Emily looked down to hide her expression. It wasn't because she was hesitating, but because if she didn't look down then her welling up emotion would become flowing drops of tear.



「Emily, let's depend on teacher's kindness here. Even we are also unable to let Emily be alone in this current situation.」



「That's right……. If it's Emily, then surely you will be able to make the antidote right away. That's why, let's agree with teacher's proposal okay?」



Starting from Hendricks and Lizzie, the other members also raised voice of agreement with Professor Down's proposal.



Everyone of them was worried for Emily without exception, they were wracking their brains to look for the best possible future for Emily.



She was really blessed. Emily was thinking that from the bottom of her heart while taking a deep breath, then she nodded while firmly looking at Professor Down.



「Great, it's decided then. Everyone, please cooperate with me. Even if we talk to agent Warren about this, he would only stop us. Then, let's ask for his approval only after it's done. I and Emily will head to my acquaintance's place ahead, so can you all distract agent Warren's attention for us?」



「Got it. This is for Emily. We will do it somehow.」



After Hendricks nodded strongly, the other members also nodded with resolve in their face.



「Hahah, who'd ever thought that a time will come where we will think about outrageous thing like outwitting the security bureau agents in active duty like this. Isn't this like in a movie?」



「Rod. Don't get too optimistic. After all you are the one with the highest possibility of making mistake here.」



「What did you say-, Dennis! Ain't you the one who is always getting cold feet at critical time and caused blunder?」



「It's the cliché that normally the guy who is spouting big words is actually the one getting cold feet. Rod, that refers to you.」



「Okay, I rea~lly get it that you are picking fight with me. Let's get outside Dennis. I'll make that glasses get sticky all over with my finger's sweat.」



「Bring it on. I'll perfectly stitch your slovenly chest so that you won't be able to expose it for the second time.」



A small giggle echoed inside the room that had its atmosphere lightened up with Dennis and Rod's usual swearing. When Dennis and Rod turned their gaze there even while their hands were still grasping each other's collar, they found the figure of Emily who leaked out that chuckle from being unable to endure the scene.



Lured by that, Hendricks, Lizzie, Jessica, Sam, Milo, and the Professor Down began to laugh.



Emily made an amazing smile while tears were gathering on the corner of her eyes. With a really lovely smile that was like blooming flower she said……



「Thank you, Dennis-oniichan, Rod-onii-chan.」



「「……」」



Dennis and Rod who were given the greatest present with the designation that was seldom used for them, they silently tidied up their clothes and made a fake cough. And then they sat back quietly with their face dyed red until their ears.



「Now then, with the return of Dennis, Rod, and Emily's smiling face, let's focus on the detail of how we will outwit the security bureau.」



Professor Down's command, as usual it instantly made the students renewed their focus. For the sake of their cute little sister's future, they talked their opinion to each other with an expression that was even more serious than usual when they were at research or lecture.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The chapter is short, on top of that it doesn’t progress, I’m sorry.



The writing time is, already……



Forgive me for keeping all of you in suspense but, one thing, it will be a bit more time until that guy crawl from the abyss, so I’m wishing that if all of you reader can possibly wait for it.



The next update will be at 6 P.M Saturday too. There will be no stopping midway next time!





Chapter 204




「Good grief, it feels like I am an actor in a B-class movie here.」



While Emily and others were in the middle of discussion, Kimberly who was leaning on the wall at the corridor while staring at his smartphone was letting out a chuckle that he couldn't keep restraining inside himself. It seemed that what he was watching in the smartphone was something that really pleased him.



Kimberly moved his fingers quickly across the display several times. Then the display displayed Kimberly's bank account. When he saw the amount of money that was displayed there, he let out his chuckle once more. Seen from the side he really looked like a dangerous character. How his expression was dyed with greed that was unthinkable coming from an agent of the security bureau also encouraged such atmosphere.



「This much just from acting a little as agent. Really, this make me feels that risking my life fighting criminals is really stupid.」



Kimberly put back his smartphone inside his pocket while saying that to himself. At the same time, he recalled his schedule from here on inside his head. ――Due to his real employer's request, it would be a schedule where he would risk his life kidnapping Emily Grant and then bet his life to pull the carpet from under security bureau.



Kimberly was making show of standing guard outside the room where Emily and others were inside while actually he was confirming his betrayal toward his comrades and his criminal act. It was at that time, *kii* the door's room made a sound and opened.



Dennis and Rod came out from inside.



「Hm? What's the matter? It will still be a while until the pick-up time you know?」



「We are thinking to make the final check of the things we are going to bring.」



「Sheesh, you guys already made that check a lot wasn't it?」



「That's just our nature. This kind of confirmation won't be enough no matter how many times you do it.」



Dennis shrugged while pushing up his glasses sharply. Kimberly nodded「Is that so……」to that before he turned his gaze to Rod at the side and asked「And you?」.



「It's this for me.」



「Smoking huh……. Well, fine. But, don't move away too far okay? After all you guys are also protection target here.」



「Yes sir―」



Rod jokingly returned a salute while lazily dangling the cigar he grasped in his fingertips. Like that, he and Dennis disappeared together further in the corridor while receiving Kimberly's gaze.



Of course, Dennis and Rod's words to Kimberly were lies. They were planning to raise commotion after this so that it would be easier for Emily and Professor Down to escape. The specific plan was to raise a commotion nearby the laboratory where【Berserk】was in safekeeping by taking other harmful chemicals before yelling「We made a mistake and it got scattered~」.



Of course, what they would scatter was harmless chemical, but if they made commotion saying that 'It would affect life if you don't take medicine right away!', the agents of security bureau that couldn't confirm the authenticity should be panicked. The other would use that opening to try escaping from the research facility.



Surely the bodyguards from security bureau would never think that the people who requested protection by themselves would actually escape by their own decision. On top of that, this research building was already like the back garden for the researchers who often spent the majority of their day inside. There was a high possibility they would be able to escape.



And, at that time the door of the room opened once more. Who came out were Sam and Jessica. Jessica was leaning coquettishly on Sam's arm, generously pressing her voluptuous body that peeked out from her clothes that had intense exposure.



「So you guys too……what's your business?」



Kimberly talked to them while still leaning on the wall.



「Ee~, you understand just by looking right~? We are going to where it will be just the two of us~. It seems like it will be difficult in various things after this~, so while we still can~」



「Ye, yeah, that's right. Si, sir, it's fine, just for a bit right?」



Jessica was leaning even more on Sam while her way of talking was stretching even longer. Sam's eyes were swimming around, but he somehow responded to Kimberly.



In reality, Jessica and Sam were just friend, they weren't lover or anything, they were just getting out of the room to be distraction like Dennis and Rod. They pretended to be lovers with the motive of trying to find an agent somewhere and trick him into something like a blackmail scene using beautiful girl.



However, for Sam it was unexpected how passionate (?) the acting of Jessica was. His unrest was fierce from her way of talking that was completely different from usual and the soft sensation that his arm was feeling.



「……Yes, yes. Do whatever you like.」



「Ye~s, we will do whatever we li~ke. Rather, I'll be made to do whatever Sam li~ke」



「……」



Jessica grinned widely while waving her hand at Kimberly who gave his permission with an exasperated expression. Sam was feeling a bit of terror from Jessica's acting while nodding wordlessly.



Like that, Jessica and Sam's figure vanished at the turn of the corridor.



Kimberly kept leaning on the wall with his arm crossed while waiting silently until the time came.



Some times after that, when Kimberly was starting to want for at least a glass of coffee, an abnormal event happened.



*Bii―, bii―, bii―, bii―!!*



A warning sound suddenly echoed. Kimberly made a faint smile and then he brought his mouth closer to the communication device attached on his sleeve.



「This is Warren. All members, situation report.」



Kimberly wasn't shaken. Everything was just as planned. He had already seen through the ulterior motive of the students exiting the room. Therefore, he expected for the report that reached him from each bodyguard to be「Nothing strange」or「The students are~」.



Yes, everything was just as planned――was how it should be.



「? Oi, Clayton, Muller. Respond. Oi, what's wrong?」



All bodyguards that reported to him said there was nothing strange. Kimberly thought that there would be reports coming from at least two place telling him that some kind of commotion happened, but he got doubtful when until the end all the reports that he got told him nothing strange happened.



Furthermore, there was no report at all coming from the last two people he called. There was no reaction no matter how much he called into their communication device.



「……Oi oi. Don't tell me, they got caught off guard by mere students.」



Kimberly's cheeks convulsed from imagining the unimaginable development. But, the moment he noticed that the place that the two bodyguards he lost contact with was where【Berserk】was deposited, his face complexion changed right away.



「-, Dickson! Russell! Come here right away! Take over me for guarding the missy!」



『Haa? Warren, what are you saying? Just now two of the kids came here. They are surprised by the alarm but――』



「Just leave that alone! A different lot might be coming! 【Berserk】is stolen right now!」



『Wha-, wait a second! Something like that is not in the pla――』



「There ain't any time for chatter! I'm going to take a look at the place of Clayton and Muller! Just in case of the worst case, you mustn't let the missy got snatched away!」



Kimberly roared angrily. Right after that, the door of the room opened slightly and Professor Down's face appeared from there.



「Did something happen? We――」



「There might be someone infiltrating. I'm putting two guards here, so don't come out of the room.」



「No, but――」



Kimberly turned his back toward Professor Down who was going to object while saying this.



「Someone is aiming for【Berserk】!」



「!? Co, could it be, Dennis and others」



「No! Those guys are confirmed to be in another place! That's why I'm panicked here. Just listen, stay quietly inside the room!」



「Go, got it.」



Professor Down returned inside the room while feeling shaken. Right after that, two bodyguards dressed as garbage man came running.



Kimberly entrusted them to be the guard in that place before running through the corridor with fierce momentum.



「Dammit all. Please let it be just some kind of mistake. My livelihood depend in this plan here!」



Kimberly was cursing while rushing up the emergency stair. 【Berserk】was four floor above――inside the chemicals vault that was strictly managed at the tenth floor, but if there was intruder, then there was high possibility they would use the emergency stair, and this stair was also simply the closest to Kimberly's position.



The vault at the tenth floor could only be opened using ID card, fingerprint confirmation, twelve digit password, and voice recognition, those four locks. In addition there was also security camera.



Therefore, it was unthinkable that the drug could be stolen in so short time but……



Although they weren't agent that received training, but the men standing guard there were muscular and armed, yet they might be neutralized already without even given time for calling help.



If, this wasn't some kind of mistake, and there was really intruder, then that intruder must be a considerably skilled one.



Kimberly was feeling cold sweat while rushing through three floors in one go, and stepped on the stair landing between the ninth and tenth floor. It was at that moment,



「Oops」



「A? You……」



Ahead of the gaze of the shaken Kimberly, was a man that was just going to go down the stair from tenth floor. It was a man without any peculiar trait. He looked like he was in his twenty or even at his forty. He looked flat, medium build body, and brown hair that wasn't long or short. His suits didn't look like high-class or a cheap one. And then, a doctor robe.



The man raised a really light voice when he saw Kimberly. If they met in a normal situation, then Kimberly would surely think that this man was a researcher here, he might even say「Excuse me」while passing through the man and like that he wouldn't even recall back about the man for the second time in the future.



But,



「You, what is inside that suitcase?」



The lack of any peculiarity, the handy suitcase, and then Kimberly's instinct as an agent, made him be conscious of the man.



「It's just a research document though? Rather, I should be the one asking who are you? I have never seen your face here, and you also don't look like a researcher……eh, don't tell me you are related with this alarm? Could it be, I'm in a pinch here?」



The man's face was convulsing while he took a step back on the stair without turning around. Looking from the man's speech and gesture, in a glance he looked like a simple researcher encountering someone suspicious.



「I am an agent from security bureau. There is a possibility that an important medicine is stolen. Sorry, but I'll confirm the content of that case.」



「No, no, it's impossible to let outside person to see research data I told you. How suspicious, are you really someone from security bureau?」



If Kimberly took a step, the man would also take a step back. Kimberly narrowed his eyes slightly at the man's attitude, then he said「I'll show you my badge then」while his hand moved to take out his proof of identification as security bureau agent from his breast pocket……



In order to took out and fired a gun.



「Ah maan, this person is sharp. You are really a dangerous man, trying to shoot someone so suddenly like that.」



「……You yourself, you bastard ain't normal. Who and where are you from?」



Kimberly's gun muzzle, was pointed at the temple of the man from point-blank range. At the same time, the neck of Kimberly who had the distance closed instantly got a knife pressed on there.



Yes, the man in doctor robe closed the distance faster than Kimberly could take out his gun and shoot on an unstable place like the stair. Furthermore, surprisingly that knife flew out from the man's sleeve, it was obviously a knife with launching mechanism.



Kimberly felt cold sweat drenching himself. He planned to be a wanted man in this case anyway, so he wouldn't shirk from cleaning up one or two researchers that might be unrelated rather than risking his important money tree got stolen. But, when the lid was opened, what he was confronting was actually someone far more skilled than him.



'This is bad, bad, bad' His instinct was ringing the alarm bell loudly like that.



In an instant,



「Warren!」



「Kimberly-」



Voices that called Kimberly's name and gunshots roared. Bodyguard agents had gathered below. The man said「Whoops」still with a light tone while instantly pulling his body back. The bullets hit the wall a slight distance away. The shooters didn't plan to hit right from the start, they fired only to separate the man away from Kimberly.



The man seemed to give up going down the stair, he tried to climb up the stair.



「I won't let you-!」



Kimberly pulled his gun trigger continuously. The fired bullets passed through beside the man who twisted his body right away and opened up holes on the wall.



「Are you sane!? You are firing at someone carrying a case filled with hazardous substance here!」



「That thing cannot infect through air! Even if anyone get hit with droplets, if it's just a little then it cannot cause secondary infection! It's better to destroy it rather than have it stolen!」



Indeed, 【Berserk】wouldn't infect someone without injection or contact, regarding secondary infection from a person that had been【Berserkification】, if the intake amount was only a little, then even if other person came into contact with body fluids of the victim then they wouldn't get infected.



Even so, Kimberly who dared to brave the danger of scattering around the extremely dangerous chemicals caused the man's expression to cramp a bit while he finally took out a gun from his breast pocket and returned fire. While Kimberly leaped aside, two bodyguard agents that had climbed up the stair got their legs shot through and they crumbled down.



Kimberly cursed while aiming his gun muzzle at the man, but right after that, his eyes opened wide.



「Are you bastard ninja!?」



The man unexpectedly jumped off the stair, he then kicked on the handrail and leaped further and passed through above Kimberly's head. Furthermore, he then kicked on the wall to turn around and attacked Kimberly.



Kimberly changed the direction of his gun, but the man's flying kick hit Kimberly's chest faster. An impact that caused him to hallucinate his ribs breaking made the air in his lung to be forcefully ejected out. Kimberly groaned「Gahah」and got blown away.



In no time Kimberly was sent flying and he would be struck on the stair behind where he would be neutralized, that was how it appeared it would turn out……but, Kimberly was a former military and an expert at military hand-to-hand fighting. He immediately discarded his gun and caught the kicking leg, dragging the opponent into the momentum that sent him flying.



「Guah」



「-kh!?」



The man made Kimberly as his stepping stool and somehow evaded being struck on the stair, but his balance was broken and he fell.



Even so, Kimberly still got the bigger damage, and different from the man who immediately stood up, Kimberly became unable to move from the impact.



The man shrugged as though to say 'oh dear' before trying to leave that place.



It was at that time. An incident that could only be said as a devil's work happened in succession, which would lead to tragedy.



「Agent Warren!」



「This bastard! That's Emily's! Return it!」



Dennis and Rod appeared. They heard the alarm and saw the agents going off somewhere. They became worried that【Berserk】would be stolen again and came here to look at the situation, using elevator they came to the tenth floor and there they listened at gunshots from the stair. And then, the two caught sight at the man's figure and guessed the situation. When they saw Kimberly and other agents were defeated, their sense of justice came out. It came out fiercely.



The hot-blooded Rod leaped to the man, while Dennis threw the harmless but smelly chemical they had prepared.



Naturally, the man easily kicked away Rod, but the chemical vial accurately hit the ceiling and broke apart, throwing out its offensive smell. Naturally, the liquid fell like shower at the man below, Kimberly, and the agents.



The man immediately lifted his suitcase over his head to protect his body from the unknown chemical.



Instantly, along with a single gunshot, the suitcase was shot and sent flying from his hand. The one firing was one of the agent that was shot in the leg and fell. That agent was crawling slowly toward his gun that was sent flying, before his hand finally reached it and he aimed at the head of the man whose attention was taken by Rod and Dennis.



Therefore, it was a coincidence that it was the suitcase that was hit. Rather it was because the man was holding the suitcase with his hand lowered that the agent aimed at the man's head. But, the unexpected situation where a chemical was thrown at the ceiling caused the man to make an unforeseen move.



And then, there was one more devilish coincidence. The bullet hit the lock of the suitcase with pinpoint accuracy.



As the result, the suitcase that had its lock broken flew away from the man's hand, it crashed on the wall which caused the suitcase to be opened.



Yes, the vial of【Berserk】that was put inside the suitcase, was exposed to the open.



The people in that place sent their gaze pursuing the falling suitcase in slow motion. Obeying gravity, 【Berserk】flew out from the suitcase that fell on the ground. There were two vials in the suitcase.



One vial flew out from the impact and broke at the center of the landing stair. The content scattered out.



「Don't get hit!」



「tsu」



Kimberly roared angrily. Ahead of his gaze was the figure of the other agent that was still lying on the floor.



The agent covered his face with his arms right away but……he was too late.



「a, a? Gii! aAAAAA―――!!」



The splash of【Berserk】flew into the agent's eye and mouth, a beat later, the agent screamed thunderously, *beki baki goki* his body began to transform along with raw sounds.



「Now that it's like this, he is beyond help, eh.」



The man, with expression as though he was chewing something bitter aimed his gun muzzle at the head of the enlarging agent. And then, he fired without hesitation and blew away the head. If the person only came into contact with small amount of splash, then there would be no problem if he was killed before transforming.



The agent easily crumbled down.



Dennis and Rod were greatly shaken seeing a person died before their eyes, even so they felt relieve the same like Kimberly and the man that the Berserkification was stopped.



It was at that moment,



――aAAAAAAAAAH!!!!!



The first cry of birth came from downstairs. The birth cry of Berserk.



「-, the other one!?」



「Not here……shit-, it fell down! We got too distracted with this one!」



Yes, the other vial wasn't anywhere here.



The other vial had fell downstairs from the gap between the handrail's railing. And then, midway it crashed on the railing and its content was thrown out. If it was just that then there would be no problem. However, in a stroke of bad luck, no, perhaps in a sense it ought to be said as inevitability, downstairs there were a lot of people that stuck out their head from the handrail to look upstairs.



The alarm and the gunshots that came from upstairs. There was no way that those would go unnoticed by the students and professors who were staying behind in the research building, the security guards, and others.



That was why, the drug that gave birth to berserker raining down from upstairs showered them plenty. It wasn't in the level of splash anymore. It was the whole content of a bottle. Even though, it actually didn't even take a full injection at that time of【Berserk Case】.



「Aa, geez-. This is really an awful failure-. The luck of me today is undoubtedly the worst!」



The man cursed out like that while jumping down the stairs.



「Guh, fuck-. Stop damnit!」



Kimberly's face distorted due to the damage that was still remaining in his body while standing up somehow, he then chased after the man by rushing down the stair.



「Rod! We are going back!」



「Eh? A, Dennis? But, something like this……」



「Get a hold of yourself! We have to let everyone know! Besides, that man might be going to where Emily is!」



「ts. Tha, that's right.」



Dennis scolded the greatly shaken Rod and made him stood up.



And then, they turned a pained expression at the agent's remain that got his head blown off, before they rushed out toward the room where Emily and others were waiting



While listening to the countless roars and continuous gunfire resounding downstairs.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Even though I planned to finish the reminiscence at two chapters……



Seriously I got no time for writing. This time it stop at incomplete point too



It will be a bit harsh for the update for the next Saturday.





Chapter 205




AN: It’s a little bit late.



When Kimberly finally arrived at downstairs where screams and bellows and beastly roars were flying past each other, he witnessed the manifestation of picture of hell there.



Men and women were enlarged atrociously without distinction. The strengthened monsters were trampling down everything at the surrounding following their instinct.



At first there were only several people that got dashed over with【Berserk】, but the body fluids that were scattered along with the roar, the biting act, the scattering blood due to the security guard's gunshot, all those were increasing the number of the infected like rats multiplying.



If it was only a bit of【Berserk】, then surely there wouldn't be anyone at the surrounding that got infected just like when that young man rampaged in the middle of city a few days ago. However, this time the people that got infected the very first were absorbing a lot of the undiluted solution of【Berserk】. The ability of【Berserk】should be lowering much if it was by indirect infection, so at this level there would be no worry of explosive contagion happening.



However, even so there was the need to be resigned of at least tertiary infection or quaternary infection. And above all else, the people who got hit at the beginning with the undiluted solution were even now scattered about somewhere and kept producing the secondary infection.



The hell was only starting just now.



「Fuck-. It's really a B-class movie like this.」



Kimberly was cursing while aiming his gun muzzle at a berserker that just now was snapping the waist of a small statured female student to opposite direction. He consecutively fired life-reaping bullets within an instant.



The former student that was Berserkified carelessly tossed away the female students who died in a way that was beyond imagination by getting snapped right into half, and then it covered its head using its arm that was like a log while rapidly rushing at Kimberly.



Kimberly's bullets that flew straight to the berserker's head were easily stopped by that muscle armor. Its flesh was gouged and blood was flying, but that was all. The wound was immediately starting to regenerate and its charging momentum didn't decline at all.



「Nine milli is just like peashooter huh-」



Kimberly immediately jumped forward into a head-sliding. Strong wind of death and madness passed through above his head. He evaded by slipping through between its legs.



Kimberly was sliding while instantly rolling face-up, and then he aimed at the back of the head of the berserker and pulled his trigger. Inside the corridor that had turned dim due to the broken lamps, muzzle flashes flickered along with consecutive gunshot sounds.



At the same time, skin and flesh and blood scattered from the berserker's back of the head. The berserker that got hit with fierce impact on the back of the head while in the middle of charging pitched forward and fell on the corridor with a slide.



「I heard that it doesn't have weak point other than the head but……it's more troublesome than I thought.」



Kimberly stood up while smoothly replacing his gun's magazine. He whispered with an expression as though he was chewing something bitter.



Right after that,



「aAAAAAAAH」



「-!? Shit-, it's infected!?」



Behind Kimberly, the female student who was snapped into two just now shrieked while standing up. When he looked there, the girl's face was really wet. Probably when she was caught she was also dashed with a lot of saliva that was scattered together with the berserker's roar.



Kimberly aimed his gun to deal the finishing blow before it could finish its transformation. But, before he could pull the trigger, presence of death blew from behind him.



「-!?」



He obeyed his instinct's order and jumped to the side, an instant later, a war hammer was swung down. The fist attack was so fierce that he mistakenly thought that. Cracks in the shape of spider web was created on the floor by that fist.



「So I failed to finish it off-」



Yes, the attacker from behind was the berserker just now. Actually, the angle of Kimberly's bullets was too bad to pierce the skull, they could only slide on the skull's surface and shaved the skin.



And then, the worst thing was that the second berserker finished transforming in front of Kimberly who lost his chance.



「This is bad……」



He muttered those words unconsciously. Cold sweat trickled down the temple of Kimberly. He was sandwiched between two berserkers behind and forward in a corridor that wasn't that wide. Kimberly's cheeks were twitching in this dangerous situation.



But, at that time, a severe earthquake suddenly came. The corridor wall slightly away from him was blown away along with intense thunderous roar, and from there a berserker came out. However, it appeared that the berserker wasn't intentionally smashing the wall. The berserker flew out with a somersault and its head struck uncouthly at the corridor's opposite side with a tumble.



It was as though its charging momentum was made use to send it flying and crashed onto the wall. That conjecture was proved to be correct by the man in white doctor robe that jumped out from the broken wall right after that.



「My stomach got cold inside here because I need to imitate a matador against berserker.」



The man made such frivolous talk while kicking the berserker's arm that was trying to stand up. When its balance's broke, the man drilled its head with point-blank range shooting and finished it off with certainty. The berserker fell down like a puppet with its string cut, and then it withered up while spewing white smoke. The man in white doctor robe attentively put in bullet toward the heart's location from the back.



「GAAAAAAAH!」



「Oops. Spare me from anymore chicken race okay.」



One of the berserkers aiming at Kimberly roared and charged toward the man in white doctor robe. Immediately following that, a black object lightly flew in air.



「Wai-, you stupid bastard-」



Kimberly got down in panic. The next moment, the dim corridor was overran with intense flash. The white robed man was using flashbang.



Kimberly was sweating coldly that he was crouching defenselessly right beside a berserker while desperately covering his eyes, then gunshots roared four times in the corridor that was filled with flash. At the same time, a heavy crashing sound resounded for the second time.



(He sniped in this kind of situation!?)



Kimberly shuddered in his heart while sweating coldly at the white robed man's skill, however, he still jumped out by relying the slight presence that he felt.



「Uwah, that's dangerous-」



「Chih, I missed-」



The flash was already settling down and the dim corridor came back into view. The two people crossed through each other among the falling bodies of berserkers and now they were opposite of each other. The white robed man that easily slaughtered three berserkers tried to cross in front of Kimberly to go ahead of the corridor, but then Kimberly assaulted him with the knife that he was secretly carrying.



Kimberly already perceived that it was impossible to catch this man for interrogation due to the difference in strength between the two of them, but rather than letting him escaped just like this he thought that he would instead kill the man and search for even a scrap of information about who this man was from his dead body.



However, the attack that was filled with that killing intent was easily dodged. Kimberly reflexively clicked his tongue.



Although, as expected, perhaps the man in white robe didn't expect Kimberly to attack using his instinct when his eyes were burned to some extent by the flashbang and he kept it closed, the man exposed a slightly pained expression.



「ts, ……you, that face」



「……Geh, this is bad!? Aa, can you pretend not seeing anything?」



The white robed man still talked with light tone. The place on his face that was grazed by Kimberly's knife had something dangling down on there. However, it wasn't blood. There was unharmed skin that could be seen from under the peeled off skin.



It was obviously a disguise mask that was using advanced technology. It was something in the level that couldn't be prepared by low level organization.



(Wait, wait a second. He is using a disguise of this level just for sneaking into a university's research facility? He is extremely vigilance of having his face known? In addition he know about Berserk's existence and act in this timing, also an organization that has skilled member above my level?)



Kimberly stared fixedly at the white robed man who was holding his head in exaggeration while saying「Ooh my, goddd!」because of his failure of exposing the fact that he was in disguise. And then, with the information that he had as the premise, and the speech and conduct of the man that he felt déjà vu from……



「You……don't tell me……」



The eyes of Kimberly who guessed the true identity of the white robed man turned round. The man showed even more fluster at Kimberly's state that was like that. The man muttered in small voice「Even though I'm already at risk of getting fired from making this great failure, seriously spare me from more than this!」before turning on his heel.



「Wait-」



「I'm not waiting! This is out of control already! I had taken care of all the first berserkers already, take care of the rest please! This is what you called collective responsibility!」



「Don't screw-――」



Kimberly tried to chase after the man, but the white robed man vanished in the blink of eye deep at the corridor ahead. Furthermore, in a bad timing more berserkers showed its figure from the opposite side of the corridor that Kimberly was forced to stop running.



「This is really a shitty B-class. This one and that one are just doing whatever they pleased.」



With a pained expression, Kimberly gave a sidelong glance at the berserkers charging at him while roaring. He then dashed up the stair to the floor above.



On the other side, when the berserkers were starting to scream for the first time, Emily and others were tormented by bewilderment and anxiety and fretfulness while hesitating of what to do, whether they should go out to look at the situation or not, or if this was the diversion caused by Rod and others and they should get out of the research building right away.



At the very least, this surely wasn't the diversion that they planned seeing from Kimberly's state before this and from how the two agents that came to be the guard replacing him suddenly dashed away in panic and abandoned their guard duty.



「……Everyone, let's escape.」



Professor Down made his decision in the middle of the oppressive atmosphere. Hendricks was about to make objection reflexively, but Professor Down continued his words before Hendricks could form his words.



「This feels too strange to be something caused by Rod and others. Perhaps something else is happening right now. However, it's certain that the agents are directing their attention elsewhere. I think we shouldn't let go of this chance.」



Those words caused everyone to look at each other's face. And then, they nodded at Professor Down's suggestion even while feeling anxious.



They slowly and quietly opened the door, and after confirming that there was nothing strange going on outside, Emily and others came out. Violent sound of clatters and impacts resounded from the corridor. Emily's body spontaneously froze from that. Hendricks showed his usual kind smile at Emily who was showing small fear while her body stooped a little, their eyes met each other.



「It's fine Emily. We are with you. Surely everything will go smoothly.」



「Senpai……」



Emily looked anxious, but she obediently nodded. Hendricks then tousled her head in encouragement.



「Wait Rick. Don't tousle Emily's hair like that. Good grief, you just don't understand how to treat a girl.」



「Oi oi, Lizzie. If Hendricks understand how woman's heart work, then you two will be already married from long time――」



「Stupid Milo-, close that mouth of yours!」



The cheerful overseas student Milo ate Lizzie's slap with 'hebuu' and his body half-rotated. But he kept rotating for a half more and returned to face the front and sent Lizzie a wide grin. A vein emerged on Lizzie's forehead.



Seeing the exchange between the seniors――no, her big brothers and big sisters who were always jovial, Emily's anxiety was also eliminated a bit. She said「Thank you」inside her heart while returning back a powerful smile in place of words of gratitude.



Emily and others arrived in front of the stair.



「Then, Hendricks, Lizzie, Milo. We'll rely on you to recover the research data and the drugs. I and Emily will leave ahead from here. Let's meet again at the meeting place.」



「Yes teacher.」



Hendricks replied with determined expression at Professor Down's instruction. Lizzie and Milo also nodded.



Like that, Hendricks and other went upstairs while Emily and Professor Down went downstairs, it was just before they could do that, *zushin-, zushin-* a sound that was like something heavy hitting the floor resounded from downstairs.



「What?」



Hendricks and Milo looked at each other's face and they peeked downstairs hesitatingly. Even while they were doing that, the heavy sound was gradually getting louder while transmitting vibration regularly.



「He, hey, Hendricks. You see, I, feels like I have seen this kind of scene, in a movie before……」



「He, hee? What, coincidence. I, I also recall something like that.」



The two were feeling cold sweats drenching their body while they couldn't take off their gaze from downstairs, however, they muttered in small volume simultaneously.



――Juras○c Park



They said.



「This ain't a joke. Why, the hell. Why, are those guys……」



「Ha, haha. I wonder, if this is still better, than T-Rex……」



Milo stepped back while shuddering in fear from that――the berserker that finally showed its appearance. Hendricks also stepped back while making a dry laugh.



Right after that, a scream that pierced the air was raised.



「ts, RUN-」



Hendricks's voice warned so loud it felt like her throat would tear. Milo came back to his senses as though he just got punched, while Emily and others who were similarly stiffened also turned on their heel and started running through the corridor.



「Go down from the other stair!」



「No, use the elevator! Get into that!」



Lizzie mentioned about the other stair at the end of the research building. But midway Hendricks saw the floor display of the elevator and wasted no time to tell the others about the change of plan.



Emily jumped forward and pushed the elevator button. The elevator was currently at a floor above them. The sound of the elevator operating sounded a beat later after the button was pushed. Emily and others would be able to ride the elevator in just a few more seconds. But, right now those seconds felt like eternity to them.



「Quick-, quick-!!」



Emily spoke impatiently while pushing the button repeatedly.



A roar reverberated. The berserker climbed the stair and arrived at the floor where Emily and others were at right now. The figure of Emily and others was reflected on its bloodshot eyes. And then, it screamed once more. However, this time the sound was accompanied by the shaking of the floor from its forward charge.



At the same time, the elevator door opened. They all rushed inside and pushed the button with all their might. Seeing the door slowly began to close was really frustrating. However, it closed just in time.



Just before the door closed, the wicked look of the berserker peeked in from between the door's gap and a fist approached, but the door closed completely. Thunderous sound and impact ran through the door. Milo and Hendricks fell on their butt seeing the door now became greatly dented.



Lizzie was covering her mouth with her hands, her expression showed how she couldn't believe what had happened. And then, Professor Down was dumbfounded while muttering「Impossible. This……what happened……」.



While the floor display of the elevator was slowly heading to the lower floor, Emily let out her words using voice that was filled with uneasiness.



「We, we have to contact the police. After that the security bureau too. After that, after that, the research building need to be sealed……but, the way to seal it is……」



Those voices caused Hendricks and others to quickly return to their senses. Their little sister was desperately thinking even while they were in stupor. That fact made them recovered some part of their composure.



「We don't know what happened but, it's unthinkable that Rod and others were the one scattering【H3-α4】――no, 【Berserk】. Anyway, let's get outside for the moment abd then contact the police. If they don't send armed men here……」



「……Yeah. We don't know how much【Berserk】is scattered, but it will be a disaster if it gets outside.」



「Are Dennis and others safe……. As for the security bureau, surely agent Warren has contacted them though.」



Hendricks and others desperately calmed down themselves while talking to each other. Before long the elevator arrived at the first floor. The door opened and then they caught sight of armed men in janitor uniform a slight distance away. Those must be the bodyguard agents from security bureau.



With that conclusion, Milo felt a slight relieve, and then he rushed out of the elevator in order to seek help from them.



「You guys! Help us! Upstairs there is berse――」



Milo's figure disappeared.



「Eh?」



It was unknown who whispered that. Hendricks came out of the elevator with shaky footsteps and turned his gaze to the right.



He already knew. Right after Milo got outside, something big nabbed Milo from the side. He knew――that this something was a berserker.



「A, a, aah」



Hendricks trembling voice echoed. His eyes opened widely and he sunk down on the floor as though strength left his waist. He didn't avert his gaze away. He couldn't.



He couldn't avert his gaze from the figure of his friend that got his head crushed. He couldn't avert his gaze, from the monster straddling his friend while madly punching with its fist that was like rock.



The roar of the berserker that easily snatched Milo's life reverberated. It sounded like the war cry of victory.



The agents fired. From the direction they fired at, further two, three more berserkers appeared.



「Senpai!」



「Rick-」



The agents fired blindly in panic. Several of the bullets hit nearby the elevator, even so Hendricks kept standing stock still without being able to avert his eyes from the tragic appearance of his friend. Emily and Lizzie jumped at Hendricks who was like that. And then, both of them dragged him back into the elevator.



「Milo is, Milo is-」



「Rick-, get a hold of yourself!」



Lizzie scolded Hendricks who was holding his head in panic. A painful slap flew onto Hendricks's cheek. Hendricks returned to his senses due to the pain running on his cheek and the expression of Lizzie before his eyes that looked like it would burst into tear anytime.



「Right now……that's no good. You still, cannot break down yet. Live, search for help, after that…….protect our little sister! Think just those for now! You are a big brother right!」



「Lizzie……yeah, you're right. Sorry.」



Hendricks stood up and turned his gaze at the little sister who was standing still at the elevator corner.



(She looks like a corpse. Shit-, it's just as Lizzie said. I've got to pull myself together-)



The look of Emily's expression that lost color was certainly like a corpse inside a coffin. Hendricks who treated her like family all this time understood really clearly that Emily now was getting crushed by guilt.



The drug that she created turned a lot of people into monster. And then, those monsters, finally killed a person that she loved like brother. That was really no different than Emily herself getting killed……



Of course, from the point of view of Hendricks and others, that was nothing more than barking up the wrong tree. But, surely, even if they said「This isn't Emily's fault」, their words wouldn't reach the heart of Emily who was drowning in guilt.



That was why,



「Emily, I want you to lend us your strength.」



「Eh?」



Hendricks entreated to Emily.



「It's only Emily who can stop Berserk. There is no doubt that we will be unable to make the antidote. It's only you who grasped the whole thing and possess the insight that we won't even be able to imagine, that can stop the monster that we created.」



「Senpai……」



「Please, Emily. Save us, save everyone. Lend us, your power.」



There was no time for them to stop still. There wasn't any time to drown in guilt. Exert Emily Grant's whole strength. Hendricks who pleaded like that made Emily to notice his true intention.



Emily's almond-shaped eyes sharpened even more fiercely. She wiped her eyes with the sleeve of her kinked lab coat and slapped her own cheeks so hard that it made sound. And then, she gave a sharp nod at Hendricks.



Hendricks looked fondly at Emily's gaze and he nodded back, and then he suggested that they took a look at their own laboratory. He was thinking of the possibility that perhaps Dennis and others or agent Warren returned there.



Of course, there was the possibility that the berserker before this was still there. Therefore, they had to stay on guard so they could evacuate back into elevator anytime.



However, when they peeked out of elevator, what entered their eyes was――a disastrous sight.



「Sa, m?」



「A, e, a……this is, lies, right?」



There was the figure of Sam who had been reduced into a berserker, and then the figure of Jessica who was dangled in midair with her neck broken. And then, there was the figure of Dennis soaked in sea of blood at the side, and the figure of Rod sitting down while leaning on the wall. ――It was really, a nightmare.



Right after that, the elevator that had its button kept being pushed by Emily so they could escape anytime was suddenly assaulted by impact. *zuhin-* Something fell on the elevator from above. The elevator was making unpleasant sound while sinking below.



At the same time, a roar and an impact struck the elevator's ceiling. The elevator was dented with each roar. It was clear that a berserker was invading from above the ceiling.



「-, Emily! Teacher! Get out quickly!」



Hendricks and Lizzie stretched their hand to Emily and Professor Down in panic. The elevator entrance had turned narrow like a guillotine. Emily and Professor Down crawled out from there desperately.



The next moment, the elevator finally surpassed its endurance limit and fell below with a screech. The berserker that was on its ceiling reached out its hand and grasped the edge of the elevator entrance that was still opened.



Emily and others moved away from the entrance in panic, but there was no way that much commotion wouldn't attract the attention of the berserker that was Sam once.



Sam threw away Jessica like a doll and raised a groan. And then, a berserker crept up from the elevator.



In this hopelessly deathly situation, a gunshot suddenly rang.



「DAMN ITTTTTTTTT-」



The one who yelled in frenzy like that while pulling trigger toward Sam――was Rod. He kept leaning on the wall while still sitting down, perhaps he had no strength to stand up anymore, yet he was still pulling the trigger of the gun that he likely borrowed from a dead agent.



It seemed that Sam whose attention was taken by Emily and others got taken unaware by this surprise attack. The moment he was about to turn toward Rod, one of the fired bullets pierced the side of his head and he fell down. His body was smoking white while rapidly withering.



Hendricks and others had no word toward the figure of their important companion that was so miserable it was painful to look at, and then, Rod who was the one that did that was crying while muttering「Damn it……」one more time.



「Rod-oniichan!」



「-, Rod!」



Emily rushed ahead. She dashed toward Rod who was dropping the handgun powerlessly. Hendricks and others were also sprinting to Rod's side in panic.



Midway, Hendricks took a look at the condition of the fallen Dennis but……there was a single shot in his temple. He had already expired. And then, looking at Dennis figure that was smoking even though it was only a little, Hendricks guessed how Dennis was already infected.



「……Den, nis, he did it, by himself. He got splashed, by Sam's blood……, midway here, he picked……the gun……that was why, he said, he don't want to become monster……and he」



The gasping Rod was sending his gaze at Dennis with hollow look. It seemed that it was Dennis who dealt with himself. Dennis and Rod always quarreled when they met each other, they weren't compatible with each other at all, but even so, they were "buddy". Surely the feeling inside Rod's chest was something that couldn't be expressed by words at all.



「You idiot Dennis. ……When I go to the other side……I'll yell at……you again. ……I'm going, to beat you……up」



「Enough already-, don't talk, Rod!」



「Rod-oniichan! Don't, please don't! You must not die!」



「Stupid Rod! Get a hold of yourself!」



Emily and others clung on Rod. 'Gofuh' Rod vomited out blood while making a wry smile. Shadow of death was emerging on his face. Looking at his caved-in chest and his stomach that looked discolored, it was clear that his internal organs had received fatal damage.



No matter how they looked, Rod, was already beyond help.



Surely even Rod himself understood that. His gaze was calm in acceptance while his trembling hand patted Emily's head.



「……Sorry, yeah, Emily.This is, our fault…..because, we did……something, unnecessary……but, we want to do something……really, sorry」



「No-. This isn't Rod-oniichan's fault! I, I-」



Rod's hand fell down limply.



――Youu, live on



Those were Rod's last words.



Emily and others were dumbfounded. Their companions who were like family, who were laughing with each other only just now, were gone already. That fact, that reality, they couldn't accept it.



But, reality wouldn't give any consideration to their feeling.



The berserker that crawled up from the elevator showed up. Its bloodshot eye glint captured Emily and others as its prey without any room for hesitation.



Hendricks stood up. And then, he slowly pulled out the handgun that Dennis's hand was still holding and he ascertained its magazine. Hendricks sent only his words to Emily and others without looking back.



「I'll lure away that guy somehow. During that time, you guys escape.」



Emily and Lizzie reflexively were going to shout just what was he talking about, but Hendricks didn't allow any objection.



「Go-. I'll meet up with you guys again for sure!」



Saying that, Hendricks charged at the berserker alone. Emily yelled「Senpai-」and she was going to rush out, but Professor Down pinioned her from behind. Emily struggled, but when she was yelled「Don't waste Hendricks's feeling here!」, strength left her.



「……We are going!」



「Wha-, Lizzie-nee!?」



At the corridor ahead, Hendricks was shooting while he passed through the berserker's side with a slide. And then he fired again to attract the berserker's attention. The berserker turned on its heel and determined Hendricks as its target. During that time, with the monster between them, Hendricks and Lizzie's gaze crossed each other.



That was enough.



Lizzie grasped Emily's hand and she turned around. Emily made an expression of unable to believe the action of Lizzie who should be harboring feeling for Hendricks, but she shut up when she saw the blood flowing from Lizzie's lips and her bitten lips.



Emily and others ran off with the figure of Hendricks running to the other side of the corridor behind them.



「Let's use the emergency stair. The first floor is dangerous, so let's use the plumbing pipe from second floor to go down.」



Lizzie wordlessly nodded at Professor Down's words and she pulled Emily's hand.



They opened the door to emergency stair and ran down toward the second floor. But, right now the research building was a berserker nest. And then, their developed sense of hearing could sense the prey's existence even across wall.



「GAAAAAAAAH!!」



「KYAAAH」



「UWAH」



The door of the emergency stair was blown away together with a roar. The steel door that was flown together with its clasp became a brutal weapon, and in a stroke of bad luck, it separated them from each other. Professor Down fell on his butt on the stair that connected to upper floor, while Lizzie and Emily fell on the stair landing because they embraced each other.



The eye glint of the berserker caught Professor Down.



「Do, don't come-」



Professor Down stood up with a yell and escaped by climbing up the stairs. Lizzie and Emily also stood up desperately, but because the steel door stood in their way and they couldn't pass through, they had no other choice but ran down the stairs.



The berserker seemed to choose the group with more prey. He sent a crushing blow to the direction of Lizzie and Emily.



「Emily-. Don't stop no matter what!」



「Lizzie-nee-」



The two somehow escaped from the range the fist could reach and immediately stood up again even though they were entangled with each other due to the impact. However, the berserker immediately caught up to them. It really looked unlikely that they would be able to escape until second floor.



Lizzie instantly made an expression that was filled with resolve. Emily who noticed that was caught by bad premonition. Lizzie pulled at Emily's hand and wasted no time to open the door right below them and ran through it. The berserker destroyed the steel door again and entered the floor to chase after Emily and Lizzie.



Lizzie who was pulling Emily's hand continued to run without hesitation as though she had a destination in mind.



「Lizzie-nee!」



「It will be fine! I swear I'll protect you!」



Lizzie turned the corner several times to shake off the footsteps resounding behind them before she came to a stop in front of a certain door. And then, she desperately suppressed her fingers that were trembling from tension and fear while she entered the password into the electronic lock that was installed beside the door.



The door opened accompanied by small mechanical sound. Lizzie pushed in Emily inside. Emily who had no doubt that they would be hiding together inside turned pale seeing Lizzie didn't enter. She guessed what Lizzie's intention was.



Toward such Emily, Lizzie showed her a gentle smile even with a stiff face while opening her mouth in persuasion.



「Emily, hide here. You absolutely mustn't go out.」



「Wa, wait, Lizzie-nee-. We can――」



「The door here is sturdier then other room, that's why it won't be broken down that easily. The security bureau people should arrive soon, that's why do your best to endure until that time.」



「If that's the case then Lizzie-nee too, quickly get in!」



「I'm sorry, that guy has to be lured away. There is no more place to escape inside here, so in the worst case that guy noticed then that will be the end. That's why, okay?」



「Who cares about that! It doesn't matter, just come in quickly!」



Emily desperately pulled at Lizzie's hand, but Lizzie smiled sweetly and pushed her down on her butt.



「It's okay. I'll find that idiot Rick and teacher, and we will return here together. So believe in your big sis.」



「Lizzie-nee-」



Emily reached out her hand. But the steel door obstructed that. Emily's small fist desperately punched on the steel door, but of course it didn't even twitch. Yet even while losing composure, Emily recalled in a flash that the door could be opened from inside too and her hand reached out to the door button but,



「Emily-!」



「-」



Lizzie's angry voice resounded from behind her. Emily's body spontaneously stiffened. This time a gentle voice reached her.



「No matter what happen, never give up. If it's Emily, then it absolutely will be fine, I, we all believe that.」



「Lizzie-nee……」



Those words of her big sister that came from across the steel door made Emily's hand that was reaching to the button to fall powerlessly. Hot tears were falling along her cheeks without end.



「I love you, Emily. Don't forget that. No matter what happened, you are the little sister, that we are proud of.」



「Lizzie-nee-」



A roar reverberated. Lizzie's presence was getting farther away. A beat later, heavy footsteps were passing through in front of the door.



Emily backed off unsteadily before she powerlessly sank down on the floor helplessly. And then, she hugged her knees and buried her face onto it, both her hands held her head and she turned small.



Emily waited, obeying the command of her beloved big sister.



However, what returned was only the completely transformed Hendricks.



(This is baadd……. Heavy. This is just awfully heavy. Honestly, that's too heavy that I want to run away right now……)



After she finished talking of the long recollection, Emily hugged her knees once more, buried her face, and turned small. Kousuke was sighing inside his heart while looking at such Emily. Honestly speaking, he couldn't help but felt sympathy with Emily's circumstance. Emily had even forgotten that she wasn't wearing anything down there that it felt like her secret place down there could be visible with her current sitting position, but right now Kousuke was in the middle of much regret of hearing the story that he didn't even have the composure to be aware of such thing.



「When we arrived, there is almost no survivor anymore inside the research building. We met up with Kimberly who ran out of bullet and went into hiding, then after we shared information, we split up to search for Doctor Grant, I managed to secure her but……」



「That handsome bastard betrayed you then.」



「Yes. It was when we met up with our comrades and gathered in the first floor to escape. We were surrounded by berserkers and put up a fight, and when we somehow managed to secure an escape route, we were gunned down by Kimberly and an armed group from somewhere that had replaced the bodyguard agents.」



Because of the attack of that time, the agents who came for the pick-up were annihilated. Vanessa was able to survive even while getting wounded on her side was because she was immediately covered by Hughes. But in exchange he was also lethally wounded, even so he fought hard in order to let Vanessa and Emily escaped.



As the result, due to Hughes's last stand, Vanessa and Emily managed to escape.



There, Kousuke spoke his doubt.



「Hm? After that, you didn't contact the security bureau right away?」



Kousuke witnessed the car chase at the afternoon. From the story that he heard, the incident occurred at midnight. That meant that Vanessa and Emily were fighting alone for more than half a day.



「My smartphone that can connect with the private line was broken when we were ambushed……. Doctor Grant's phone also seemed to break somewhere in the middle of our escape.」



「You can just use public phone right?」



「That's true. I also tried to do that. However, that……it's embarrassing but, after I performed first aid on my wound, I fainted.」



It appeared that Vanessa ran out of strength because she even performed the bullet extraction inside the car. After that Emily nursed Vanessa for the whole night.



And then, the next morning, Vanessa who woke up from her fainting finally made contact with the headquarters, but right after, perhaps they were detected or something, they were assaulted by Kimberly and his group then.



After that, they were chased around relentless without any time to meet up with the people from headquarters, also the meeting site that was decided beforehand was also known by Kimberly so it couldn't be used, and that was why they were doing nothing but running away.



「I see. ……Then, what are you going to do from here? The security bureau seems to be suspicious too right?」



「That's right. However, it's also the fact that we won't be able to do anything by ourselves. It's only in the movie when individual can oppose an organization as their opponent. ……We have to determine, the true intention of the chief.」



In this situation, even though the security bureau seemed suspicious, but it was unthinkable that the whole place was pitch black. If it was just as Kimberly insinuated, that the security bureau was pulling the string of the attack, then Chief Magdanese was exceedingly close with "black". In that case, then Vanessa would ask for help from bureau member listed up inside her head that seem to be trustable, and also from other places like intelligence department and so on.



But if it was the opposite, that Chief Magdanese was "white", they would be able to get rescue from the most direct place.



In any case, to investigate about the organization behind Kimberly and further to oppose them, Vanessa would need to obtain the power of organization too. Because of that, no matter what it was essential to clearly determine the position of Chief Magdanese, whether she was white or black.



「First, it's important to classify which is the enemy and which is ally. I plan to move with that direction, so during that time I want Mr. K to protect Doctor Grant.」



Kousuke scratched his cheek with a troubled look after listening to Vanessa's plan. And then, he was about to open his mouth to say something, however, his voice that was going to sing an objection was interrupted.



「I'm not looking for protection or anything.」



「Doctor Grant?」



Vanessa turned her gaze in surprise. There, Emily who turned small was slowly lifting up her face and looked back. The dark flame dwelling inside those eyes, which contradicted her frail atmosphere before this caused Vanessa to gulp unconsciously.



「That drug,【Berserk】, it's something that mustn't exist in this world. It has to be erased from this world, all of it without leaving anything behind. I who created it, have to erase it no matter what.」



「That's……」



「I absolutely don't want to be just protected, only waiting for the situation to end without understanding anything. That's why, Vanessa. Please, bring me along. I want to ascertain with my own eyes, who was the one that spread around【Berserk】, and, what will happen from now on.」



「……My apologies but, Doctor Grant. You are――」



「A burden? I don't think so. 【Berserk】is a defective merchandise that was created by chance. Whether it's to improve it or making its antidote, those are out of the question without me. In other words, I am the best shield you can ask.」



Vanessa was greatly troubled with Emily's point. Indeed, for the people who were seeking for Emily's knowledge and ability, Emily's life was something they had to absolutely protect. To put it another way, if she turned Emily into shield then they wouldn't be able to pull the trigger.



If Vanessa said that she would search information against an organization in this isolated situation, then indeed it could be said to be a useful card. However, even though she was fighting to protect Emily by nature, but if she made her into something like a shield than that would mean putting the cart before the horse.



Besides, there was nothing absolute in a battlefield, on top of that an "accident" could possibly happen. And even if those didn't happen, the enemy had no reason to not make the decision "it's fine if she is at least alive".



For Vanessa, taking around Emily together with her from here on was something that couldn't be permitted. However, even with all those reasons, she was unable to simply reject and left her was surely because of Emily's eyes. If she forced her to stay behind, then she would run off by herself. That risk was something possible with the current Emily.



How should she persuade her……Vanessa was at a loss, but before Vanessa could say something, the one who spoke to Emily who said rash things, was Kousuke who was being reserved.



「Look here……as I thought, something like this, I think it's better if we leave it to the pro you know? Emily is a researcher right? A researcher has their own battlefield that can only be fought by researcher isn't it? If Vanessa-san found ally and they prepared a place for you to research【Berserk】, then Emily's battle would be from there on, isn't that right?」



For Kousuke, it would be the best for him if Vanessa could quickly found ally organization that could give heavy protection to Emily. Because at that point of time Kousuke would become unnecessary and he could leave. Thinking so, Kousuke tried to back up Vanessa, but



「No.」



His opinion was rejected with one word. Emily didn't even meet his gaze.



「Saying no like that, are you a child throwing tantrum huh. You understand right? You said you are going to become shield or whatever, but you are virtually still a burden. There is no way Vanessa-san will be able to use Emily as shield. That's why, here you shou――」



「If I said no then no-!」



Hearing Kousuke's words, this time Emily's almond-shaped eyes glared fiercely while saying a rejection that sounded completely childish. As expected Kousuke was irritated hearing Emily's words that weren't even an objection but simply selfishness.



「Seriously, this isn't the time to throw tantrum. How about you understand your own position a bit more? You are genius right? Then at least understand that much.」



「……」



Kousuke's obviously pathetic atmosphere until now faded, and its place he replied with expression and tone that were visibly irritated. Emily trembled in shock from that. However, the flame dwelling in her eyes didn't die down for even a bit. She couldn't say any rebuttal and tears were oozing out slightly from her eyes, but even so she still radiated rebellion to Kousuke.



Kousuke continued his words while holding down his irritated feeling at the unreasonable Emily.



「Look here……if you keep being obstinate, and Vanessa-san get hurt again because of that――」



「What's wrong with being obstinate huh!」



Emily interrupted Kousuke's words and exploded.「OoU」Kousuke raised a strange voice in shock. Emily approached Kousuke who was like that and gripped his collar.



「I know already! It's better for Vanessa-san to move by herself! That I won't be useful if I'm with her! I know that! But, I still cannot help it! Because, because-」



「Ca, calm do――」



Kousuke caught Emily's shoulders to try to calm her down, but right after that, he tasted an impact that shot through his heart from the words that Emily yelled next.



「Everyone, they died!」



「-」



Emily who was shedding tears with her emotion exploding kept yelling without noticing Kousuke's condition.



「Everyone, everyone died there! In order to let me get away! In order to let me stay alive! Everyone died! They died there……」



――I told you they died! Captain Meld and Alan-san and the others, all of them! All the knights that entered the labyrinth died! In order to let me get away! Because of my fault! They died! They all died there!



The wailing that he once raised was resurrected in his head.



「I was entrusted. Everyone, they entrusted me with their hope. I, I cannot stop. Or else, or else everyone……」



He was entrusted. At that time, Kousuke was entrusted with his comrade's hope. The knights, they entrusted their hope to Kousuke. They kept him alive and let him escape, just him――



As the result, he could save his friends but, Emily……



Kousuke stared at Emily. She was hanging her head down, clinging on Kousuke while sobbing. At the side, Vanessa's hand reached out to stop Emily, but she saw Kousuke's face and her breath got caught unconsciously. Vanessa didn't understand how to describe it, it was a mysteriously transparent expression.



Kousuke gently caressed Emily's head. And then, to the surprised Emily, he spoke with a voice that was calm, and yet it mysteriously penetrated until deep in her heart.



「I'll become your strength.」



「……Eh?」



Emily slowly lifted up her disheveled face. Kousuke scooped the tear trickling on her cheek with his finger, and then he smiled with a troubled look.



「I'll become your strength. I'm not Mr. K though. But, surely, it will turn out well.」



「Mis, ter K――」



「It's Kousuke. Emily. I'm Kousuke.」



The tear on her cheek was gently wiped. It was like, the warmth of her brothers and sisters.



Emily was half in a daze while she repeated Kousuke's name「Kou, suke?」just like how she heard it.



Even Vanessa at the side was wide-eyed. Kousuke showed a grin that was full of confidence and declared.



「It will be okay, Emily. After all I'm――」



――The right-hand man of the demon king-sama yeah?



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 206




The time was at morning where the sun still hadn't ascent to the peak. The cool and clear cold air felt pleasant on the skin, and the east sky that was starting to grow light was gently to eyes. The sound of human activity began to be audible from the townscape of old alley that was made from brickwork here and there.



Although, as expected there was almost nobody walking outside. The only living thing outside was only a doggy with its head plunging into a fastfood bag thrown nearby the garbage box that looked like old drum can.



That doggy suddenly lifted up its head with a snap. The paper bag attached on its snout looked like a mask that covered its head. The doggy hurriedly shook its head left and right to shake off the paper bag.



Right after that, the thing that made the doggy reacted――a single car stopped right beside the dog with intense breaking. It made *kikit-* sound from its break which caused the doggy to twitch and ran away in full speed.



「Doctor Grant, Mr. K. This way.」



The one who got down from the driving seat was Vanessa. Her movement had sharpness in it that was unthinkable coming from a person who had gunshot in her side even if it had been given first-aid already. Actually, a medicine from another world was smeared on her gauze which displayed quite the restorative strength……but the person herself didn't know that. She was only thinking that「Oh my, me. I am more sturdy than I thought……」, like so.



「……Heey, is that stubbornness or something? Or else is that harassment to me? How many times I need to tell you that I'm not Mr. K until you get it?」



Kousuke was piercing Vanessa with an extraordinarily reproachful gaze while getting down from the backseat. Mysteriously, no matter how much he appealed that 'I'm not that up-and-coming assassin-san you know!', Vanessa still addressed Kousuke as Mr. K.



In her own way, Vanessa also thought「By any chance, this is seriously the wrong person?」just a smidgen but……last night, from Kousuke's behavior that said「I'll become your strength」, she then changed her mind that 'just as I thought he is really Mr. K'. Surely he was simply hating that nickname Mr. K, but there was no doubt that he was a virtuoso hitman, she thought.



And so, she unconsciously called him Mr. K. But unexpectedly words that backed-up Kousuke against Vanessa who was like that were spoken out.



「That's right, Vanessa. After all Mr. K had finally taught us his name. Let's properly call him, Ko, Ko Ko, Kousuke okay.」



Emily who was also at the back seat with Kousuke got down, but for some reason she looked shy. She advised Vanessa to call Kousuke with his name while stuttering. Emily also had the same thinking like Vanessa, that Kousuke wasn't an average civilian. She thought that Kousuke had taught them his name that was concealed by the initial. That was why, she thought they should call him with his name after he had finally told them.



Emily had strangely taken distance from Kousuke since last night. Kousuke himself was thinking「……Now I've really done it. Just what is right-hand man of demon king. She must be creeped out. That was just nonsense there. The Lord inside me, it damned peeked out its face randomly like that……」, he believed that Emily was surely thinking him creepy and put some distance between them, so he was a bit shocked with this cover fire of Emily and he smiled widely in joy.



Seeing that, Emily behaved in a strange way. Her gaze was intensely wandering to empty air. And then, perhaps something in her heart had reached its limit, her cheeks reddened and her almond-shaped eyes glared fiercely while she threatened「Don't look here!」. Her hairs stood on end *fusha―* as though she was the great haughty cat itself. Her trademark side ponytail turned unruly.



Kousuke felt down. On top of having a younger girl putting distance between their heart (Kousuke was thinking so), he was also told「Wait, can the chuuni bastard not look at me like that? It's seriously gross!」(That was how Kousuke heard it). The mini Kousuke inside his heart was already going 'orz'. (TN: orz = Watch the shape, it's like someone on all fours.)



「Excuse me, our situation is comparatively urgent here, so if you two can put off your youth's springtime for later……」



「The, there is no youth's springtime here! What are you saying!」



Vanessa was sending a lukewarm gaze at Emily even while she scratched on her cheek looking troubled. The redness of Emily's face turned deeper. Her *fusha―* ratio also rose up. She might let fly her cat punch before long like this.



As though to say that she couldn't associate more than this with the other two, Emily flapped her white lab coat that she still didn't take off even now and entered the alley with loud and fast steps.



「Doctor Grant.」



「What now!」



「It's not that way, but the next alley.」



「……」



Emily came to a stop still. And then she backed up without turning around before starting to walk with loud stomps to the left while she went red until her ears.



「Doctor Grant!」



「What now!」



「Not the left one, it's the right alley.」



「……」



A high speed turn. Her lab coat stylishly flapped! However, the shame of the person was already at max.



Vanessa and Kousuke looked at each other's face and smiled wryly at each other before following behind Emily.



By the way, this was one of Vanessa's personal hideouts, so Emily wasn't familiar with the area. And so, Emily who was leading in the front set off into unknown place until three times after that.



The wooden door opened slowly while making small sound *kii*. Vanessa's face peeked inside fully on guard from there. There was no sign of anyone inside the room.



Kousuke and Emily also entered into the room by Vanessa's urging. Inside the room, there were signs of someone living there quite much for a hideout. There was a table and a leather sofa that looked like they were often used, magazines were scattered randomly on the table.



「It seems my friend is away. Well, she is often going outside so perhaps this is natural.」



Vanessa who had just taken a quick look at the other rooms and bathroom returned to the living room while saying that. It appeared this hideout hadn't been discovered by the enemy.



「This is the room of Vanessa's friend? Isn't this a personal hideout that you created by tacit misunderstanding from security bureau?」



Emily tilted her head while recalling the explanation that she was give before this. Vanessa had lost her weapon. She was unarmed. After this she would need to do various things like contacting the headquarters and probed about the true intention of Chief Magdanese, but regardless of what she would do, first thing first she needed to procure weapon.



For that, they made their way to a hideout that Vanessa didn't report to even the bureau which she prepared based on the tacit understanding among the security bureau's staff.



「I am sharing this with my friend. She is a freelancer cameraman that is bustling about everywhere around the clock. We are sharing the duty for maintaining the room, so it works just right that both of us are similarly out often.」



「H~m」



While Emily nodded in understanding, Kousuke was taking a magazine on the table with his expression strangely convulsing.



「……I see. So the source of the prejudiced knowledge of Vanessa-san about Japan, is that friend is it.」



The magazine in Kousuke's hand who was whispering something like that. If it was a magazine that young woman read, then normally it would be something like fashion magazine. However, this magazine had this name written along with a picture of a girl that had colorful hair.



――Anim○e (TN: Animage)



When his gaze dropped further, every single one of the scattered magazines were things that were fully loaded with information of Japanese anime and manga he was familiar with. Inside the room there were several large bookshelves that were decorated with pretty cloth cover, but Kousuke obeyed his hunch and checked one of them.



As he expected, the content was packed full with Japanese comic and light novel and anime DVD.



「What do you think, Mr. K. My friend's collection is quite something right? By the way, the three bookshelves over there are my collection.」



「What are you hiding in your hideout……」



Emily passed with small run in front of the exasperated Kousuke and brushed open the cover of Vanessa's collection shelves. And then while saying「Hee, so this is Japan's subculture……」, she took a Japanese manga into her hand with deep interest. It seemed this was her first time seeing something like that.



However, it was an excessively thin book.



「Hinyaah. What's this!?」



Emily screamed, her face was bright red and she held away the book as far as possible from her face. The book's front cover, should it be said that it was immodest, or that it actually easily surpassed such expression, anyway the picture's skin exposure rate was too high, and on top of that there was the illustration of a girl making outrageous posture drawn on it.



「Aa, Doctor Grant. Please don't handle it so roughly like that. That's a treasure you know.」



「Wh, who cares about that-, pervert Vanessa!」



「Why do you even have doujin huh…..」



Emily swung around the thin book with her hand stretched out with all her might while moaning「Uu―」, doing her best so that it wouldn't enter her sight, but she didn't show any sign of letting it go. It was unclear whether she was simply handling it more or less carefully because it was Vanessa's collection, or perhaps there was some reason that made it hard for her to let go of it……



From how she was sending glances at the front cover, surely it was because of the latter. When she noticed Kousuke's awkward gaze, Emily made excuse「Tha, that's not it! I, I'm not someone like that!」while returning the book in panic to the bookshelves.



「Doctor Grant. If you have an interest to it, then after we take care of this case, I will lend it to you, so please be patient for now.」



「I'm not impatient or anything! I'm not a pervert! It's true okay? Kousuke, I'm really, really not like that okay?」



「Aa, yep.」



Kousuke who didn't know how to react when a younger girl was pleading to him「I'm not a pervert! Believe it!」could only nodded vaguely.



Vanessa sent a glance at Emily who was desperately making excuse for some reason before she suddenly approached one of the bookshelves. And then, she sent brief glances at Kousuke. She looked like a child that was going to show the toy she took pride in to her parents while saying「Look! Look!」.



Kousuke tilted his head while turning his gaze at that direction. After confirming that, Vanessa pulled at one book inside the bookshelves, a book titled『Chupacabra Encyclopedia』.



Right after that, the bookshelves was sliding. It made a half-rotation, showed its backside and returned to its original position.



「Se, secret bookshelves?」



Emily also turned her gaze at the bookshelves when she heard Kousuke's whisper. And then, her jaw fell down. There, many firearms were lined up orderly.



「Fufu, surprised aren't you? But, still not yet. It's still not over with just this.」



The very short haired beauty wearing black suits was making a triumphant look. While Emily and Kousuke felt complicated irritation to that face, Vanessa walked toward a bed that was inside a room and this time she twisted the lamp shade of the lamp beside it.



Right after that, the back of the bed sprang up and exposed the firearms stored behind it.



「What do you think? All these hidden armories were made DIY(Do-It-Yourselfer). I spent most of my holidays for this. I threw away all of the summer and winter bonus pay to prepare this prided arrangement of mine. Don't you two feel something seeing this?」



「Holy cow……. Vanessa-san, you, are really something.」



It was settled with this. Inside Vanessa-san's heart, there was a burning soul similar with Kousuke! The "Lord" inside Kousuke suddenly made a nihilistic smile. It came out a bit to the surface at Kousuke's act and speech, which Vanessa nodded at, her face looked like she understood what he felt for some reason. Emily was getting creeped out at the two of them!



Vanessa quickly chose her equipment and stuffed them into her holster and rucksack when she suddenly noticed something.



「……Come to think of it Mr. K. Are you okay with your gun? Like your bullets or the spare gun……」



That question came because thinking back really carefully, until now Kousuke didn't show any kind of firearm even once. Far from that, Vanessa who was able to decide whether someone was bringing weapon or not just from looking at the clothes' surface couldn't sense any presence of arms from Kousuke at all no matter how hard she observed. She thought that he was hiding his weapon really skillfully but……



「? No, I don't bring anything like gun though.」



「……Mr. K. Didn't you say that you will become Dr. Grant's strength? Its necessary for us to grasp each other's equipment. It's troubling that you are hiding your capability.」



「No, no, I'm not hiding anything. I'm really not carrying anything like a gun here. Or rather, I told you already that I'm a student in Japan. Please listen to what people said seriously. I'm not an assassin, that's why I don't bring any gun!」



Mr. K was an assassin that would corner all his targets into death with one shot to the head and one shot to the heart no matter who they were……. Vanessa was making a complicated expression, and not just her but Emily too.



Vanessa wordlessly approached Kousuke and began to pat all over his body. It seemed that she was performing a body check to confirm that he really wasn't carrying gun. Kousuke felt flurried inside his heart with the body touch that came from a pretty onee-san. For some reason Emily was hiding her eyes with both her hands saying「A, a, you even touch that kind of place!?」while in a cliched act she was peeking from her finger gaps.



「……You are really not bringing anything.」



「That's why, I told you that already.」



Vanessa took a step back while looking somewhat astonished. She made a difficult expression for some reason then she shook her head.



「I understand. You must have some kind of circumstance. I won't pursue it any deeper.」



「Oi, you. What are you doing convincing yourself like that as though assuming that I'm usually carrying it. I'm telling you that I'm never carrying something like that.」



「However, thinking of from here on, you also cannot be unarmed like that. I don't know what you are usually using, but please carry mine if you don't mind something like this.」



「……Like that it suddenly appear, this unnaturally natural disregard like I'm not here. I, know it. That on earth there is also an evil god like Ehito, and I caught his eyes when I was born.」



Kousuke made a dry smile at Vanessa who was giving him recommendation「Would you like Glock? Or would you like Beretta? Or else, would you like Desert Eagle?」while he averted his gaze.



「No, I don't need gun. It's meaningless even if I carry one. Firing them, well, I got experience before, but I couldn't hit anything at all with it. It's also dangerous. Seriously, that guy, just what kind of skill he got.」



It went without saying just who was "that guy" referred to. Kousuke recalled the time when he asked to be allowed to shoot a gun half playing around and he shook his head from the bad memory. After all at that time he got his face struck by the gun due to recoil, then the bullet that should be flying forward miraculously ricocheted and pierced his own buttock, the used cartridge that flew out in piping hot state entered into his clothes, and then when he tried to fire again and pulled the trigger, the trigger couldn't be pulled, but the moment he released his shooting stance to look for the cause, the gun discharged accidentally and it almost blew away his son on his crotch……



If there was a god of gun, then there was no doubt that he hated Kousuke as though Kousuke had killed his parents. Even that demon king warned him「You, don't carry a gun anymore. ……You are going to die, by self-explosion」with an expression that was a mix of fear and pity.



The confusion of Emily and Vanessa who didn't know about that circumstance was increasingly getting deeper. An assassin that wasn't carrying gun and made disgusted expression from the bottom of his heart when he saw a gun……. The words of Kousuke「I'm not Mr. K」raised its head high inside the two. However, at the same time, his confidence words「I'll become your strength」and his accomplishment of enabling them to escape before this forcefully pressed down that raising head with a single push.



Perhaps in subconscious level they were simply wasn't thinking that Kousuke wasn't Mr. K. If Kousuke wasn't Mr. K, then that meant that at that time, there didn't appear anyone that could save Vanessa and Emily who were surrounded by Kimberly's group, and that meant they didn't obtain the cooperation of the real Mr. K.



No matter how skilled Vanessa was, but she was someone who was still in the realm of newcomer, on top of that she lost all her reliable allies because of other ally betrayal. And in this situation where the organization she should rely itself was suspicious, she was also chased after by an organization of unknown scale. If in this kind of time what she thought as a trump card was actually just a throwaway card, then there was no way she would want to recognize that even though she understood that being optimistic was taboo in this line of work.



Kousuke put aside the bewilderment of Vanessa and Emily who were like that and spoke indifferently.



「Well, it will be fine. No matter what happen, I'll manage somehow. Rather than that, let's get going if you are finished with the preparation. Emily's house is really far from here right?」



Emily and Vanessa looked at each other's face after that urging from Kousuke to depart. Their bafflement still hadn't disappeared, but seeing Kousuke who declared that he had no problem being unarmed even though he understood that their opponent was an armed group, they decided to postpone their question for the moment. Or rather, it could also be said that they had no choice other than betting that Kousuke was the real Mr. K.



They had talked with each other last night, and they concluded that first they would head toward Emily's parents first. Securing and sheltering Emily's parents who were her weak point was an indispensable matter that had to be prioritized first.



However, Emily's home was a long way from their current position. It would take more than half a day using car. They would have to evade places with high possibility of being monitored like highway and so on. In that case, they would reach the destination around evening if they took taking rest into consideration even if they were taking their meal inside car.



「……You're right. My equipment is in order. Let's depart.」



「Okay. ……But, before that tell me. Vanessa, why are you bringing comic along?」



Vanessa excitedly finished her preparation, and then she returned the lovely secret bookshelves and secret bed back to normal. While she was at it, she nonchalantly pulled out several volumes of comic from the bookshelves. One she put into her suits' inside pocket, and the other were stored into the rucksack. Seeing that, Emily asked with her eyes twitching.



Vanessa's expression went puzzled as though to say「Eh? You don't get it?」. Both Kousuke and Emily got plainly irritated.



「Even if you asked me why……. After this, we will chanllenge an extremely difficult situation. So to speak, it's like a soldier heading to the front line.」



「Well, perhaps it's something like that……」



「Isn't that right? Then, it's normal to bring along comic right?」



「Why does it become like that!? I don't understand your thought process!」



Emily made a splendid retort at that incomprehensible logic. Seeing Emily like that, Vanessa made an expression that irritated Emily, as though she was a teacher facing a dim-witted student, and then she explained carefully and thoroughly.



「Listen, Doctor Grant. In movie or film, have you seen a scene when a soldier head to battlefield inside car or helicopter, they will take out bible and pray?」



「Ri, right. I've seen something like that before. ……Wait a second, in other words, those comics……」



「Yes. They are my bible.」



「Apologize to god! Apologize to the believer of Christianity!」



Emily howled. Grant family was also a believer more or less. And so, she couldn't help to make retort when someone talked as though bible and comic had same status.



Vanessa snorted「Fuh」at that retort mixed with protest from Emily and ignored it.「Why did you snort just now!?」Emily's cat eyes glared fiercely once more while she raised her voice, but Vanessa who was in perfect form left the room without breaking her attitude that seemed to say「The doctor is also still young huh」.



「……Shura no ○, Gra○ler Ba○, and then Na○to, to treat them as bible like that. In a sense, perhaps this is also Japan's karma.」(TN: Shura no Mon, Grappler Baki, Naruto)



The sun went down to the west. By the time the sky was starting to be colored vibrantly with orange, the car Vanessa was driving was running through a road that was extending straight forward as though the car was gliding.



Inside the car, Emily and Kousuke was satisfying their stomach with burger and fried potato they purchased from a certain famous restaurant that they visited midway.



「……Emily, what's the matter?」



Kousuke suddenly asked. Emily was eating her fried potato bit by bit like a hamster while her gaze was directed outside the window. She then turned her gaze at Kousuke.



「What do you mean?」



「No, it looks like you are getting faraway look there. You are tired?」



「Aa~, no. I'm fine. It's just, I'm really familiar, with this area. Seeing this, it feels that I really have come home. But, even though I had a lot of story to share when I went home before, but this time……something like that.」



It seemed that when she compared the current situation with the time when she went home previously, it caused a deep and heavy emotion to stir up her heart. Just like how the orange color of setting sun aroused loneliness in people without reason, it seemed that Emily's heart was also aroused with indescribable feeling by the scenery of her home town and the orange color of the burning sky.



Kousuke who knew about the gruesome circumstances Emily went through in these few days, hesitated about what to say back. He thought that he should say something, but he could only let his gaze wandered unable to find any good words. In this time, he became envious of a certain agitator who could spun words smoothly.



Emily made a faint smile at Kousuke who was in such a state. She then gulped up the drink in her hand in one go before she said one more time「I'm fine」.



Vanessa who was watching through the rearview mirror at the exchange between the two at the backseat, opened her mouth tactfully, as though to be the replacement of Kousuke.



「Excuse me, Doctor Grant……」



「Geez. Vanessa too, don't worry about me. I told you I'm fine.」



「No, I really cannot believe that. Doctor Grant. What is called limit, is something that will come faster than what we thought.」



Vanessa's unexpectedly serious expression could be seen through the rearview mirror. Emily's words unconsciously got caught in her throat. Kousuke was thinking「As expected from an agent of the security bureau. She also know various things about how to care to a person who is dragged into a case」while sending her admiring gaze――



「Is your urinary bladder, really okay?」



「What kind of thing you are worrying about there!?」



Of course, it was a worry about the dignity of the peeing girl Emily-chan.



「At the restaurant just now, and also at the gasoline station before that, I noticed that Doctor Grant didn't go to toilet. And yet, you were drinking two large size coke and coffee. I'm extremely worried whether you will get more wound like this.」



「Tha, tha tha tha, that's-」



「However, I cannot believe that Doctor Grant who has already done a severe failure for twice already will be so easy-goingly take an optimistic action like this. Doctor Grant……」



「Wha, whattt」



Emily was already turning small into half her original size while her wariness and shame were in full display. Vanessa's eyes shined glaringly through the rearview mirror at such Emily.



「By any chance, were you awakened?」



「Wha, what does that mean?」



The pure Emily-chan couldn't grasp the meaning of that question. Of course the young man beside her grasped the meaning. Vanessa asked with determination.



「To the pleasure of urination.」



「ARE YOU IDIOTTT――――!! There is no way I'm awakened to something like that!! Do you want to make me into pervert!?」



World Unknown to Emily Part 2. There was no way anyone would feel good from wetting their pant in public! If there was anyone like that, then that person was a pervert without doubt!



Of course, there was no way Emily had awakened to overly special pleasure like that. And so, Emily turned at Kousuke with a fretful expression and pleaded「That's wrong! That's completely wrong! I'm not that kind of pervert! Believe me, Kousuke-」.



「Ca, calm down. It, it's not like I'm thinking that you are a pervert or anything.」



「Really? Really, really? Kousuke is――」



Emily was about to say something. However, carrying out a beautiful intercept at that timing was how Vanessa Paradis roll.



「So Doctor Grant isn't awakened to that……it's unfortunate for Mr. K isn't it?」



「There ain't no way that's true! Don't make me into a pervert so naturally like that!」



「Ko, Ko Ko, Kousuke!? Yo, you are aiming for my "that"? You are happier if I'm a pervert!? That……that's troubling for me!」



「There is no way that's true! Why are you feeling a bit troubled like that!? What do you mean troubling!? You need to deny strongly there at all cost!」



Chaos maker Vanessa. She displayed that ability of hers without sparing any effort, driving Kousuke and Emily into the crucible of bewilderment!



「Fumu. Great difficulty is waiting ahead for us. It's better to be energetic like this. Both of you are full with fighting spirit there.」



「You, just shut up already!!」



「You, shut up already!!」



The retort of Kousuke and Emily burst out in harmony. Vanessa made an expression that seemed to say「Incomprehensible」by herself.



Giving up on Vanessa who was scattering word bombs so naturally like that, Emily was making justification desperately at Kousuke, while Kousuke was desperately soothing down Emily. During that time the scenery of the surrounding was starting to change entirely.



They entered into the town. There was high construction, but most buildings were giving off retro atmosphere.



「Vanessa. Follow this path to go across the town center and head to the north. A river will come into view after some time. There is also a restaurant that makes delicious pie nearby there. You will understand right away because they have cute signboard.」



「Roger. This is the first time I come here but……this is quite the beautiful townscape.」



There was chic building with brick color, and there was also glass building. But, those two types of building didn't mutually harm the scenery. It was as though the new thing and the old thing accepted each other, giving anyone who watched a gentle impression.



In this downtown at the time where the sun was mostly sinking, the local people had calm expression. They were strolling with relaxed pace on the stone paving while holding bag that was stuffed with food. The sight had a comfortable impression where they could slowly feel the flow of time.



And that impression became even more striking when they left the town center and entered the suburb. There was more greenery, houses in the same color and same style lined up in order, forming similar shape of shadow. Somehow, it felt like even the light of sunset also became gentle.



Vanessa ran the car following Emily's direction. In contrast with Emily who was somewhat restless with this long time homecoming, Kousuke was tensing his body in moderation. Of course, he was considering the possibility of an ambush by other force waiting for them.



But, in contrast with his expectation, he couldn't find anything like black car or the like parking nearby. They could see children noisily playing with lot of energy, and the figures of fathers, mothers urging them to return home soon with wry smile. There wasn't any sign of conflict, the area really looked peaceful.



「Ah, over there. That house with white van parked! The light is on. It looks like father and others are home.」



Emily leaked out a relieved sigh. The white van was the car Emily's father, Carl owned. It was a car that was bought as replacement a few years ago so that the grandmother, Syla who was using wheelchair could also ride car. They still hadn't finished paying the loan for this car. There was also a blue light motor vehicle parked beside it. That was the car of the mother Sophie.



Vanessa stopped the car in front of the house. Emily was going to rush out right away, but Vanessa halted her back. And then, Vanessa observed the surrounding's situation carefully from inside the car while sliding out her gun from her breast pocket.



「Let's be careful. I'll stress this to you Doctor Grant, please don't separate from me no matter what.」



「Ye, yes. I understand.」



Vanessa's hand reached the engine key and she glanced at Kousuke. Kousuke's usual light atmosphere disappeared and he looked around with serious gaze, but before long his expression turned perplexed.



「Mr. K. What's the matter? Do you see any sign of something wrong?」



「…………No, there is nothing wrong. There is none but……that's exactly why it feels wrong.」



「? What do you mean by that?」



Kousuke didn't answer right away at Vanessa's question. He stared for a while at the direction of the house. Emily's expression was tinged with shadow of anxiety seeing Kousuke who didn't seem normal. Endo shook his head and then he spoke with reservation in consideration of Emily.



「……Inside the house, there is no sign of people.」



「Eh?」



Emily tilted her head. Her parents' cars were parked, the lighting inside the house was also turned on. Those were the proof that the family was home. Despite so, there wasn't anyone inside. A bad premonition bloated up inside her heart.



On the other hand, Vanessa raised one of her eyebrows and her expression turned dubious. The "sign" that Vanessa mentioned before was something like any traces of fighting, or if there anyone peeking at them from the cover of building somewhere, or parking cars that looked out of place with this neighborhood, she meant about "human trace" that was visible to eye like that.



Just how did he know about inside the house that was out of sight…….



「Anyway, we cannot do anything from here. Let's try to enter. Perhaps they are only going outside a bit at the neighborhood.」



「Ri, right. Surely, it's like that.」



Kousuke noticed the anxious expression of Emily and so he urged them to quickly act. And then, he hurriedly got out of the car to move in the lead. Vanessa buried her doubt inside her chest from that action of Kousuke.



They crossed the lawn that was well maintained, went up the slope that was still looking like new from the renovation so that it could be passed through using wheelchair, and they arrived in front of the entrance.



Emily sounded the chime. And then she called「Father! Mother! Grandma! This is Emily! You there?」. However, as though to prove the correctness of Kousuke's words, there wasn't any reply coming from inside the house.



Emily too out a key of the house from her pouch, thinking that the door was surely locked if there wasn't anyone home. And then, she put in the key and was about to open the door……



「E, eh?」



The door wasn't locked right from the start. Even though this was a quiet neighborhood, it was impossible for the whole family to be out leaving the home not locked. Emily's cheeks spasmed.



「Father! Mother! This is me! You aren't here!? Grandma! Where are you!?」



「Doctor Grant! Calm down!」



Emily opened the door loudly and stepped into the house without being unable to contain herself. Vanessa hurriedly stopped Emily who was like that.



However, Vanessa's warning didn't enter Emily's ears. Her heart that was thinking of her family was in disarray from the abnormal condition of the house. She desperately supported her heart that felt like it would be crushed under unease and terror while running around the house. She did that while calling at her family. She wanted to say her usual "I'm home". She wanted to hear "Welcome home".



However, whether it was in the bright living room, whether it was in the kitchen where her mother was usually standing wearing her apron, whether in the bathroom, or in the second floor's bedroom, or even in Emily's room, there wasn't anyone at all.



「It, it must be a mistake. Everyone, they must be going out for a bit right now. Tha, that's right. Surely, they are going to Mr. McBurney's place, or at Aunt Hannah's place.」



「Emily.」



「Wait, okay. I'll call them back right away. And then, I'll properly introduce Vanessa and Kousuke to them――」



「Emily Grant!」



「-」



Emily was about to go out of the house with a dry smile. But Kousuke called her name with a strong tone to stop her. Emily twitched and stood still before turning around with a stiff movement like a machine that hadn't been oiled.



Emily's eyes were catching sight of Kousuke taking up a table that was put on the living room's table. It was something that Emily overlooked before. But, that item was definitely not Grant family's property.



The reason was,



「It's addressed, to me……」



Yes, the name of Vanessa Paradis was displayed on the screen of the tablet that was left in turned on state. There was no way Emily's family who didn't know about Vanessa's existence could prepare something like that.



In other words, this home was entered just a few hours ago, by someone other than Grant family members, someone who knew about Vanessa……



Emily's face went white. Her body unconsciously staggered unsteadily. Kousuki swiftly supported her.



Urged by Kousuke's gaze, Vanessa touched the tablet.



Then, the table projected the image of a room somewhere. The room didn't look particularly desolate, it was a normal room. There was a sofa with cloth cover and a wooden table. There was no one there. It seemed that the tablet was just put in place to take video.



But, a beat later, the door at the corner of the camera opened. What entered from that door were a wheelchair, and an elderly woman sitting on it. And then, a man past forty that looked somewhat weak-willed was pushing on that wheelchair. A woman about the same age was holding on the hand of that man while looking around restlessly.



「-, grandma-, father-, mother-」



Emily's voice echoed like a shout.



The people in the video didn't look like they would be harmed. However, from their expression and gesture, it seemed that were taken away without really knowing anything. However, even so it still couldn't make Emily who was watching the video to have a peace of mind. Emily looked at her kidnapped family and powerlessly fell down.



And then, the video cut off and the display became pure black. And yet when they thought that was it, slowly an image of a clock that displayed the time of a few hours from now appeared, next, a map from aerial photograph was starting to get displayed. It was a show that was like the embodiment of the bad taste of the maker.



「That place……looks like a warehouse district. They are screwing around.」



Vanessa spat out those words. Beside her, Emily was turning small by hugging her knees and head. She was getting flashback of the chain of events that should be called as her trauma, where she lost her important people.



Perhaps, she would also lose her family……that terror pushed aside the mission she was entrusted from her big brothers and sisters, and pushed her off into an abyss of terror and despair. She wanted to cry while begging, that she would listen to whatever they say, so please don't hurt my family.



A voice spoke to such Emily. That voice was soft yet harsh, warm yet sharp, that kind of voice.



「Emily, it will be fine. I don't know who did this, but there is no sign of struggle at your house, and there is no sign of violence on your family. Those guys want Emily's cooperation, so even though they can use your family to threaten you, they cannot hurt them that easily. That's because they understand, doing that will only push Emily past despair and into hostility.」



「Kousu, ke.」



Kousuke gently took the hand of Emily who was holding her head and softly pushed it down.



「Emily knows, the pain of being kept alive and let escape alone, and having something entrusted to you. If you stop here, then, surely the same thing will happen again.」



「No, I don't want that! Something like that, again-」



Emily raised her voice with her expression distorted in tears. Kousuke nodded「Right?」, then this time she pulled up her hand and made her stood.



「――"If there is a time where you must muster your all for once in your life, then now is exactly that time. Right now, in this time, blaze your soul"」



「Eh?」



「That's a second-hand telling from a friend. But, in the past, when I was going through crushing defeat, I was able to stand up one more time from these words. I was able to risk my whole body and soul against bunches of monster as my opponent. Thanks to that, I can be here right now.」



「Kousuke……」



Emily lost her words. That was just how "heavy" the words of Kousuke just now. They reverberated at the deepest depth of her weak heart profoundly.



Kousuke's sharp eye glint that looked like a veteran warrior pierced straight through Emily.



「For Emily Grant, surely right now is exactly the time to blaze your soul. Brace your legs, grit your teeth, and then yell until your lung burst. "Who is going to do anything that you say! Don't look down on me, you shitty bastard!" Like that.」



Those were passionate words like a boiling magma. Kousuke's gleaming eyes were still piercing through Emily.



Therefore, there was only one reply Emily could make.



「Yeah. Yeah!」



Her soul that almost sunk into the swamp of despair, now, it blazed up once more. Emily strongly clasped back the hand of Kousuke that was clasping her hand.



「Kousuke, will also lend me your strength right?」



「Yeah. That was what I told you. I'll become your strength. Emily's family, let's save them for sure.」



Emily's eyes shined like a starry sky. The distance between the two was so close they could feel each other's breathing. It was as though that was the current distance between their heart――



「……Should I read the mood and go outside? Or else, should I cut in saying "Don't forget me, pleazeee"? That is the question.」



Vanessa muttered.



In a time when the curtain of night had fallen completely, the darkness of night of a warehouse district at the outskirt of town was cut apart by a car's headlight. The car that was carefully advancing slow and quiet soon entered a spot that was surrounded from four directions by tall buildings.



The headlight illuminated a black car ahead.



Vanessa, Emily, and then Kousuke got down from the car with the headlight still turned on. Vanessa walked at the front with Kousuke and Emily following behind. Emily was cluthing the sleeve of Kousuke's clothes tightly.



The black car at the opposite side turned on its headlight as though to oppose their side. A person got down from the black car in front of the vigilant Vanessa. The person's figure wasn't clear due to the backlight's backlighting, but Vanessa could make it out vaguely.



And then she thought. 「Aa, so it's like that just as expected」. At the same time, she also thought「It will still be better if it's Kimberly」.



「Agent Paradis. You really have put us into much trouble. By all rights you should get a disciplinary discharge you know?」



That figure walked with clopping footsteps and showed themselves. It was a reality that if possible Vanessa wanted to deny.



Chief of national security bureau――Sharon Magdanese, it was this person who appeared.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too, desu.





Chapter 207




「How do you do, Doctor Grant. I am Sharon Magdanese, the person who is entrusted with the chief position of national security bureau. I will bring you into a safe protected place. Now, this way.」



Chief Magdanese prompted as though it was only natural that the situation went like that. In the middle of where the headlights of the two car collided against each other in rivalry, the door of the black car for the backseat opened, from there the analyst Allen Parker and one other male agent climbed down.



Allen was spreading both his hands widely in an exaggerated posture, as though to say「Noow, you were scared right? Jump into my chest!」. Although for some reason the tip of his nose had a large gauze affixed there, he cut a really painful figure, or a stupid one.



「What do you mean "protection"! How dare you brazenly say that after kidnapping my family-」



The gesture that was too impudent caused Emily's boiling point to be reached instantly. By all rights she should behave modestly in consideration of her family's well-being, but right now she could depend on a reliably boy regarding that. Emily was able to honestly raise her voice in anger that she even surprised herself.



Chief Magdanese showed a really troubled bitter smile at Emilly who was like that.



「Doctor Grant, it seems that you are under a really great misunderstanding. There is no way that we the people of security bureau will do anything like a kidnapping. We are only safeguarding everyone of the Grant family.」



Chief Magdanese talked with a tone and attitude as though she was admonishing a child that was throwing tantrum toward Emily who reflexively was going to object.



She meant to say, that they secured Grant family in order to protect them from the organization that annihilated Hughes and other agents of security bureau. The tablet that they left behind would only react to Vanessa's fingerprint, without her other people wouldn't be able to grasp the information in it. It was valid for them to be at the side of Grant family to make contact with Vanessa and Emily who cut off contact with the bureau. In the first place the bureau had approved the adoption of the protection program, so they had planned to move in order to take them into protection since the beginning.



「Bu, but……」



Emily was at a loss for words after receiving the logical explanation. Vanessa took a step forward in place of such Emily.



「Chief, can I ask a question?」



「Refrain yourself agent Paradis. Your skill in protecting Doctor Grant by yourself is worthy of evaluation, but you are acting too arbitrarily on your own. Even though there was the attack of Warren and others, you should be able to get in contact with us more frequently.」



The knife-like words of Chief Magdanese cut off any argument with a single stroke. Her eye glint was also pressuring with several times the intensity compared to the usual. However, Vanessa who normally would falter in panic inside her heart against this instead took a further step forward and displayed her will with action.



「……Do you understand, what are you doing right now?」



「Yes. I understand very well. Until my question is answered, I won't lower down this gun.」



Yes, Vanessa was aiming a gun at Chief Magdanese. Her gaze was sharp and showed that she wouldn't draw back even against Chief Magdanese. Her will of determination was emitted from her whole body. Allen whistled「Hyuu~」behind Chief Magdanese in admiration. The other agent also gulped down his saliva.



「This won't end with just disciplinary dismissal.」



「I'm resolved for that.」



Chief Magdanese stared fixedly at Vanessa for a while, and then she sighed a bit. It was unclear what kind of meaning that sigh had……. A complicated expression flashed briefly on Chief Magdanese's face while she urged Vanessa to continue with her gaze.



Vanessa opened her mouth with her gun still aimed vigilantly.



「Why are you, the chief herself is in this kind of place?」



「I lost five agents that I sent to execute the protection program, where one of them is that Hughes. And then, the culprit is also an agent from security bureau……if this is leaked outside, surely the media will be jumping wildly in joy. Furthermore, seeing how this is related to【Berserk Case】that greatly agitated the world then it will be all the more true. This case is already the biggest case even among the cases that security bureau is currently facing.」



「Are you saying, that it's not strange for you yourself to come out?」



「Naturally. To say nothing of how we currently don't know how many people there are inside the bureau that are like Warren, or, more accurately those under the patronage of the organization behind Warren. The optimal solution is for me to move myself.」



That explanation had consistency. There was double agent coming out from the bureau, on top of that there wasn't any time to clean up the organization right now, under such situations it could rather be said that it was a heroic decision for the top herself to take action accompanied by her few trusted subordinates.



Chief Magdanese sent Vanessa a cold gaze that said「Finished already?」, however Vanessa didn't avert her gun even now.



「Then, one more question. What caused Berserk to be scattered in the research building was because of the dispute between Kimberly against someone to contest the possession of【Berserk】. According to what Kimberly said, that someone was a skilled person in the level that even he couldn't match.」



「……And?」



「An organization that possess an operator skilled enough to handle Kimberly whose combat ability is high even in security bureau, it knows about the existence of【Berserk】, and the operator came to steal it at that timing. And then, naturally that operator belong to an organization that is different from Kimberly's. There is only one organization that I know that fulfill all those conditions.」



「Are you insinuating that I ordered for【Berserk】's usurpation?」



「Am I wrong? Kimberly who attacked me hinted of that possibility.」



Chief Magdanese shrugged with an expression that seemed to say how worthless this talk was.



「Don't tell me, that you are accepting the words of a betrayer seriously? If that's actually the case, then I can only doubt your qualification as an agent.」



「Putting aside my qualification, there is no doubt that you chief is under suspicion of ordering the attack. Please answer. Was it you chief, the one that gave the order to steal【Berserk】?」



Vanessa's gaze pierced Chief Magdanese through her gun's aim. From the beginning Vanessa didn't think that she would receive honest answer. Therefore, with the determination to challenge her superior who should be regarded as a monster that had shouldered a bureau of Britain for many years until now, she concentrated to fathom the truth or lies.



But, as expected from the living legend who shouldered the national security, she wasn't someone common. Her face didn't change a single color even against Vanessa's sharp gaze and the fact that a gun muzzle was pointed at her. To the end she opened her mouth with naturalness, it even made anyone who heard her voice to feel her exasperation as though she was facing a problem child that wasn't obedient.



「The answer, is No.」



「……Is that, the truth?」



「Proving something that I haven't done is like proving that devil exist. If you are telling me to show the proof, then you have no more qualification to introduce yourself as the bureau agent. In the first place, why do you think that I have to the order to steal【Berserk】?」



Certainly, for the security bureau that didn't know how Emily and others planned to escape, it was a done deal that Emily and others would come to them. Even if the chief didn't intentionally order the stealing, the security bureau should be able to obtain everything, whether it was the【Berserk】, and the creator Emily, and also the antidote that Emily would create.



Therefore, it could be said that Chief Magdanese had no need to secure【Berserk】at that kind of timing.



The sources of Vanessa's doubt were all circumstantial evidences, her own instinct was also playing a large part in it. In the end, Vanessa who was self-aware of that could only attempt to thrust all those facts before the chief to try to shake her and then saw through the chief with her own eyes.



Vanessa couldn't say anything back. She focused her eyes to try to see through the truth, but Chief Magdanese wasn't shaken even for a bit. Vanessa was starting to doubt her own instinct……could it be, that the first attack was really caused by a completely different organization?



「Are you finished with your question? Then, Vanessa Paradis, you will need to be restrained. Don't tell me, that you are thinking you will be able to continue in your post after pointing a gun like that to me?」



「That's……」



Chief Magdanese raised one of her hand. The agent that was standing by beside the black car walked forward wordlessly. It appeared that he planned to restrain Vanessa.



Emily raised her voice seeing that.



「Wait! Vanessa did that only for my sake! Even until now, she has been protecting me all this time! That's why――」



However, that pleading was silenced forcefully by Chief Magdanese's eye glint.



「……Doctor Grant. I wish you can stop with your childish selfishness too. Have you thought about how many sacrifices that appeared in this case you are involved with?」



「-, that's……」



「You are a prodigy aren't you? Well, perhaps that is only limited to a specific field but……I wish you can have the discernment to know right from wrong when it's actually necessary. I have the authority to have you restrained as the person who created【Berserk】and make you create the antidote. After all this is a situation that threaten the security of the country. But, in that case the protection of your family won't be included in it you know?」



「Such thing-. Didn't you say, that you are giving safeguarding them properly――」



「Yes, that's because of our good will.」



In other words she meant, that if Emily planned to complicate this case, then the security bureau wouldn't safeguard Grant family. And then, Chief Magdanese would restrain Emily with the authority possessed by national security bureau and forced her to research the antidote. Most likely, even if Emily took this matter to the court, it wouldn't go through. After all, this was a case that threatened the national security just like Chief Magdanese said. And Emily wasn't a third party in this, but she was literally the origin of the case.



Vanessa lowered down her gun. Her instinct was still ringing the alarm bell loudly in doubt of the security bureau. However, there wasn't any hole in Chief Magdanese's logic. Shea also couldn't detect any sign of lying. And then, even Emily was also feeling that she was only being outrageously selfish after hearing Chief Magdanese's words, her shoulders dropped. Her anger deflated when she was told that her family wasn't kidnapped or anything.



Chief Magdanese sighed as though to say how troublesome all of these were and she was about to turn around. In her place, the agent walked forward to restrain Vanessa and took Emily into custody.



There, a voice suddenly came into hearing.



「Don't you think it's better for you if you read up again what is the meaning of the words good will in dictionary?」



It was an aloof voice that didn't match the place. Even though the voice wasn't raised too loudly, but it resounded with extreme clarity.



Every single people in that place were taken aback without exception. Vanessa, and Emily who was emotionally standing beside her quickly turned around so fast their momentum could make whoosh sound.



「……That reaction. That hurts you know. Why are you all looking like『WHO-!?』like that? Even Emily, even though you were holding on my sleeve until just now.」



Kousuke twisted his lips into shape of 'へ' in dissatisfaction. Vanessa and Emily averted their gaze awkwardly. There was no way they could say that they had completely taken off their mind from Kousuke who was right behind them and they were plainly shocked just now. Although, Kousuke had completely seen through that already from their reaction.



「……Who are you? It seemed that you were hiding inside the car?」



「No, no, I got down the car together with Emily there! When you were questioned by Vanessa-san, I was also standing normally behind her!」



「……」



Chief Magdanese's dubious expression! Kousuke was wounded further! But, he was used to it so he was fine!



「Answer the question.」



For now Chief Magdanese ignored Kousuke's retort and repeated her question. Kousuke simply ignored her order and replied back with a really "nice smile (complete with vein on the forehead)".



「It doesn't matter who I am right? Rather than that, stop lining up pretentious statements and bring Emily's family here right away. No matter what you are going to talk about, everything will only start after you do that, right?」



「A foreigner boy like you, do you know who you are talking――」



A cold air that was incomparable with before struck from Chief Magdanese. But, even when Vanessa was reflexively sweating coldly from that, Kousuke only deflected it away in stride. So what if she was an authority of a country. Compared to the god apostles that were smeared with inhuman killing intent or the pressure of the demon king that was lacking in even a speck of mercy, this woman looked like a puppy making a menacing look.



「Something like the words of someone who was behaving worthlessly to fan up the talking partner's anxiety, no matter how consistent it sounded like, it cannot be trusted at all.」



「Fanning up anxiety?」



Chief Magdanese tilted her head as though she didn't know what he was talking about. Seeing that caused Kousuke to replace his expression into a cold one.



「Wasn't that what you did? What the hell with that message in the tablet. Don't tell me that it was just for keeping it a secret from other people. Stop it already with the stupid excuse. After all if you want to make contact with Vanessa-san then there are so many other ways to do that.」



They could simply leave behind a single cellphone that was filled with only one contact number to call at. There were many ways to make Vanessa to make contact with the bureau. Even if the one that made the contact wasn't Vanessa, then that could also be a chance to investigate just who they were facing against. There wasn't any need to expressly leave behind the video recording of Emily's family in that way.



They were leaving that kind of message, they were taking that kind of method was in order to carve a message in Emily's subconscious. That if they felt like it, then they could do anything they liked to her family. That they were still safe for now. All those was to make it easier for the scale in Emily's heart to tilt to one way when she was approached with option that was putting on the face of protection. To instill into her what was the pecking order in their relationship.



Kousuke understood that, he understood just how much Emily was worrying for her family, he had already heard from her of her feeling that didn't want to lose her important people anymore for the second time.



Those were why, the voltage of Kousuke's anger was rising up without stopping.



「Even now you are acting like that. You dare putting on air as though everything is Emily's fault. The one that caused this case the first time, and then everything after that, all those, they are all the fault of the stupid idiots who got their eyes blinded by greed. The scramble for that thing that was created accidentally and even dragged in the important people of this child, those are the doing of some other stupid idiots somewhere. Don't get mistaken here. This child is the victim, not the perpetrator.」



Of course, she had the responsibility as the creator of【Berserk】. That was why Emily was here. She even had the option to hold her head down and turned small, and waited until everything was over like that. But, she resolved herself, that there were things entrusted to her, that there were things that she had to do no matter what, and so she was standing here.



「She is still sixteen you know? And yet, she lost her important people that were like family to her, and she was also not allowed to meet her blood-related family……and against a child like that, here you are fanning up her anxiety and guilt. I absolutely cannot trust someone like that.」



「……」



Kousuke's aloof words were mixed with anger in them. It was unthinkable that this was the man that was forgotten even by Vanessa and Emily until just now. Something that couldn't be ignored by any means was oozing out from him. Chief Magdanese was staying quiet, however her body was facing straight toward Kousuke. That attitude of hers was the proof of the existence of that unidentified pressure.



Kousuke walked forward passing through Vanessa and Emily. And then, he stopped walking when he reached in the middle between Chief Magdanese and Vanessa, and then he asked without looking back.



「Hey, Vanessa-san, what is your instinct is telling you? Who cares about logic. Your heart that has been protecting Emily wholeheartedly until now in any kind of situation no matter what anyone said to you, what is it telling you now about that woman?」



Vanessa's gaze wandered around. However, even that was only for a moment. She responded with a cold expression, as though to cut off her hesitation.



「My instinct says, that she is black.」



「Isn't that right. I also think so.」



Kousuke's gaze shifted quietly from Chief Magdanese and he casted his gaze to behind her.



「In the first place, just what is the woman who was sending her shitty subordinate, one that pointed his gun at Vanessa when we escaped from the hotel, is saying at this late hour?」



Kousuke's gaze flowed smoothly toward Allen.



「Eh, m, me? What are you, saying so suddenly……I'm just a humble analyst――」



「Don't play dumb, gauze man. Is that your true face? Your disguise is pretty good. But, the scar from my ashtray attack isn't something that can be treated somehow right away isn't it?」



「I really don't understand what are you talking……」



「I'm not merely bluffing or just guessing. I remembered your presence. That's why, the hoodlum standing in our way that time, that was unmistakably you.」



The analyst with gauze on his nose, Allen Parker's gaze was wandering around in bewilderment. He was muttering「Oh maann, really, what is this about……」, but Kousuke lost interest already and he took off his gaze from Allen. Behind Kousuke, Vanessa believed Kousuke's words and now she was making a questioning face, about why was a mere analyst was present in that hotel.



Chief Magdanese sighed once more.



「……And, you cannot believe me, so then what will you do? As you know, the organization of Kimberly will be chasing after Doctor Grant mercilessly. They won't even care how many sacrifices will turn up from the surrounding.」



She implicitly declared that in the end, they had no choice but to obey the security bureau. Normally that was how it would be. An organization could only be opposed by another organization. That was the reason why Vanessa was trying to ascertain the true motive of the chief.



Just what could one agent and one foreigner boy do only by valiantly speaking sharply?



「I'll protect her then.」



「……What did you say?」



Chief Magdanese reflexively asked back after she heard those words that were said really casually. That was natural. Even though the speaker was a boy from Japan that was often said to be peace idiot country, but that big talk was really far away from reality. There was a limit even in being out of place.



However, Kousuke didn't show even a speck of shame or looking like he was drunk with the situation, he continued his words matter-of-factly.



「I said that there isn't any problem. It's fine if Emily carried out her duty through the path that she decided herself. Together with her family. Of course, the best thing would be if the security bureau "respectably" give her protection without doing any messing around intervention. Even if we cannot obtain the backing of you guys, there will be no problem. It doesn't matter, I won't let anyone be a nuisance. Whether it's Emily, or her family, I'll protect them with my all.」



「……It seems that you are getting in a little high spirits after experiencing boy-meets-girl. I wonder if you have been watching movie too much?」



Behind Kousuke, a girl was pressing on her chest saying「hauu-」as though she was shot through by something. Chief Magdanese gave that a passing glance with an exasperated look on her face. Seeing that, Vanessa objected with a self-assured gait.



「Chief, he isn't a normal boy you know? At the very least, if he become serious then the like of one analyst and one agent won't be his match. In addition, he excelled in information war and can assassinate any kind of opponent. Chief, you are not an exception.」



「……It looks like you evaluate him really highly, Paradis. And so? This boy who no matter how I see it is nothing more than a dreaming boy that misunderstand himself as a main character, who are you saying he is?」



Vanessa made a smile that while small was clearly a fearless smile, and then she spoke her greatest trump card.



「He is the one, who got his name recorded on the blacklist of the security bureau just from a few years of activity――Mr. K.」



'That's why, don't do anything imprudent. Protect Emily and her family properly. And when she finished the antidote, dispose all the【Berserk】that currently exist. Promise us that.' Vanessa conveyed that. 'I don't know what kind of ulterior motive the chief has, but concentrate only to resolving this case' She meant.



Vanessa returned threatening words in response of Chief Magdanese's similarly threatening words. For a moment Chief Magdanese showed an expression as though she was looking at a surprising scene, but at the next moment she sniggered.



「……What is so funny?」



Vanessa's gaze sharpened in irritation. Chief Magdanese's shoulders trembled seeing that.



「No, you headed toward the house of Grant family on your own accord, you pointed your gun to me, there are many of your actions that were really self-assured. I was wondering just what was up with that, but to think that the basis of that confidence is "Mr. K" of all thing. Well, though certainly you were contacting Mr. K, so perhaps it's understandable for you to mistake that boy as him.」



「What are you saying――」



「He is not Mr. K.」



Her trump card was laughed at, and in the end it was denied decisively like that. Vanessa became speechless. She was about to argue back just what was the basis of her saying that.



Chief Magdanese showed a gesture as though she was thinking of something for a moment, and then she answered with a gaze as though she was looking at something pitiful.



「Paradis. You see, Mr. K is a member of security bureau.」



「……Eh?」



Vanessa's eyes turned into dot in incomprehension. Toward such Vanessa, Chief Magdanese continued her words slowly and thoroughly as though to grind her hope into dust.



「It's natural that you don't know. He is a staff that is outside the law. ――【JD(John Doe) Agency】. Intelligence bureau and security bureau, these two large organizations of our country oppose the dangerous and disturbing people and organization inside and outside the country. But JD Agency is a non-existent organization that extends over these two organizations. The members are all called with alphabet or number.」



「Bu, but, Mr. K, he is an assassin――」



「Yes, that's why I told you didn't I? That it's outside the law, and non-existent.」



Vanessa was speechless. Of course she would. After all the organization she belonged to was carrying out murder outside the boundary of law. It was truly like the world in movie. How darkness was an unavoidable part in a huge organization.



And then, this information that was originally known only to the highest class of leadership other than the chief was now disclosed here, it was in order to break the heart of Vanessa and Emily. In order to convey to the two of them that the bureau wouldn't pull back, they wouldn't let them get away. In order to display the mightiness of state organization.



「It was a surprise that you made contact with Mr. K separated with your contact to the headquarters. Because it was an unthinkable method to be taken by you who are still young with sense of duty and justice more than others even if you usually endeavor to be cool-headed. Although, even though I dispatched him to give back-up to the two of you, for him to be taken out by a passing by ashtray……I wonder if your ability ought to be reassessed, what do you think, Allen――no, agent "K"?」



Chief Magdanese looked behind and stared with a pressuring gaze that even emitted killing intent. Ahead of her gaze, was analyst Allen.



Yes, just as Kousuke said, the man that fainted due to the ashtray throw when they escaped the hotel, and furthermore got his crotch stepped on by Vanessa, was Allen in disguise. At the same time, he was actually Mr. K who received Vanessa's request for back-up. The reason that Mr. K who was supposed to be assassin, agreed to receive the work of being Emily's bodyguard was now said here.



「The, then, Kousuke, is……」



Beside Vanessa who was astonished from catching a glimpse of the organization's darkness, Emily muttered with trembling eyes.



Allen was walking forward with table in hand while shivering from Chief Magdanese's gaze. He had been operating that tablet all along right after he confirmed Kousuke's presence here, and the result of that seemed to be the answer of Emily's question.



「Chi, chief? Certainly I have been continuously committing failure in these few days, but that's because I'm an assassin, everything other than that is like outside of my specialty, can you see……that's why, what I want to say is, please don't be so angry……」



「Shut up, incompetent.」



「Yes, Ma'am.」



Allen who got the tablet snatched from him dropped his shoulders dejectedly. Chief Magdanese's gaze moved toward the information Allen gathered. There, the face photo of Kousuke that was taken from who know since when and his photo in the airport a few days ago were projected. And then, Kousuke's age and nationality were calculated based from the passenger list and Kousuke's true identity was pinned down.



Even though Allen was calling himself an assassination specialist, but as expected his skill as analyst was super first class. He was famous as an assassin that was strong in information war, but it seemed that fame wasn't merely because he was backed by security bureau.



「Kousuke Endou. Japanese, 18 years old. Born from a really normal family, a really normal high school student. Are you traveling abroad using your winter vacation? ……My, you are one of those "returnees" that agitated the world previously. I see, so you aimlessly traveled like this and poked your nose into this case. That baseless confidence of yours, I wonder if that is because of your optimistic thought that you will be okay this time too because you had come back once from that disappearance?」



Vanessa and Emily were shocked. Sometimes they got the thinking「Is he really a virtuoso hitman?」. He couldn't drive a car. He didn't bring gun, far from that he even said that he couldn't shoot properly. And above all else, the atmosphere he was clad in was too light. To the degree that saying that he was really a student from Japan fitted him to a tee.



Even so, they thought that he was Mr. K because they could cut their way through the assault in that hotel thanks to him. And then, the expression that that he sometimes showed them made them got the expectation that "as expected he really is the one".



But, it turned out he was really just a student from Japan.



「That's why I told you two many times already. I'm not Mr. K. You two didn't believe me at all……」



Kousuke looked behind with a wry smile. Chief Magdanese announced to such Kousuke.



「Mr. Endou. I'll consider that nothing happen if you just go home now.」



「Hee. You don't think that I will blabber about JD Agency or that various other things?」



「Just who will believe that kind of story when it's a Japanese boy who is telling it? Stop putting on air like you are a main character in a tale already.」



Right after that, a single gunshot rang, and a bullet gouged the ground near Kousuke's feet. Allen said「Sorry, okay」while firing so fast his gun drawing movement was unseen. That was the last warning. If Kousuke didn't turn around and run away with his tail between his legs here, then there would be news report about how a Japanese boy met an unfortunate accident in his travel.



That was conveyed to Kousuke really clearly. But,



「Well, I cannot go home though.」



「Are you still unable to look at reality?」



「No, I'm aware of it. ――There are thirty two armed men. They are lurking inside the buildings around us and completely surrounded this spot. I know at least that much.」



Chief Magdanese's expression changed for the first time since coming here. Her eyes opened really wide with her shock laid bare. Even while she was like that, Kousuke's gaze ran through places like a building's window, the shadow of a street corner, behind a pillar, and so on. ――All those places were the spots where the special squad of the security bureau's assault section was hiding themselves based on Chief Magdanese's arrangement.



「You are moving personally, bringing only those two because you have no one you can trust. That was what you say, but it looks like you are bringing really a lot despite of that.」



「You are……」



Chief Magdanese's words got caught in her throat when she saw that piercing eyes of the person that should be just a student. Her preparation for the worst case backfired on her. Faint indication of agitation leaked out from the surrounding. Allen who was standing at the side narrowed his eyes slowly with his frivolous act thinning down.



The night breeze felt like it was growing warmer and damp. Even after seeing through the squad's position, Kousuke was still not showing even a fragment of agitation, his hands were still inserted inside his pockets with composure. He then said.



「I'll say it one more time okay. You cannot be trusted. And then, in this three-way fight, the enemy of the enemy actually can be trusted more than you. After all that hint from Kimberly is spot-on. The shitty bastard that infiltrated the research building and dragged this child's important people into their death, it's that Mr. K over there. Just now, he said that he already failed continuously.」



「……I also said this before. There is no need for me to do something like――」



「The talk about motive? Something like that is not important. If it's reason then I can imagine many. It can be to use it as weapon, or for pursuing profit, or because of the country's decision, or maybe it's for your own greed……」



Chief Magdanese stared at Kousuke for a while. And then, she suddenly lifted up her hand.



Right after that, the members of the special squad showed their figure all at once. The muzzle of their machine gun that could shoot in full-auto was aimed at Kousuke. At the same time, Chief Magdanese gave an order through the wireless on her collar. Her command was to bring the people of Grant family here.



「In order to protect the large ship that is the country, there is time when evil is necessary. There are opponents that law or negotiation cannot do anything against, and yet something still has to be done against them to protect the large ship that is the country. The incarnation of that necessary evil, is the JD Agency, this Mr. K. 【Berserk】is also like that.」



The gaze of Chief Magdanese caught Emily.



「I wonder if you know how many personnel, how many soldiers died in the battle against terrorist each year? If we can turn captured terrorists into mad monster to send them in as the substitute of those noble people……just how useful that will be. How can we save the noble life of our country without paying any sacrifice. However, surely Doctor Grant won't be able to understand that.」



「That's why you tried to steal【Berserk】itself while making her create the antidote?」



「Correct. Because Doctor Grant seem to hate【Berserk】, there is a possibility she would build some kind of bug in the data through the process of researching the antidote. It's necessary to secure the original drug. There is a necessity to have at hand the antidote that the girl creates voluntarily and unaltered【Berserk】. Next if the girl dispose【Berserk】by herself, we can just advance the improvement of the drug by ourselves using the stolen data.」



But, even that farce would end here. Now they would force Emily to improve【Berserk】for the sake of the country. Rather than making antidote, she should make the control drug for【Berserk】. And then, what would be used to motivate Emily was her family that was taken hostage.



Emily's face turned pale. She must be imagining the future where【Berserk】was put to use as weapon. And then, she also imagined one other thing at the same time. The reason why Chief Magdanese was starting to talk like this.



Chief Magdanese's gaze returned to Kousuke as though to prove that.



「This too is a necessary evil. You know too much about this case. This is incomparable with something like gossip about state organization that doesn’' exist. It will be a little troublesome if you talk about Berserk to the media that is currently heated up. The cost of getting carried away with boy-meets-girl like this is a costly one. This time, you cannot be a "returnee" anymore you know?」



「Run away Kousuke! I'm sorry! I'm sorry to drag you into this! Quickly run away!」



「Kousuke-san……my apologize.」



Emily yelled. Even while she understood that it was already impossible, even so, she couldn't help herself from yelling. Vanessa tried to rush at once, but she saw the red lights of laser pointer showering her body and her movement stopped reflexively. And then, when she saw Kousuke who was similarly covered with red points of death like her, she spoke her apology with expression that was colored by regret and guilt.



Seeing the two who were like that, Kousuke who had death thrust before himself was,



「Don't be so worried like that. I told you right, I'm not Mr. K but……I'm the right-hand man of the demon king.」



Kousuke's face couldn't be seen. His face that was slightly looking down was hidden by his forelocks. Like that, it even looked like he was assaulted by fear of the fate that would happen to him after this, where he looked like he would crumble down anytime. But, even while he looked like that, his voice that spoke back to Emily and Vanessa resounded pleasantly like a gentle breeze.



And then, hearing Kousuke saying something like "right-hand man of the demon king" now that the event had reached this point, Chief Magdanese sighed thinking that this was a pitiful boy who was living in world of delusion while she was about to give the signal for the execution,



「Hey, chief-san.」



Her attention was diverted for a moment from Kousuke addressing her. And then, she noticed how her own arms were getting goosebumps without her noticing it. Toward Chief Magdanese who was feeling doubt about her own state, those words softly reached her.



――Emily's family, they still haven't arrived yet?



Feeling taken aback, Chief Magdanese spoke into her wireless, questioning just what were her men were doing. *zaa- zaa-* After listening carefully to the grating sound from the wireless that felt excessively eerie for some reason, an impossible voice replied back.



『Just now, they resigned from their duty. For the chief who has business with them, please do over your life again from beginning after the beep sound.』



She understood even through the wireless. That voice was unmistakably the voice of the person who had been talking with her until just now. It was impossible. How could the voice of the young man that was here in this place could come from the communication device of the personnel that she was sending to monitor Grant family?



She couldn't comprehend it. A chill was creeping up her spine like worm. Chief Magdanese was slowly raising her gaze from the wireless on her collar while feeling terror――and then, she saw.



With his expression still hidden by his forelocks, only Kousuke's mouth was splitting wiiiidely. It was as though she was looking at the crescent moon shining in the sky tonight.



「You dogs of the state that sing the praises of necessary evil. Are you prepared? Are you resolved? If not then you better hurry. The abyss is already here.」



Chief Magdanese was feeling a terror that was like a black ink painting out her whole consciousness while swinging down her arm half unconsciously.



It happened at the same time with the appearance of "that guy".



「Now, it's showtime.」



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



He is coming, that guy, he is cominggg



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 208




AN: This chapter became long, so I split it into beginning and end parts.



I will upload the later part in one more hour.



「Do it!」



Chief Magdanese's command that unusually sounded like a shriek was handed down. The elites lurking in the shadow showed their loyalty without even the slightest lag even though they were agitated from having their existence discovered.



Storm of death swept from all directions along with thunderous roar. Muzzle flashes flickered in the darkness of night as though to color the victim's journey to the next world. Bullets cut through the air mercilessly and arrived at their target through the shortest distance.



「KOUSUKEEEEEE-」



Emily's shriek resounded along with the thunderous roar. In her eyes were reflected the figure of Kousuke whose body was rocked by overwhelming violence like a badly made marionette. His body was pierced countless time, and when the body was going to fall down, the storm of lead from the opposite direction would strike and made it stood up.



There was not the slightest ground for doubt, Kousuke was definitely pierced by several hundred bullets in front of everyone at that place.



However,



「He, doesn't fall?」



「Aha, haha, this is really a harsh joke. ……Why, is there no blood flowing?」



Vanessa murmured in astonishment, while Allen had his expression twitching grandly. Just as they said, Kousuke was still standing in the middle of ground that had been desolated and pierced by bullets.



The shooting was finished. Was it stopped because the loaded bullets ran out? Or else, was it because the elites who shouldered the country's safety shrank back from the manifested bizarreness? In any case, silence filled the area, as though all living things were holding their breath.



A beat later,



「It's over already? Then, next is my turn.」



The mutter that came from Kousuke who was hanging his head destroyed the silence. And then, the moment everyone opened their eyes wide thinking「Impossible」, an even further irrationality assaulted their brain nerves and common sense.



*pon-* Such light voice that could be called as stupid sounded, and Kousuke's figure vanished along with slight smoke!



「Where are you looking at?」



「Gueh!?」



Everyone in that place directed their gaze toward the direction of those words and the shocked voice raised by Allen that was mixed with pain.



There, they saw Allen who without anyone noticing was lying on his face, his body stepped on by Kousuke above him. One of his hands was inside his pocket with his upper body slightly turning away, while the middle finger of his other hand was pinning down on the sunglasses that had been on his face without anyone noticing when he was putting it. Sunglasses, even though it was night! Sunglasses, even though it was night!



「What coolness!」



「Vanessa!?」



A shout of joy that sounded out of place was spontaneously raised. The side tail-san beside the voice owner goggled in surprise!



「You-」



Perhaps it should be said that it was just as expected from the real Mr. K. Even in this situation, the shadow of the country that was bestowed with license of killing still showed a movement that would make anyone who saw to have a chill on their back. He pulled out a small gun hidden inside his sleeve with his wrist's motion and fired at Kousuke while still lying face down.



What was terrifying was that the fired bullet was soaring toward Kousuke's head accurately even though it was shot from that kind of posture. Normally, if someone was abruptly fired at from that close, that person would immediately travel into the next world, but……



「Oops, you are really energetic there.」



Kousuke smoothly tilted his head while saying those words and the bullet rushed through toward the sky in vain. Allen didn't show even the slightest bit of agitation of having his attack evaded and wasted no time to pull his trigger in succession.



However, the bullets didn't even graze Kousuke. He only tilted his upper body slightly and evaded all the bullets with paper-thin difference. His figure that even looked blurred in double and triple layers was just like the agent in Matr○x!



「Don't tell me, your sight can follow the bullets!?」



「Naturally. As long as this "Heavenly Eye" given by my friend is with me, any kind of attack won't be able to escape from my perception.」



*kaclick-* That kind of sound rang from the trigger. Allen's bullet ran out. Kousuke sharply pushed up the sunglass artifact that was enchanted with "Lightspeed" and "Foresight".



……By the way, the creator of this artifact didn't give it a name like "Heavenly Eye" or anything.



The agent and Chief Magdanese returned to their senses and fired toward Kousuke. Kousuke maginificently danced in the air. Using a somersault with form that could even be called as beautiful, the bullets from the two passed through below Kousuke in vain.



「Don't just stare stupidly like that! Finish him off quickly!」



Chief Magdanese's order released the squad members from their petrified mind. They attacked Kousuke from all directions once more with barrage of bullet that was like a heavy rain.



「Fuh. Nice killing intent. But, it's not enough. It's not enough at all to catch this abyss without form!」



Kousuke said such thing while speedily evading the approaching bullets smoothly. He then finally took out a weapon. Before anyone noticed his hand was holding a jet black short sword that was unknown just from where he took it out from.



「Don't take your eyes off, from mine power of abyss! ――Purr, "Demon Sword of Destroyer Calamity Crawling the Earth".」



Kousuke called out some kind of chuuni name while leisurely caressing the blade of his short sword. When he did that, black light that could be mistaken as the night was starting to envelop the jet black short sword! And then Kousuke stabbed that short sword into the ground.



In a moment, the ground instantly bulged out and covered Kousuke completely. The surrounding ground became an omni-directional protection that blocked the bullet.



「――"Doton - Saryuu no Shiro(There is No Hope of Touching the Abyss)"」(TN: Earth Escape - Castle of Sand Bump)



Kousuke's words resounded the moment the ground bulge completely closed. Those words had no meaning, This was important so it needed to be said twice, those words had no meaning. If it had to be said further, the name of the short sword and the gesture of caressing the blade were also meaningless. So far as it went, the magic circle of the short sword artifact wouldn't activate without chanting, so it was necessary to say something, but if the user had to chanted the name of the short sword and the skill name each time, they would be turned into swiss cheese by the enemy.



And so, the ground was already started bulging by the time Kousuke said "Pu" from the "Purr!".



Then, why did Kousuke chanted the meaningless skill name……



Of course, because it was cool!



「Do, Do Do Do Do, Doctor Grant! Did you hear!? Just now, he said "Doton" you heard that!? What to do!?」



「What to do is my line there! That's not what you should be surprised with! The ground was suddenly moving you know!?」



「That was Doton skill so the ground moving is only natural isn't it!? Just what are you talking about! Rather than that, Kousuke-san was using "Tonjutsu" (TN: Ninja art of escape)! Aa, how can this be! He is, he is――a Japanese ninja!」



「I don't get what you mean!」



Vanessa was so excited that it seemed her character was breaking down, and Emily was desperately making retorts back. The members of the special squad were giving them a glance while losing their patience of how bullet wasn't working. They then took out grenade.



The grenade directly hit the mass of rock while at the same time making stupid sound *poshu*. Fierce thunderous roar resounded and the mass of rock was instantly pulverized, its fragments were scattering everywhere showily.



「He isn't there!?」



「Watch out at your surroundings. This is a trick! That guy is using trick! Don't get lead astray!」



The person who seemed to be the captain of the special squad spoke loudly and gave words of warning. The squad members whose mind was painted out white by the supernatural phenomenon that was happening repeatedly were recovering their calmness from the word「trick」the captain said as temporary explanation.



Although, when they collected themselves, it didn't change that what happened before their eyes wasn't any trick or mechanism, it was a genuine "mystery" where any explanation was futile. Therefore,



「Gaa!?」



「Gueh」



One of the troops hiding at the third floor near the window whirled in the air. It was as though he was ran over by a truck from behind, he cleared through the window and was blown away to outside. That was how it seemed, but at the next moment, from the fourth floor of the opposite building, the troop that threw the grenade just now shot out like a human bullet in spiraling motion, and crashed into the opposite troop whirling in the air with graphic sound.



The two crashed at each other midair and fell toward the ground. Right underneath them was the figure of Allen who was pulling himself back together. Allen tried to dodge right away. But,



「From the bottom of earth, the dead captures――"Doton - Naraku no Jigoku(The abyss seize thee)"」(TN: Naraku no Jigoku = Prison of hell.)



「Wha-」



Allen's ankle was caught. The hand thrusting out suddenly from the ground was seizing Allen. The abnormal situation that was like a horror movie caused him to feel shaken, even so he immediately attempted to shake off the hand, but he only felt pain from being caught tightly as though by a vise and the hand didn't even twitch.



And then, right after that, Allen was dragged into the ground just like the words of the resounding voice. The ground wasn't paved by asphalt or anything, but it was a hard ground that couldn't be easily dug by human strength, yet regardless of that, he was buried from his waist below into the ground without any resistance, as though he was swallowed into a smooth quicksand.



「Shit-, what is this――gueh!?」



Allen thought that his whole body might be completely swallowed under the ground like this, but unexpectedly he was dragged only until his waist before the pulling strength was gone. At the same time, the surrounding ground also recovered its former hardness. Allen struggled and hit the ground, but the next moment, he was crushed under the falling two fully armed men and he shrieked like a flattened frog.



「Serves you right! Mr. K, serves you right! Doton rulez!」



「I beg you, please come back Vanessa! I really like the usual cool you!」



Vanessa turned toward Allen who vanished from view due to being squashed by the two troops that appeared to have fainted, then she pointed while going 'hyahhaa―'. While Emily was making retort with teary eyes, chaos and scream resounded from inside the buildings surrounding the open space from four directions.



「Shit, what is going on!?」



「Just where is he aiming from!」



「Be careful of friendly fire――gua!?」



The troops of the special squad were cursing while their gun muzzle was wandering in doubt. But, they were unable to catch sight of their formless enemy(Kousuke). They sometimes caught something like black shadow at the corner of their eyes and at the nook of their mind, but the moment they turned their gaze there, the splash of their comrade's blood would fly from completely another direction or they would get blown away like a joke.



「The stillness of the dark night is splendid. Don't you think that something like the sound of explosives is boorish for it?」



「Wha-――gih!?」



*hyuu-* Wind blew, right after that a troop got the tendon of his hands and feet cut and he collapsed.



「You feel it don't you? The cold yet gentle arm of darkness.」



「DAMN YOUUUUUU-!?」



The smooth sensation of caress on the nape caused a troop to have gooseflesh through his spine. He cursed while drawing out handgun without delay and shot behind him, but what he felt was hot touch caressing his four limbs instantly.



「Don't you know, there are things in this world that you ought to not know. Do you know what I mean? Yes, it's me.」



「This-, monster――」



There should be his partner beside him shooting his gun desperately. Yet, what was standing there was only a black shadow. Where did his partner go? Why, didn't his comrade back him up? Without even any time to speak out such doubt, one more troop had his consciousness fell into the bottom of darkness together with hot touch that he felt on his limbs.



「What is this……just, what is happening……」



Chief Magdanese muttered in blank amazement. The thunderous sound of shooting in full-auto, consecutive muzzle flashes, and then scream and angry roar reverberated from all the surrounding buildings. Her gaze ran through the buildings around her as though she was a country bumpkin looking up at a skyscraper. She took back steps with shaky footsteps.



This was impossible. Even if Kousuke was skilled, this was strange.



How could troops get blown away from her right and behind at the same time when a troop was thrown out from the building at her left? Was enemy removal being carried out in all the four buildings surrounding this place?



Kousuke was alone. The enemy should be one person. Even if the enemy possessed strange fighting technique using trick, but it was only this fact that should be certain.



「Who in the world you all are fighting!? The enemy number!? All teams-, report!」



Chief Magdanese raised an angry voice. Normally there should be concise and swift reply coming back to her.



The moonlight was hidden behind a small cloud and darkness swept the area. The headlight illuminated her as though she was an actress standing alone in the stage. Replies returned at Chief Magdanese who was sweating coldly.



『This is Beta 2. The enemy's identity is unclear. The shadow, the shadow is attacki――』



『This is Delta 4! I don't know! I don't know anything! Shit-, my partners are disappearing!』



『Alpha 3-. The enemy is a Japanese young man! That guy is a monster-! The bullets-, the bullets cannot hit-. I can see him-, yet it's not hitting!』



Reports were screamed from the communication device. *DADADADDADADA-* The voice of the troops that were dyed with panic mixed in the interval between the unceasing sounds of gunshot. Not a single one gave a clear report that Chief Magdanese could comprehend.



『All troops, get outside! For a circle!』



A harsh voice that was tinged with dominating aura resounded from the communication device. That was the command from the captain of the special squad. The troops obeyed that voice as though it was their lifeline. They all jumped out from the window simultaneously without even a glance, without even thinking of the consequence, wishing only to take distance as far as possible from the terrifying something that was lurking in the darkness inside the room.



The troops that jumped out from the second floor took skillful landing posture that was as expected from trained operative, they sprang up to their feet and rushed to Chief Magdanese's side. The people who were at third floor and higher descended down to the ground by using stair's handrail, window frame, and so on to decrease their speed, but the dread filling their chest threw out their limbs out of kilter and more than half of them struck the ground and writhed there.



Even so, they were dragged by their comrades to gather around Chief Magdanese and the formed a circle formation around her. They aimed their gun at the surrounding buildings with desperate look. They strained their eyes toward the window they jumped through just a moment ago while desperately holding down their rough breathing that was unrelated with the exhaustion of their stamina.



Inside the window was dark as though all light was being sucked in. Surely even if they were told that it was a hole that connected to the realm of the dead, the troops would easily believe it right now. Their gun muzzles were busily wandering around, searching for the enemy, which displayed the state of their heart. Surely in their heart, there was also the ashamed feeling that they had left behind inside that darkness many of their comrades with whom they had shared joys and sorrows with.



The personnel of the special squad that was at first more than thirty people were already decreased until seventeen people, including Allen who somehow managed to crawl out from the ground and the agent that was standing by beside Chief Magdanese.



It hadn't been even five minutes since Kousuke vanished. In just that much time, a platoon of the special assault squad owned by the state's organization was pushed into a partially destructed state.



The sound of breathing that couldn't be pushed down resounded. The sound of rustling clothes from roughly wiping out the sweat that was flowing from reason other than heat resounded. No one was making any voice. Even Allen who often joked around was desperately searching for the enemy position with his wandering eyes. Even Chief Magdanese was also feeling cold sweat trickling from the tip of her jaw while her gaze looked around from the center of the circular formation.



There, a strange sound resounded.



――clop, clop



It was footsteps. Footsteps were echoing in the world of night that was ruled by silence.



――clop, clop



But, there wasn't anyone that could react to those footsteps. No, to be more accurate they were reacting. However, aiming their gun when they learned the enemy's position by hearing――wasn't the reaction they made.



――clop, clop



The expression of everyone was twitching. Because the sound of footsteps resounding in their ears right now was coming from an impossible place. Their gun muzzle was clattering. It wasn't because they didn't understand who they should aim at. The assaulting terror finally caused the tough elite squad troops to be unable to repress the trembling of their fingertips.



――clop, clop



Slowly, teasingly, the footsteps reverberated in the dark night. *gulp-* Sound of swallowing saliva pierced the ears clearly.



Chief Magdanese sighed deeply. And then, she slowly lifted up her face toward the place where those footsteps resounded from, to the place where the owner of the footsteps seemed to be at.



「――Impossible.」



That mutter where it felt like the soul of the speaker also came out at the same time with it, made the other troops, and Allen, and then Vanessa and Emily to lift up their gaze too.



「Once again, good evening, ladies and gentlemen. Don't you think that tonight is a really good night?」



There, a man in black was standing.



That black outfit was darker than even the darkness of night, as though it gave anyone who saw it a hallucination that the black of night was melting into the outfit. A mask hid the mouth, completed with a sunglasses of one-lens type. In one hand was a mysterious black short sword that gave anyone chills.



His voice resounded with echo that conveyed night of night, and darkness of darkness. Absolute confidence and domineering aura dwelled inside it, however, at the same time, it contained dread that tightly held the entrails of heart.



At midair, footsteps echoed on invisible stair, like a ruler that was descending from his throne. Behind his back, was a beautiful crescent moon that looked like the sneer of the devil. A step, a step, that figure that descended from the night sky to the lower world while making darkness colored ripple under his feet, was truly an existence of myth.



「I like the crescent moon better than the full moon. It's not so bright that it will drive away the darkness of night, however, it garnish this wonderful darkness with color. Its shape that draws an arc looks like the smile of the goddess of night.」



He――Kousuke was looking down on everything, with an exaggerated gesture like a stage actor, he spread his hand as though to embrace the whole night, however, seeing no one replying back he shrugged his shoulders. And then, he slowly made a rotation, he turned his hand that was holding the short sword to behind, and his other hand propped up his sunglasses, he drew back his left foot a bit.



By the way, that rotation, and also his chuuni pose, of course, they were all meaningless.



「You……you, just what in the world, are you?」



As expected from the chief of the security bureau. Chief Magdanese asked Kousuke's true identity while everyone were at lost of words and fell into stupor seeing the impossible situation. The situation was too abnormal to be dismissed as trick. In the end, was it really okay to classify the man that was making pose midair even now as mankind……



That question came from such doubt.



In regard to that, Kousuke's answer was,



「"What are you"――I believe that question ought to be asked to all of you instead.」



「What, do you mean by that?」



Chief Magdanese returned a sharp gaze even while feeling perplexity. To that, Kousuke twirled in a rotation once more, and then, he pushed up his sunglasses with one hand while at the same time he threw his head back a bit with the tip of his short sword pointed in sharp motion.



「O guardian of the country. It's exactly as you said before, there are few things that can be protected using beautiful ideal. Without the resolve to dirty oneself, what is waiting ahead will be a trampling down.」



The eyes of Chief Magdanese turned round from Kousuke's words. She didn't even imagine that he would make a statement that affirmed her own words. It seemed that Vanessa and Emily were also similarly shocked from that. Emily was still wholly shook up without being able to get back on her feet from her agitation, and Vanessa opened her eyes widely from the shock that she received.



「Just feeling is insufficient. Nothing can be done without resolve. Trying to resist fate without dirtying one's self, something like that cannot even become a funny story.」



Those were heavy words. Even though they didn't know anything about this young man, they understood that he had gone through tremendous experience. They understood, how it had been engraved into his flesh and bones.



「One has to choose what they ought to protect. One has to persist in carrying their own will, surpassing the distinction of good and evil. To wish for everything, that is only possible for someone who transcend the extremity of that will.」



To protect the great ship that was the country from the ill will and hostility that lurked all over the world, was impossible with just law. It was impossible to resist with only right conduct and beautiful ideal. By the point of time someone cursed that the other was cowardly or the worst, what they lost wouldn't come back.



To "protect", was a next to impossible undertaking more than human could imagine.



Therefore, Kousuke didn't deny. The hidden face of this country. The act of the non-existent organization that was called JD Agency. If there was things that couldn't be protected without such existence, then that was inevitable.



However, still, however.



「Even so, there are things that one mustn't throw away.」



Yes, that was why Kousuke was here. He was here, with his blade unsheathed. He unleashed the technique and strength, that he obtained at the end of deadly combats, along with bitter experience, at another world.



「The humanity and justice in one's soul.」



Those must not be forgotten. Even if the body was dirtied with necessary evil, the soul must not get rotten together with it. If not, then the necessary evil would someday be degraded into mere evil.



「The faith in one's heart.」



The people had faith in them. That they would protect the safety of this country. That faith must not be betrayed. If that was betrayed, than the whole foundation would be shaken.



「The sincerity in one's resolve.」



Their established resolve, their oath, those must be carried on faithfully. The moment they made compromise, that resolve would run wild, and bared its fang even toward those that it ought to protect.



Just like the current situation.



「O guardian. Is Emily Grant not someone that you also ought to protect?」



「……」



Chief Magdanese didn't answer. Or possibly, she couldn't answer.



「She was born in this country, raised in this country, live in this country. A girl like her, isn't she someone that you ought to protect? Necessary evil――I won't reject that. But, in the end, is Emily someone that ought to have such thing pointed at her? Cornering someone who is desperately doing her best, a girl who wish to create a remedy of an incurable disease, is that the national safety you are talking about?」



Hearing Kousuke's question, there were people who made complicated expression among the special squad troops, there were even people who were obviously looking guilty. The expression of Chief Magdanese didn't change. Right now, she was staring straight at Kousuke without any discomposure.



Kousuke also stared back at Chief Magdanese as though to wait for her answer. Still in his chuuni pose.



Just how long they were like that. Before long, Chief Magdanese sighed, and quietly opened her mouth.



「I too, am the dog of my country. I feel no self-depreciation or regret of that. Not to mention hesitation, I have none of that. ……I have, made my determination already.」



That was her answer.



Allen sent a sharp gaze that only lasted for a moment at the captain of the special squad and the agent. The captain of the special squad tensed his jaw slightly, at the same time, the agent slightly moved back.



Kousuke sensed it. They were planning to make Allen and the special squad into disposable pawn, in order to evacuate Chief Magdanese from this place. The agent intended to rush until the car to bring Chief Magdanese to escape.



Should that be admired, or be exasperated at? What made Kousuke hesitated in making conclusion, was how lacking Allen and the special squads troops in hesitation. In order to let their boss got away, they accepted their end without even a moment of hesitation.



「Is that the resolve and sincerity of you guys?」



They would coerce a girl of their own country, in order to protect the people of the country. Despite Kousuke's opinion that it was putting the cart before the horse, that was the answer of the security bureau. They knew only too well of that, even so, if that was what their homeland decided, then they wouldn't hesitate. For that, they had made the resolve to put their life on the line since a long time ago.



Chief Magdanese spoke.



「About the research building, that was a sorrowful miss on our part. We were also unable to detect the betrayal of Kimberly, and also how the students of Down classroom were going to raise a commotion. ……It was my misjudgment to make Allen infiltrate by himself.」



She had never expected that the bodyguards safeguarding Berserk had been replaced by Kmberly's accomplice. At that time Allen caused the alarm to sound because the reaction of the bodyguards that was different from the usual trained agent, and he completely got taken by surprise by the unexpected conduct of the fake bodyguard agents.



「I have no excuse for that.」



「Such thing, even if you say that-」



Emily was enraged hearing that apology which was directed at her. She questioned whether this woman planned to beg for forgiveness only with that one sentence. Did she know understand just how great what had been lost due to her action.



But, it seemed that in contrast with her sentence, Chief Magdanese didn't have even a speck of intention to ask for forgiveness. Her eyes were still cold even while receiving Emily's rage right from the front.



「All of you, this is an order. Carry out your duty.」



「「「「「Yes, Ma'am-!!」」」」」



Chief Magdanese drew back. At the same time, Ellen rushed out from the circle toward Emily while the agent turned around toward the car. The eyes of the troops shined with their last killing intent and they were about to pull the trigger at Kousuke midair.



It happened at that moment.



*tan-, tan-*



Two gunshot sounds resounded faintly.



「Muh」



「-!?」



Those didn't come from the special squad. It also didn't come from Allen.



One shot splendidly drilled on Kousuke's flesh, and the other shot pierced through one of the troops while gouging Chief Magdanese's left shoulder.



Chief Magdanese collapsed from the impact with splash of blood scattering. And the, Kousuke fell to the ground in an arc trajectory.



「KOUSUKEEEEEEE-」



「KOUSUKE-SAN-」



Emily and Vanessa screamed loudly.



「Chief-」



「-, protect the chief!」



The sprinting Allen made a turn that disregarded human's body structure while raising a voice that exposed his agitation and uneasiness for the first time. With the command of the captain of the special squad, several of the troops used their body to cover Chief Magdanese as shield and dragged her body toward the wall.



Emily and Vanessa dashed toward where Kousuke was falling. Emily embraced Kousuke with an expression that could break into tears anytime, and together with Vanessa she pulled his body to the cover of car.



The second wave of attack didn't come. It seemed that the sniper became unable to take a line of fire. Even so, everyone there stayed still while staying on guard to the surrounding. Kousuke's body was limp without any movement.



It was unclear how long time passed. Perhaps it was about a few dozen seconds. The captain of the special squad gave a glance and saw that the first-aid to Chief Magdanese was finished, and he was about to order them to move out, but several lights cut through the area.



Those were lights from car headlight. And they didn't come from merely one or two car. More than ten cars were rushing at them with fierce speed.



Several of the cars arrived with a drift before stopping and took position that encircled the people of the security bureau and Emily's group. The cars were all stopped horizontally and blocked any path of escape.



Vanessa and Chief Magdanese scowled their face from having a certain person coming to their mind from seeing this method that was repulsive yet cunning.



It seemed that their expectation was right on the mark.



「Yoo, honored chief Magdanese. How envious for you to have a clandestine meeting outside the city at night. Let me join in too, okay.」



「Kimberly.」



The one who got down from one of the cars was Kimberly who was sporting a really disgusting smile. With that as the start, dozens of armed men also got down from the other cars. They didn't look trained like the special squad troops. They looked more degenerate and violent, if it had to be said they were fellows that looked like mafia members.



Allen and Vanessa tried to move nonchalantly. But, as expected Kimberly gave no opening and sharply noticed them.



「Whoops, both of you, don't move from there. Especially the analyst-kun. You are bad news after all. Just try it if you move even for just a bit. I'll slaughter everyone without mercy.」



Kimberly commanded his men to release their weapon's safety. Although, the people who had resolved to die just now wouldn't obey that instruction that easily, both of them glared with their gun muzzles raised even with that overwhelming difference in battle strength.



「Well, guess so. There is no way the chief will comply that simply. No matter what you are the "cornerstone of Britain's protection" or "the iron woman that married Britain" huh. What's more you also got strong bad luck.」



Kimberly shrugged while watching Chief Magdanese's left arm that was oozing blood. And then, he turned his gaze at the reason why he didn't kill Chief Magdanese and everyone else here right away.



「So, chief-sama. Just what the hell is that?」



At the end of his gaze was the limp Kousuke who only looked like unmoving corpse even now, and the figure of Emily who was embracing such Kousuke.



「The elites of security bureau assault section was half-destroyed under a few minutes. What's more, he unveiled amazing technique like floating in the air. When I heard the sniper's report and watched the recorded video, I thought my eyes gonna popped out of their socket y'know.」



Kimberly's gaze left Kousuke and wandered to the air. 「Well, there must be wire or something put in the air」It seemed that he thought what Kousuke did was a trick from those words that he said.



Although, even though he was a traitor but he was formerly a member of security bureau, because of that Kimberly knew how powerful the assault section was. It seemed he wanted to know the reason how a group like them could be cornered into devastation helplessly like that. That was the reason why he let the troops stayed alive even now.



Chief Magdanese distorted her expression cynically at such Kimberly.



「There is no way I know what that is. That is……yes, it's "something" that human knowledge doesn't reach. According to that thing's words――he is the right-hand man of the demon king, something like that.」



「Demon King's, what? Just what kind of joke that is huh. That's――」



――Calling me "that", "that" from some time ago, that's a little bit impolite isn't it?



A voice suddenly reverberated echoingly. Kimberly and his groups were taken aback and they looked around the surrounding. Chief Magdanese shook her head with an expression that looked a bit tired while saying「Aa, just as I thought」.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The later part will be uploaded in one more hour.





Chapter 209




AN: This is the later part of two parts.



For those who come here directly from bookmark, please pay attention.



*kii kii* Such small sound resounded. That was the sound of wheel. At the same time, multiple footsteps also echoed.



The sound came from the building behind where the car of Chief Magdanese was parked. Everyone focused at the steel door of that building.



And then,



「Fumu, Mr. Carl. About the wheelchair of Syla-dono, don't you think it needs maintenance? It's making this kind of sound each time it moved. It's causing various anxieties hearing it.」



「A, aa, no, I planned to bring it to give it maintenance just today you know? I, isn't that right, honey?」



「Yes, tha, that's right. But, just when we were about to go out, the people of security bureau came so……」



「I see. That's impolite of me. I have acted impertinently there.」



The people that came out from the opened door while making normal talk were a middle-aged man and woman who were making twitching expression. There was also a woman who was definitely passed seventy sitting in a wheelchair that was pushed by the man. It went without saying that these were Emily's family. And then, a man wearing sunglasses and black outfit was walking in the lead of them.



「Father! Mother! Grandma!」



「-, Emily!?」



「Emily-」



Hearing the shout of Emily that was filled with joy, the father Carl and the mother Sophie called back the name of their beloved daughter without being unable to hide their happiness. It seemed that the grandma Syla was sound asleep. Perhaps Kousuke had done something to her. Surely he had judged that this hectic situation would be harmful for her who was afflicted with Alzheimer.



The two parents had been told about their daughter's current situation to a certain degree. And so, they were about to rush toward Emily driven by their worry and the joy of reunion.



But, because of the pressure of the armed men that was standing between them and their daughter, and the ominous sound *kaclick* that came at the same time with the gun muzzles moving toward them immediately, they stumbled and came to a stop. And then, blood was leaving their expression when they saw the scene of the men that really resembled mafia, the personnel of security bureau who looked cornered at near the wall, and then, the collapsed person who their daughter was holding in her arms.



They now painfully understood the situation. The terrifying situation their daughter was confronting, it was different from the explanation of the security bureau that was a mix of truth and falsehood. They grasped just how dangerous the situation their only beloved daughter had been placed in.



It was in the middle of that, a dumbfounded voice resounded.



「Thi, this is a joke right? He, should have been sniped……」



It was Kimberly. At the same time, what he spoke represented what was in the mind of everyone there.



But, the right-hand of demon king exaggeratedly shrugged his shoulders saying「Good grief」to the crowd that was a hindrance to the family reunion, completely unconcerned with that kind of question of bewilderment. And then, he suddenly formed a handseal with both his hands. Yes, he formed a handseal! As though, just like a NINJA! Just like a NINJA!



It was unknown just where was the expression that was worried for Kousuke just now had gone, the female investigator that might be beyond hope already yelled「Handseals come-―――!!」while she desperately tried to copy it. It seemed that she was trying to memorize the handseals. But, the girl lacked a certain bloodline eye, on top of that Kousuke's handseals that were super complicated and super fast due to its lack of meaning weren't something that could be copied just from a glance.



'Your level is insufficient!'The handseals didn't really have any meaning, but with a glance those words were whispered toward Vanessa-san who was grinding her teeth.



「To disturb the family reunion like this, what a really boorish bunches. ――"Kuuton - Banji Saikuu(I exist, in the desired spot)"」(TN: Air Escape - Air Reside in the Whole Earth)



Something like black mist instantly whirled around Kousuke, but right at the next instant, Kousuke disappeared, and not just him, but the whole Grant family too. In their place, the corpse of Kousuke that was inside Emily's arms until just now appeared! And then, right after that, the corpse vanished with *pon-* sound as though it had accomplished its role!



「Thi, thi thi thi thi, this iiis!? Mikawari no Jutsu!? Isn't this Mikawari no Jutsu, Kousuke-san!」(TN: Mikawari no Jutsu = Kawarimi no Jutsu/Substitute Technique)



「It's a little bit different. Naturally I can also use Mikawari no Jutsu, but Banji Saikuu is something that is not limited to just myself. It designate things within a certain range around me and replace them all with my clone body along with the space. Fufu, this is a more advanced technique.」



In response to the yell of Vanessa who was in a state of 'Excitement Climax!', Kousuke answered while brushing up his hair with 'fuh'. Kimberly and the bureau staffs come back to their senses from hearing the exchange of the two, and when they turned their gaze at that direction, there were the figures of Kousuke and Grant family that had teleported at Emily's side unnoticed.



「Wha wha wha, what happened thank god Emily! You are safe!」



「Emily, you are not hurt just what happened!?」



「Ca ca, calm down mother, father! You two are safe I am also confused here!」



Grant family was in a state of 'Bewilderment Climax!'. The parents and daughter hugged each other while showing quite the skill where they were rejoicing with their reunion while acting bewildered at the same time. The grandma opened her eyes a tiny bit saying「My? Is it morning already?」, but she soon went 'munya munya' and went to sleep again. What a grandma.



「Impossible, what kind of trick is that. Is that thing just now a puppet!?」



Kimberly raised an angry voice in half-panic, trying to find an explanation that his understanding could accept.



Toward such Kimberly, and then also toward the armed men and Chief Magdanese's group, Kousuke suddenly lifted up his right hand to the sky and opened his mouth.



「Puppet? Ku-ku-ku-. Certainly, you can call it that. Isn't that right――right me?」



Kousuke waved his lifted up right hand elegantly as though he was an orchestra conductor while making a finger snap *pachin-* and pointed at the right building. There,



「Or, you can also say that it is a dream, or an illusion, or even darkness. ――Front me」



At the window in the right building's second floor, a man in exactly the same appearance appeared as though he was oozing out from the darkness. The Kousuke that was called as "right me" then stepped out to the empty air without any hesitation, and walked down on the air while spreading ripples that looked like black miasma.



「At the same time, it's a reality, a counterfeit, and also a real thing. Right, ――left me.」



Kimberly and others turned unbelieving gaze at the right building, but right after that the same voice resounded from behind them this time. When they turned around in panic, as expected, there was also the figure of man in sunglasses and black outfit showing his appearance, oozing out from the darkness of the building over there, as though he was born from the darkness itself.



「Although, there is no need for you all to understand. After all, understanding the true abyss with human body, is something that cannot be done.」



The same voice entered their ears once more. When Kimberly and others turned to the left as though they were being toyed around, there, on the roof of a car that was parked horizontally to block the path, was the same man standing elegantly with his arms crossed and one of his feet drawn back slightly. Leaving aside a female investigator who was greatly being noisy「Real clone! Real clone!」in high spirit, everyone was lost for words feeling dumbfounded and astonished.



「Ko, Kousuke is, Kousuke is, four people……」



Emily's whisper echoed faintly at the place where silence had descended. Right after that, the four Kousuke smoothly unsheathed their jet black short sword and made cross shape with their arms.「Camera-, where is the camera-」Leaving aside the female investigator looking around with a desperate look who was surely beyond hope already, the right-hand man of the demon king chuckled at the words of the girl who he had promised to protect while he called out to her.



「Emily.」



「Ye, yhesh」



Emily's voice spontaneously squeaked because she didn't think that she would be addressed here. Seeing the girl like that, the nearest Kousuke chuckled while asking her.



「I'm not an ally of justice. If those who doesn't balk from harming others for the sake of their own will are called evil, then without a doubt, I am extraordinarily evil.」



「E, err……」



Emily-san was bewildered. She didn't understand the meaning of those words, and she also totally didn't understand Kousuke's speech and behavior! But, Kousuke didn't pay that any attention. Because, the one who was here wasn't Kousuke anymore.



「But, I plan to at least bear in mind the moral code that I should stick to. Therefore, I will protect you. I will protect my promise to protect you. That's why, will you believe in me, and let me protect you?」



「……Ye, yes. I believe you, Kousuke.」



It didn't seem like that she wasn't a little bit creeped out, even so the cheeks of Emily reddened when she was told "I'll protect you". She joined her hands in front of her chest, and returned back her trust as though in prayer. Toward her who was like that, Kousuke went「fuh」for who knew how many times today, and then lastly he spoke.



「Emily. And then, everyone here in this place. Listen-」



Each of the four Kousuke displayed diverse chuuni pose's variation from their original arm-cross pose that even left behind afterimage, while he raised a voice that echoed in the dark night!



And then, Kimberly and his group went 'twitch!' from witnessing that somehow amazing movement while they came back to their senses and aimed their gun toward the four Kousuke. Toward them, Kousuke declared! With a voice that was loud, proud, and echoed from the bottom of the abyss.



「I, am the shadow! The right-hand man of the godslaying demon king that was born from the bottom of the abyss! I came from the deep abyss, from the darkness that is deeper than even darkness! Now, engrave into your soul, this taboo name!」



The jet black short sword was swept, and the empty-handed left hand spread open its five fingers while covering the right eye. The left eye that sharply glared over everything, emitted penetrating light!



Kimberly gave his order「Fire! I don't really get it but, anyway, fire!」. The armed group broke out of the bizarre atmosphere that restrained them, and they pulled their trigger simultaneously. In the space that was blanketed with thunderous roar and muzzle flash, "his" introduction rang out clearly.



「――Rapid Fang Shadow Claw, Kousuke E Abyssgate. I have arrived!」



The bullets that were fired without thinking of leaving behind any reserve, all of them cut through empty air in vain. *shu-* Together with such sound, Kousuke――no, Lord Abyssgate's figure vanished!



Right after that,



「Crawl on the ground. Embrace the infinite hell fire! ――"Katon - Kouen no Ryuu(The flame of abyss extinguish all creation)!"」(TN: Fire Escape - Prominence Dragon)



Lord Abyssgate appeared behind the armed group and stabbed his short sword on the ground while saying such thing. Instantly, vividly crimson blaze *gou-* was spreading in radial shape like great snake crawling on the ground.



「Uwah-, what!?」



「Hot!? Shit-, the fire, the fire is coiling around me-」



The flame was crawling below the armed group coiled on the men and twined around them burning them mercilessly.



――Short sword "Heaven Destroying Sword of Brilliant Lightning Flame"



It was one of the treasures bestowed to him from the demon king. Originally it would create flame snake that randomly ran around to make the area fall into chaos, it was an item that was enchanted with a sublimated flame element magic circle to assist in escape. Just as the name showed, it was also possible to do the lightning version of the attack, not just flame element. It was possible to instantly activate two elements magic for escaping or assisting in battle.



By the way, he thought up the naming himself. Together with a rabbit-eared woman of another world.



Some of the men were about to rush out reflexively, perhaps to help their comrades to put out the fire. But a black shadow slowly appeared right beside them and they turned their gun there with great reflex. However,



「The surge of darkness, corrode everything――"Rasetsu no Mashu(It is beyond your mean to touch the abyss)"」(TN: Rakshasa's Evil Hand)



「Ugoh!?」



*ton* Lord Abyssgate's palm lightly touched the man's chest, at that moment the man was blown away like a joke, as though he had been hit by a truck.



――Fingerless glove "Rakshasa Black Hand of Second Advent and Rejection"



This artifact was inserted with "Magic Shockwave" that converted magic power into shockwave――"Rasetsu no Mashu(It is beyond your mean to touch the abyss)", and regeneration magic "Daten no Ote(There is no end to the abyss)" that could regenerate what it touched to a certain degree. (TN: Daten no Ote = August Hand of Fallen Heaven)



By the way, the chief of rabbit-ear thought and groaned for three days to come up with the naming.



「Die-, die-, this damned monster-」



Several men who fell into panic were brandishing their gun indiscriminately. The bullets that flew out randomly were something dangerous that might drag Emily and others who originally they should secure into danger instead.



「How could you guys appeal to Emily and others while ignoring me. I feel lonely――"Zekkou Senjin - Shin'en no Kaina"」(TN: Light Severance Thousand Blades - Abyss's Arm)



Lord Abyssgate had jumped to the sky unnoticed by anyone, and in midair he swept his arm in large movement. With that, four kunais appeared from empty air. Those kunais flew as though they had their own will, three of them stabbed on the ground around Emily and others *ka-ka-ka-*, while the remaining one came to a stop still above them.



And, just before the astray bullets reached Emily and others, they were obstructed by invisible wall that manifested at the space slightly ahead.



――Offense and defense dual use gravity control kunai "Zekkou Senjin"



This artifact's ability was almost the same like the demon king's bit weapon. It would lay out space isolation defensive wall by making each other as fulcrum. It flew freely using gravity control, and could accomplish space teleportation by replacing their position with the user.



By the way, Kousuke didn't have a thousand of this kunai. He had twelve. The one who named it as thousand blades was the rabbit eared sniper boy. It seemed that the naming reason was「Heheh, stylish right?」



「Don't screw around-」



Kimberly howled. Lord Abyssgate was about to land on the ground with several kunais orbiting around him like satellites. Kimberly aimed the moment he would land and pulled the trigger. It was a superb timing. Even while he was in panic and confusion, that was still an amazing judgment and technique. Furthermore, foreseeing that as a chance, even Allen also gave support fire to make it so there was no place of escape. Perhaps this was the so called the enemy of my enemy if friend.



Lord Abyssgate smiled wryly. He fired a single kunai to the ground while falling and his body made a single rotation midair.



「Invite to the abyss――"Doton - Shin'en Ryuusa"」(TN: Abyss Quicksand)



Instantly, the ground undulated like a whirlpool, Lord Abyssgate slipped through the bullets and then smoothly dived into the ground. 「The true worth of Doton, IT COMES-―――――!!」The frenzied voice of the female investigator who was beyond hope already, it startled Kimberly. At the same time,「CALM DOWN VANESSAAAA-」everyone of Grant family was also startled from their beloved daughter's shriek.



That became an opening where Kimberly was made to pay a painful compensation.



――Bulge, breaking wave. "Doton - Raiton Combination Art - Raika Hourai" (TN: Raiton = Lightning Escape, Raika Hourai = Lightning Flower Phoenix Arrival)



Such words were propagated from the whole darkness of night. Right after that, the ground underneath Kimberly bulged up with explosive momentum. And then, roaring lightning attack burst out, like a roaring dragon climbing up to the sky.



「-, gah!?」



Kimberly was hit hard by hard rocks that came like buckshot while intense lightning attack showered him. Kimberly who couldn't even make a proper scream was launched to the sky like in a cartoon.



For a moment, everyone's eyes were fixed to that sight. In the middle of that,



「Be aware of your own sinfulness, o shadow of the country.」



「Wha-, the ground is again――」



Before he could finish speaking, Allen turned his head from the fright that attacked his spine. There, he saw the figure of Kousuke who flew out from the ground with a momentum as though he was launched out. His figure with both his hands spread and his legs lightly folded, was truly the pose of a savage eagle!



But, Allen also didn't lose. Even while his eyes opened wide in surprise, he aimed the gun in his right hand with amazing reflex and he pulled the trigger.



But, Lord Abyssgate who floated midair, with his body that could be said to be exposed to death, he went「fuh」that he had done a lot today, and then he dodged the bullet with a stylish midair spin.



And then, he kicked flying Allen's gun with a midair spinning kick fully filled with centrifugal force. In the next instant, Allen's left arm moved. Of all things, a hidden gun came out from his left sleeve too.



「Got you-」



「No, that's your illusion.」



Lord Abyssgate's other leg cut through the air. Using the centrifugal force of the midair spinning kick, it was a second leg attack that wasn't unlike a second sword. Allen's hidden card was sent flying too quickly. Even so, the movement of the shadow of the country didn't stop, he fluttered the sleeve of his coat and his right hand that should be snapped away reached toward his waist. There, a revolver for quick draw was stored.



Although, that out of norm movement was already a step late in front of Lord Abyssgate.



「Shih-」



「Wha!? Gah」



A third kick attack. By twisting the upper body after the second spinning kick, it further connected to the third spinning midair kick. The right kick that returned to its original position after a rotation cleaved through the wind *gou-* while hitting hard the haw of Allen who immediately tried to pull back.



Allen's body was blown away, his body danced midair while making triple spin. The white of his eyes was exposed and he bounced on the ground, at the same time Lord Abyssgate's feet also touched the ground.



「…………Abyss-style assassination martial art - kicking form………"Hien Renkyaku(The bird of abyss chirped three times)"」(TN: Flying Abyss Tempered Leg)



That unnaturally long pause was of course, because he only thought up that name just now!



Putting aside the former investiga――the mere otaku who said「Aa, not just ninja art, but even martial art……it's lovely」and the father-daughter who conversed「Emily, i, is this person alright?」「No, it's too late already for her, father」, the battlefield where the abyss lord had descended was filled with scream of chaos and despair where everything was merely trampled helplessly by the darkness that he brought about.



「I didn't hear anything about this! What the hell is that guy-」



「Damn it-, don't come here!」



Barrage of bullets surged along with thunderous sounds. But, Lord Abyssgate that was the target wasn't even grazed. No, to be more accurate, the bullets actually hit. To the double or triple layers of afterimage following him every time he moved. It was as though the bullets were sucked in, they shifted slightly from Lord Abyssgate's body and drifted toward the afterimages.



「――"Juuton - Keishi no Kage". No one is able to seize the abyss.」(TN: Gravity Escape - Shadow of Unusual Death)



The combination technique from skill "Phantom Step" and gravity magic――"Keishi no Kage". While generating afterimages behind using "Phantom Step", those afterimages were enchanted with gravity magic that averted every attack.



「……This is like, a B-class movie.」



Kimberly cursed like that while somehow raising up his body that was finally freed from the numbness. He vomited blood 'gahah'. He looked at his surrounding while on all fours and made a dry smile.



The incarnation of death boasting overwhelming force that surpassed the speed of sound couldn't even graze the existence before his eyes. Even though they were able to see him, even though they could perceive him, but they were unable to grasp his real state. Even though they were fully observing him like this, yet when they noticed they would suddenly lose sight of his existence, and the next time they noticed would be when they were on the verge of having their consciousness swallowed into darkness along with intense pain. And only the back figure of the lord that was in unrelaxed alertness.



Flame crawled on the ground, lightning flew wildly about, wind blade raised up blood splash, and the ground swallowed everything. The shadow ran whether it was on the ground or the sky, vanishing and disappearing, cloned itself into several bodies and kunais were rushing through the sky by ignoring gravity.



「Aa, shit. I really cannot go along with this-」



「That too, is the consequence of your choice isn't it?」



「-」



Kimberly whispered once more while somehow crawling toward the nearest car, but right after that, a cool voice replied to him from right behind him.



When Kimberly looked back, there was the figure of Lord Abyssgate looking down on him. At the same time, *dosha-* a body of his comrade fell with raw sound beside Kimberly. That body's neck was clearly twisted into a direction that a neck mustn't go.



「This, monster」



「You who prey on human, who doesn't feel any hesitation at involving unrelated people, and slaughter your comrades for money, aren't you the monster?」



It was a scathing reply. Kimberly faced Lord Abyssgate with his body falling on his backside. When he noticed, he couldn't hear any gunshot anymore. When he looked around with just his gaze, there was already no one standing in this battlefield.



No, there were barely some people. The troops of the special squad. With their back facing the wall, they formed a half-circle to become the shield of Chief Magdanese. They were standing even while trickling cold sweat. Beside them was a clone body of Lord Abyssgate, they weren't allowed to run away, even so they didn't seem like fighting each other.



On the other hand, the organization member that Kimberly led here seemed to have passed on already without even any time to feel pain. There wasn't anyone with showy wound. A single stab on the heart, or internal organ destruction using impact, stopping heart with electricity, or severing artery using wind blade. Even the people that were enveloped in flame had their life severed by a single attack of flying kunai before they died by fire.



「Oi oi, what the hell. You overlook them, but slaughter us all? Just what is the difference between those guys and us huh?」



Kimberly cracked jokes even with his cheeks twitching while his body was sweating from pain and unease. Lord Abyssgate changed his hold on his short sword into reverse grip while shrugging his shoulders at such Kimberly.



「Evil with conviction, and a mere fiend. Is it fine to consider that both will meet the same end as the result? The answer, is no. ……Well, there is also the difference at the level of troublesomeness for the cleaning up afterward though.」



Lord Abyssgate was Lord Abyssgate. He wasn't that demon king. A method of annihilating anything and everything when hostility was directed to oneself, was a method that he couldn't take based from his sense of value and also his lack of means to clean up afterward, nor did he want to take it. Not to mention how this was at earth.



But, he the experience that he had gone through was also not so sweet, that he would let alive fiends scattering around malice for their own selfish desires, for their own pleasure. Therefore, he made his choice. That was all there was to it.



From the slight movement of Kimberly's gaze, Lord Abyssgate guessed that he was wracking his brain for some kind of solution to escape from this situation. He unhurriedly walked toward Kimberly. And then, he violently grasped Kimberly's collar and lifted him up with one hand easily.



「Uoh. Wait-, just wait! What happened wasn't my real intention-. Even I have a circumstance, I cannot help it! Listen to me!」



Kimberly desperately beat at the arm of Lord Abyssgate that lifted him up from behind while speaking excuse that would overshadow even the word unsightly. Lord Abyssgate lifted up him who was like that, like a criminal that was crucified on a cross.



At the same time,



「Uh. I, I was……aa, if I'm not mistaken, I fainted!? Why am I lifted up!?」



Allen who fainted until now with the white of his eyes showing was lifted up similarly like Kimberly by a clone body and carried near.



The special squad troops starting from Chief Magdanese, and then Vanessa who was sending Kousuke a strangely sparkling gaze, Emily who was completely creeped up by such Vanessa, and Grant husband and wife who was turning pale from the surrounding situations in a silent panic where they couldn't even hide their bewilderment, they all were paying full attention.



Amidst that, the lord drew back and recovered the kunais protecting Emily and others while raising his voice.



「Emily Grant! Vanessa Paradis!」



「Fua, fhyes!」



「Yes, what is it my god?」



Emily who was suddenly called in her full name responded with shaken stutter. As for Vanessa at her side, for some reason she wasn't shaken at all, instead she fell on one of her knees *sucha-!* right away, and replied with reverence as though she was kneeling before her lord. The end of her sentence caused Emily to goggle at her in shock.



But, even that no-good investigator Vanessa who wrecked the serious atmosphere like that immediately corrected her expression from the next words.



「I have captured the perpetrator that snatched away your precious family, your precious comrades.」



Yes. Kimberly snatched them away. Her esteemed superior Hughes. And also the life of her colleagues.



Yes. Allen snatched them away. Even indirectly, the lives of her substitute father, of her big brothers and big sisters.



「Can you two stay quiet?」



There was no way they could. Their heart that had been paralyzed by the serial unusual situations started to move again. The scorching rage they had been holding all this time started to blaze again like fire that was put into fireplace.



Emily stood up. The figure of her family floated around her mind. Because it was command? He didn't directly do it? So what. It was beyond doubt, that what was scattered by the man in front of her eyes, had snatched away the life of her important people.



Vanessa stood up. What filled her mind, was the figure of the superior that she should aimed at. And then, the figures of the comrades with whom she entrusted her life to and vice versa. Who was the one that shot at them from behind with a reason like "for the sake of money"? Who was the one who snorted at the offered trust while trampling on it? It was, the shitty bastard before her eyes.



「O, oi, Vanessa. Wait, just calm down! I――」



「Silence.」



Vanessa slowly stepped forward.



「A, aa~, young miss? That, it was my bad that I blundered――」



「Shut up.」



Emily stomped forward loudly.



Both of them, the two woman who had survived to this point, walked forward side by side. Their expression couldn't be seen from the shadow covering their face. But, their lips that were tightly pursed into a line spoke of their emotion more eloquently than anything.



They clenched their fist. Both of them broke into run. The two men who became the origin of calamity imagined the future that would befall them and sighed. In their action, there was contempt that could be seen, after all what they faced were just female, furthermore one of them was nothing more than a girl. Getting punched wasn't really a big deal.



But, that contempt too disappeared right after that.



――There is no end to abyss. The deep darkness envelop everything.(Now, beloved children. Let's bestow the protection of abyss to you.)



The moment that whisper was uttered, the night suddenly coiled about on the greatly clenched fist of the two. The blackly whirling light that gave such illusion was increasing in strength with pulses each time the two took a step forward! Yes, it was as though, the abyss lord was increasing that strength with each passing of time!



Unease ran through the expression of Kimberly and Allen. Both of them didn't understand what phenomenon that was. But, their soul understood this much. 'That's bad news-!' Following that impulse, they raised their voice to stop the two.



「Wai――」



「Sto――」



「「No more discussion-」」



But, at that time the two were already right in front of them. Their hidden expression became exposed. What was there was wicked look that even resembled evil Rakshasa.



*ZUDAN-* Impossibly loud footstep resounded. Cracks in the shape of spider web ran through the ground! And then, it was unleashed. It was like cannon ball that blasted through the air, the fist clad in the abyss!



「FLY AWAY-」



「DIE-」



Emily's fist at Allen, and Vanessa's fist at Kimberly. Both of them put their whole feeling, and their billions of rage, they spitted out everything, and struck!



「「THIS SHITTY BASTARD-!!」」



*GOU-!!* The thunderous sound of hitting flesh and,「GUPEE!?」「GEHAH!?」such screams resounded. On the eyes of the lord that had the perception ability raised by "Heavenly Eye", the sight of Kimberly and Allen's cheeks getting ran through by fist, their cheekbones broken, their teeth pulverized, and their flesh squashed in undulation, was projected.



When the lord timely released his hand, Kimberly and Allen were blown away in tailspin as though to prove that might and they bounced together on the ground. And then without any lessening in their momentum, they crashed on the car behind. Both of them cordially plunged through the front glass head first together and in the end there was only their butt sticking out without even a twitch.



The sound of someone gulping their saliva *gulp* echoed. The troops of the special squad were making expression that was shuddering in fear as though to say「Those fists really a damned bad news」.



Amidst that atmosphere, Emily and Vanessa who were standing still with their fist still outstretched slowly relaxed their tension. And then, they lifted their face and gazed at the lord.



There on their face, floated a smile. Looking at their smile, it could be clearly understood that even though it wasn't wholly, but at least their expression had cleared up a bit.



「Both of you. ……That attack felt like it would make me fall in love.」



The lord gave words of praise while once more going「fuh」that he had lavishly displayed throughout this day.



Emily and Vanessa looked at each other's face, and then, they turned their face at the lord one more time. Wordlessly, they both fixed a thumb up resolutely.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



This is not over you know? It’s still continuing you know~.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 210




AN: This one is short. There is big possibility it will be rewritten, or added to.



「Now then, here we are o guardian. I'll grant you the chance to choose.」



After Emily and Vanessa made their settlement with a fist of all their might (plus abyss), the lord that was observing Chief Magdanese and her group said such thing with his eyes shining.



In the silent night where the tumult of death and strife had passed, leaving behind the heaps of corpses of armed men all around, the voice of the lord resounded clearly. Emily and Vanessa, and also Grant husband and wife who were in slight distance away, they all went 'hah' and their gazes turned toward that voice.



Even the special squad troops whose awareness slackened slightly from the extermination of the enemy and the observing act of the lord, they began to put on a tense air once again.



「Choose?」



Chief Magdanese was pressing on her arm that was soaked in blood while standing up with the help of the agent beside her. Her cheek was dirtied by blood splash and painted her gruesomely, but she responded at the lord with a straight calm gaze without even a grimace on her face.



「Yes, choose. Will you be exterminated in this place? Or will you take the second option?」



「What nonsense……I already told you my, no, the security bureau's will. If you want to kill us then kill. Even if the country lose a pawn like me, it won't affect this country's system.」



She had made her resolve. Her cold gaze without any emotion in it discarded the lord's proposal as nonsense.



But, the lord wasn't making "proposal" here.



「Certainly, I don't think that your death will affect this country's decision considerably. But, I believe that the influence of the living you is powerful, isn't that correct? Don't you think that influence ought to be used for the sake of the country's safety?」



「? What are you……-, such thing. That's a contemptible threatening isn't it.」



Yes, this was the "ultimatum" that was only dressed up as "proposal".



Even if Chief Magdanese died, it would be impossible for the upper brasses of this country who knew about the appeal of【Berserk】to retract back their hand, there would be some remaining that would keep trying. The successor of Chief Magdanese would succeed her duty or else that duty would simply be moved toward another organization.



But, if this great woman who could even be said as a living legend used her position and all her influence to insist that【Berserk】was unneeded, or even dangerous, what would happen then. Chief Magdanese said that she was nothing more than a dog of the country, but sure enough, could the upper brasses ignore her full report?



From the lord's conjecture, there would be no way for them to ignore her.



For the lord who was lacking in the means of cleaning up the aftermath with the country as his opponent, the method of bringing over Chief Magdanese to his side and made her to revoke the【Berserk】case could be said to be the most realistic means.



Of course, the lord also had the means to make the top brasses of this country to forget everything regarding【Berserk】. He could make request to that demon king. If he did that, the whole case would be settled without leaving any loose end.



But, the lord didn't choose that. The dignity of the lord wouldn't forgive him if he left this case's resolving to other people wholesale even though he was the one that poked his nose into his case by his own. Above all, he thought of that person as a friend, and so there was no way he could treat him as a convenient existence. If he did something like that, then the lord wouldn't be able to say that he was the friend of that demon king while raising his head high.



Therefore, for the lord, it would be for the best if Chief Magdanese herself put an end to this【Berserk Incident】.



And then, in the case this option couldn't be practiced, then it would be war against the new security bureau without Chief Magdanese, no, against the country itself that was backing the bureau.



「This is different from threatening. This is a declaration. If your side wishes for a fight to the bitter end, then I will fight until this body is reduced into worthless thing. Now, guardian. You can imagine using that sagacious mind of yours. In the end, just how much sacrifice will be necessary to stop this abyss lord.」



「……」



Chief Magdanese stayed silent. Her gaze surveyed around slightly without even speaking any words. What entered her gaze was the mere shadow of the armed men's former self. In contrast, the man before her eyes had not a single wrinkle on his outfit.



In front of this person who utilized supernatural technique that surpassed the realm of understanding, even the special squad of the security bureau would be powerless. His conduct and speech were also beyond comprehension.



Although, it was by no means that the winning percentage was zero inside Chief Magdanese's thought. No matter how much irrational strength this person had, but as long as he was only an individual, he would be in a losing battle against an organization. Inside her head she had already pictured several routes of killing the lord by using "strength of organization".



But,



「Haa……」



She let out a deep sigh. From how the agent standing by beside Chief Magdanese was blinking his eyes, perhaps it was really rare for her to act like that.



But, if that agent knew about what was inside Chief Magdanese's heart, then surely he would feel that it couldn't be helped for her to make that deep sigh from the overwhelming fatigue drowning her heart, he would even feel sympathy to that.



(The right-hand man of demon king……what's more, the "returnees", is it.)



Yes, the lord had proclaimed before. That he was the "right-hand man of demon king". In other words, this embodiment of irrationality before her eyes was nothing more than a subordinate. In the end, was that existence which was referred as demon king, an existence that was even more powerful than this lord? That was something that Chief Magdanese didn't understand.



But, here, for some reason her mind was naturally under the impression that this information was nothing significant――from that, and when the keyword "returnees" emerged on her mind, terrifying possibilities were welling out from inside her, one after another.



The returnee incident that shaken the society for a period. Naturally the intelligence department of Britain also didn't ignore that incident. But rather than the boys and girls who were called as returnee, the intelligence department focused more in observing and dealing with the disturbing elements who were sniffing at the occult aspect of these returnees. Even so, there was no doubt that Britain was paying attention to the【Returnees Incident】.



But, at one point of time, the heated up media and suspicious organizations that were showing disturbing movement suddenly stopped showing any movement. It happened so quickly like the tide that was drawing back.



(Yes, that incident came to an end so naturally that it was unnatural. And then, I and also the intelligence department didn't feel that it was unnatural!)



The existence of the lord and the few keywords that he put before her eyes opened up Chief Magdanese's eyes.



――This person wielding supernatural power, is a returnee



――The returnees, numbered thirty people in total.



――At the very least, there is an existence that this person looked up as above him.



――The recognition toward the returnees is weak, and much less in their own country, but almost the whole world was like that.



――Even now she isn't feeling that it was unnatural about how weak this recognition is



'Just what's with this situation', Chief Magdanese thought. 'The opponent is an individual', such assumption was an excessively hopeful conjecture.



「Let me, ask a question. Among all of you, how high are you in comparison?」



When that question left her mouth, she thought that there was really no meaning in asking that, even so Chief Magdanese couldn't help but asking the question. She wanted to know even if just a part, about "they" who managed to hide from the whole world even after having the attention from all over the world gathered on them once.



Hearing the question of Chief Magdanese, the lord hummed「fumu」while touching his chin. He showed a gesture of thinking for a bit, and then he shrugged his shoulders in over reaction and answered.



「I can boast that I'm top class even among my friends. However……」



「However?」



The lord was putting on airs, however, Chief Magdanese only asked back quietly without showing any irritation. Toward such her, the lord held his head high, and then he spoke in pride.



「Compared to our demon king and his ladies, I cannot hold a candle to them. Even in one-on-one, using my whole body and soul, where I take out all of the trump cards that I have……dealing a scratch is the best that I can do.」



「……I see.」



The special squad troops were going slightly astir. An opponent that cornered them until half-destroyed state, and in his back there was still someone else waiting, someone that this person could do nothing except putting on a scratch. What's more, there were several of such people. What's more, he said ladies. Ladies-! The fingertip of the troops that was on the trigger was trembling! How envio――terrifying!



「Although, perhaps it won't even become a fight against you guys to begin with.」



The detail that was added like an additional blow convinced Chief Magdanese. It was just as she thought, even their awareness was being guided. That conviction made a sigh to leak out from Chief Magdanese's mouth once more.



And then, she asked the scale on her heart and a bitter smile emerged on her mouth.



「Indeed, it's not worth it to continue this just for the merit of turning【Berserk】into weapon. By the way, I wonder if there is any room for negotiation?」



「None.」



「Is it fine for you to say that even without asking that demon king-sama you respected?」



「Of course.」



A curt response. Chief Magdanese sighed for the third time.



「The effect and usefulness of【Berserk】are already known by the top brass. I cannot assert that this case will be resolved by me advocating for the opposing argument. It's my specialty to make argument armed with theoretical backing, however I cannot guarantee anything with certainty if I have to omit your existence in my argument.」



「Are you implicitly telling me to expose the information about me and the one behind me? Know this, guardian. In this world, there are things that shouldn't be known. ……Or rather, if I told you about them then it will be seriously bad news for me and for you too. Especially if anyone try anything to the wive~s it seriously will be the end. It will be totally over for this country. If this is known, then there will absolutely be some fellow coming out to do stupid thing, this country will disappear from the map yea――cough-. Anyway, I have no intention of telling you anything about us.」



「……」



For some reason, it was as though the bare face came out from Lord Abyssgate. It was a momentary shiver that was obvious even through the sunglasses and black costume. Other than Chief Magdanese, even the troops were horrified. Just what kind of existence could make this aberrant existence to unconsciously return to his bare face!?



「Hhn, a, and, what is your answer?」



The lord cough unnaturally as though to pull himself together, and then he pressed the choices once more on them. The mind of Chief Magdanese was groping frantically for the best solution to her country even now in this moment, but she was aware that the answer had already come out from inside herself since some time ago.



The country's safety was everything for Sharon Magdanese.



Then, if what was waiting at the end of the path of pursuing that goal would be a war against an unknown, and furthermore a powerful organization without equal that could even possibly overthrow this country, then that would be really just putting the cart before the horse. At the very least, she knew that in the current time she was overwhelmed in the information aspect and battle strength.



A long silence descended. The cold gaze of Chief Magdanese pierced straight at the lord.



The lord was also staring straight back at Chief Magdanese. While crossing his arms.



Just how much time passed? When anyone realized, Emily and Vanessa were already standing close to the lord, the troops were nervously gazing alternately between Chief Magdanese and the lord. It was at that time that the words that would decide their fate were finally spoken.



「…………Fine then.【Berserk】is uncontrollable. Refinement of wonder drug for it is impossible. At this rate there is a high possibility of it adapting to the environment and start air-borne infection, the damage in that case will be vast. ……What do you think about that? Of course, I will put seasoning on that story sufficiently.」



「Wonderful. With this there will also be no need for a joke like all the upper brasses of Emily's country showing the same symptoms with Alzheimer, despite that being the illness that she is fighting against. My greatest respect on your decisive judgment.」



「I don't need your respect or anything, however I think that it's a silver lining that you are someone rational. ……Though honestly, I think there is something wrong with your speech and act.」



The words that were muttered in a whisper by Chief Magdanese in the end there. Surely those words came half from being sore loser, and half came from her heart.



The lord pretended not to hear that while his gaze moved to Emily beside him. By sending flying one of the causes that cornered her important people to death, her feeling had been diverted somewhat, but as expected, the flame of her hatred was still directed at Chief Magdanese who was the ringleader without even the slightest weakening.



「Emily. Just as you heard, we have procured a method to end this case. But, I know that this method is not something that you really can agree with.」



「……right」



Emily clutched the sleeve of the lord tightly. Her tightly pressed lips looked like she would bite on her lips anytime. That look of hers eloquently exposed the inside of her heart that was yelling「This kind of people, it's better if they all just die!」.



The lord questioned to such Emily.



「I was the one who said that I will become your strength. That's why, if Emily wish for revenge, I'll draw my blade against them. Emily, what do you want to do?」



Those words of the lord that came this late in the game caused the troops who were breathing sigh of relieve to make tense expression just when they thought the talk was concluded already. It was only Chief Magdanese who was sending a calm gaze at Emily, like a criminal waiting for the judgment.



The strength of Emily's hand that was clutching the lord's sleeve became stronger. Her figure that was looking down while trembling a bit as though she was holding down a great emotion looked even more painful to look at. But, the first word that were let out from such Emily was strong, it resounded with dignity that made everyone there to be taken aback.



「Don't look down on me.」



The gaze of Emily who lifted up her face stared straight from the shoulder of the lord. In that distance where they could feel each other's breathing, there was light other than hatred shining in those eyes of Emily.



「You are asking me that kind of question after finishing the talk, are you testing me? I'll say it one more time. Don't look down on me, Kousuke. I decided to walk this path because I want to become the strength of someone who is suffering from sickness, because I want to keep alive even if just one person more. There is no way I will trample on the best path you have grasped for me!」



Her voice resounded clearly. That will spread like a ripple. Surely, that will was something that wouldn't lose even against the will to safeguard the country that Chief Magdanese displayed.



「Besides, I don't happen to have a shamelessness that allow me to entrust other with killing people for my own sake. Vanessa that has been helping me all this time, and Kousuke who told me that you will become my strength even though you are not related to this. I absolutely won't make that kind of horrible request to the two of you!」



Her cat eyes glared intensely. She was holding blazing hatred in her chest, however, she didn't mistake her path. This girl would immediately turn small in crisis, she was a scaredy cat, and obstinate, however it was obvious that inside this awfully straightforward girl, there was strength that couldn't be mistaken.



A faint smile emerged on the lips of the lord. Different from the fearless smile that he showed before this, it was a smile that was vaguely fleeting, and gentle. The lord's hand reached toward Emily's head in a natural motion. *pon pon* Light touches were conveyed to Emily.



「Emily. As I thought, you are a good woman.」



「…………………………Boe!?」



Instant petrification. Next, she turned into a completely ripe tomato when she comprehended what was said to her. The garnish was a weird shocked voice. And then, she noticed how their face had approached each other until super close range where her lips would be able to touch if she stretched up herself a little, and how she was tightly clutching the lord's arm. She went 'awawa, hawawa' while backing off in shaky footsteps.



And then, she noticed Vanessa who was giving her a thumb up for some reason, Chief Magdanese and the troops who were making complicated expression, and then, her family that was sending her a strangely lukewarm gaze……「Do, don't looook!」she said while turning small. She crouched, she held her head with both her hands, and then her body was trembling from shame. That figure was truly that of a small animal.



The lord made a pleasant smile at such Emily before his gaze returned to Chief Magdanese.



「That's how it is. Guardian-dono, please, for the sake of this country's safety too, persuade this country with desperation. There is no worth in effort. Result is everything. If anything is going to harm this child and the people at her surrounding, no matter what kind of shape that is――then know this, the abyss swallow everything without exception.」



「……I know.」



Chief Magdanese nodded quietly at the abnormal killing intent and pressure that were filling the last sentence. And then, she proposed that she would like to dispatch personnel to clean up this place, and prepare a place to talk to each other regarding the organization behind Kimberly.



Indeed, they couldn't just neglect the heaps of corpse, and it was essential to know about the organization behind Kimberly to save Emily completely. And so, the lord accepted that proposal while teaching them one fact.



That fact, was that the number of body bag they needed to prepare was only for Kimberly's comrades. Yes, actually the troops of the special squad, although they all were seriously wounded with their limbs' tendon severed, or their internal organ terribly damaged, but not a single one among them received lethal damage, none of them had died.



Thinking from the beginning that bringing over the security bureau to his side was one of the methods to end this case, the lord left them alive so as not to leave behind seed of future trouble as much as possible. Although, even though the troops felt joy that their comrades survived, at the same time their mind felt down from the terror that they were partially annihilated even when the opponent was holding back that much……but that was just a trivial matter for the lord.



Now then, for the moment a relationship of cooperation was build with the security bureau and the matter had reached a point where they could pause. It was at this time



The lord, no, Kousuke heard. The sound of *saa―*. It came from inside his body. It seemed that he could hear for real, the sound of blood leaving his face.



Kousuke's hand was moving toward his sunglasses with small shivers. And then he slowly took off his sunglasses with the item clattering *rattle rattle*.



What appeared from behind the sunglasses was a grandly convulsing expression.



Other than the agent who received Chief Magdanese's instruction and made contact for personnel dispatch, everyone there noticed Kousuke's pale expression that was obvious to see even under the faint moonlight. His eccentric atmosphere until just now was vanishing.



Kousuke turned on his heel wordlessly, however, everyone could clearly see his dead eyes. He started to walk unsteadily, and totteringly. Before long he reached the gap between the wall and stair on the building, he flattened himself into the gap and turned small. Just like Emily-chan.



In front of the people whose eyes turned round in wonder, Kousuke buried his face onto his knees and whispered in small but clear voice.



「Someone, please kill me instantly instead……」



He wished to be beheaded in the middle of the warehouse district.



It seemed that the compensation to become peerless was great.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Actually I wanted to write more about the entanglement when Kousuke returned, yet the time wasss~.



Work of 4 months is seriously bad news.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 211




AN: I’m sorry.



In the end, just posting the next chapter is the best that I can do.



Just what is golden week I wonder? Does it mean a week of demonic work?



Haha-



Because of that, I’m thinking of putting aside the rewriting and improving the previous chapter for the time being.



If there is anyone holding hope for that, my apologies.



「Hold on! Get a hold of yourself, Kousuke!」



Emily's tragic call that didn't suit the warehouse district at night echoed. Kousuke sat on the floor while hugging his knees, he was staring at empty air with eyes of a dead fish, and a dry smile was pasted on his lips. Emily was holding the collar of such Kousuke while desperately jolting his body back and forth.



Everyone of Grant family was staring at such situation with a bewildered feeling in wonder of what was going on, also, Vanessa too was throwing doubtful gaze at Kousuke who suddenly became useless, even so she was running her gaze at the surrounding vigilantly in his place.



And then, at the end of her gaze were several bureau staffs and the surviving troops.



Yes, currently there were many bureau staffs in this place. When Chief Magdanese finished her talk with Lord Abyssgate, Kousuke suddenly turned into a state as though he was a stain on the wall. After that Chief Magdanese called in bureau staffs for cleaning up the aftermath.



After all the phrase of heaps of corpse all around perfectly suited this place right now. They couldn't just leave the corpse like that, and the cars Kimberly and his group were riding to this place needed to be confiscated too. They needed extra hands for dealing with all those.



In addition, they needed to share information between the two sides regarding the organization behind Kimberly and also interrogating him. It was for that reason that Chief Magdanese and her group, and also Kousuke and others were remaining here.



Both Kimberly and Allen now looked as though their former handsome look was only an illusion. Their caved-in face was too tragic to look at, and they were still unconscious without even a twitch and the white of their eyes exposed. Several troops were watching over Kimberly, but he looked so atrocious that they questioned「Is this really need to be guarded?」.



And so, they were still unable to hold interrogation. Or rather, Kousuke's heart was hurled to far beyond as though he was in the verge of being swallowed into abyss, so currently they couldn't even exchange information with Chief Magdanese. Emily was doing her best so Kousuke would return to his sanity but……the damage on Kousuke-san was deep.



Chief Magdanese received treatment of her arm that was drilled by rifle bullet beside a car that was equipped with first-aid facilities, mixed among the injured troops. She was narrowing her eyes at Kousuke who was in such state.



Although they had reconciled, or rather formed cease-fire agreement for the moment, but the other party was the great woman who carried both good and evil in her method. With Kousuke's state where he was currently murmuring broken language「I'm, fine. I'm, working hard. I'm, fine」, Vanessa also needed to endure various things and kept watchful eye to the other side.



However, she wished that Kousuke would return to his sanity soon already. And so, looking at Emily who was desperately calling at Kousuke while her arms were circling on his head as though she was going to embrace him, Emily who was starting to reduce the sense of distance into one where it was hard to claim that they were just mere friend, Vanessa gave her advice.



「Doctor Grant. Can I say one thing?」



「Whaaat. Right now I have no free time to look after mere otaku heree!」



「That's impolite to call me a mere otaku. I'm not just an otaku. Even if I'm an otaku, but I'm otaku that is an agent――no, I'm the SOUSAKAN.」(TN: Sousakan means investigator in Japanese. All this time when I refer some people from security bureau as agent, the raw was actually calling them as sousakan or investigator. I changed them to agent in the translation though.)



「I don't get it!」



For some reason, Vanessa and Emily pulled a smooth funny man and straight man routine a little bit like a comedy duo. Emily went 'fusha―' like a cat while her gaze insisted「Be quiet a little!」. Of course, Vanessa-san was unstoppable.



「About my god, it appear that his state that was overflowing with awesomeness not long ago, for some reason that I don't understand it put a burden on his mental state. And so, how about trying something that will make my god's feeling to lighten up? Something that will make him happy.」



「That's a good advice you have there……but you see, let me point out at just one thing! What's with that "my god"!」



Emily Grant didn't fail to notice that opening to be the straight man.



Vanessa showed a really irritating face that seemed to question「Just now, is it really something important?」, even so she explained with the sense of values of good old Japan.



「Doctor Grant. The origin of why I call Kousuke-san as my god come from the tradition and culture of Japan, that is the correct way for displaying respect, because that is a title of honor.」



「Wha, what do you mean?」



「At Japan, people who displayed transcendental skill, producing result that cannot be matched by any other and ought to be given high praise, they would be called "~is god" (TN: Kami in Japan can mean god, but can also mean incredible or fantastic) in praise. Therefore, I'm praising "Kousuke-san is god!", or "Kousuke-san's awesome style is seriously godly!!" is something that is really natural and par for the course!」



「I, I didn't know that……」



Vanessa's finger snapped out powerfully and pointed to emphasis her claim. Emily's expression changed just like when she received new knowledge from university lecturer. ……She didn't even notice how inside her arms, Kousuke was shot by Vanessa's word bullets and he convulsed *twitch twitch twitch*.



It seemed that the SOUSAKAN's mood became pleased looking at Emily's attitude. Her tongue moved even more fluently.



「Doctor Grant. This is a digression, but at Japan, everyday new gods are being born.」



「Li, lies……in Japan, there are a lot of people like Kousuke!?」



Emily showed a frightened expression. Her side-tail stood on end. Beside her, the expression of everyone of Grant Family was grandly twitching. The eyes of Chief Magdanese narrowed so thin it looked like string now, and the troops expression turned grim as though to say「Despair!」.



……It seemed the people of the security bureau were also pricking up their ears and listened really attentively.



Whether she actually knew that or not, Vanessa shrugged her shoulders with over reaction that looked like a certain someone somewhere and said「No no, how can that be」and denied Emily's words.



「As expected, even Japan(the country of fantasy) won't have anyone that is in the level of my god. However, it's the fact that gods endowed with technique and zeal which shaken the soul exist there. ……Doctor Grant. Even you should at least hear about it before. The other popular name of that country. Bringing forth gods into existence day after day, this alias display that essence!」



「I, I don't know, I don't know what it is, Vanessa!」



It seemed that the strange switch inside Emily-chan was turned on. Or perhaps, she was simply someone that got easily swept away by the place's atmosphere. Speaking in term of story tale, then she was definitely in the category of easy heroine. (TN: Easy heroine is those heroine in the story that easily fall to the main character just because of a bit of kind words or gesture, or sometimes without any clear reason at all)



Vanessa who obtained amazingly excellent audience was showered by the support light that was the moonlight while she raised one hand to her chest, her other hand was spread widely, and with an air as though she was an actress on stage, she made the alias of the country she would forever love to resound.



「People, call that country like this. ――The country where eight million gods are born.」



「That's not it-. Apologize to the sense of values of the good old Japan! You representative of misunderstood foreigner!」



That statement of Vanessa was really too much this time, which caused Kousuke to flew out from the bottom of the abyss like a launched missile. He reflexively stood up while roaring angrily. Emily also got carried up to standing position by his momentum, she said「Standing! Kousuke is standing!」which sounded like a joke material while revealing her joy.



「Congratulations of your revival, my go――」



Vanessa immediately fell on her knee with a thud and bowed like a retainer revering her lord, but her words were cut off in the middle. By *hyu-* the sound of cutting wind and the wind pressure grazing her cheek.



「Oi, Danessa. The next time you call me "my god" again……I won't miss.」(TN: Danessa, in the raw, the katakana of 'Va' here is replaced with the kanji of 'da' which could mean, worthless, hopeless, useless, etc. Sorry, but I cannot think up any fitting translation to English for this)



A cold sweat smoothly trickled down Vanessa's temple while she quietly looked across her shoulder. There, she could see a jet black kunai stabbed deeply on the ground. But, she wouldn't get discouraged by something of that level. Such thing didn't fit for this SOUSAKAN!



「……Then, I'll call you master.」



「Why!? Isn't it fine if you keep calling me "Kousuke-san" the same as always!?」



「No, there is no way I can do that. As a person begging for teaching, I wish to take up an attitude that adequately express that!」



「Somehow I'm feeling amazing spirit from you though. Somehow it feels a bit scary though. Or rather, begging for teaching?」



「Yes. Please accept me as pupil by any means!」



「This development, is unexpected!」



The spirit of Danessa-san was full to the brim. After a total of five minutes explanation that hit Kousuke like surging wave……in short, she was awfully moved by Kousuke's strength, so please accept me as a pupil by any means, something like that it seemed.



To expand further, Vanessa was giving her explanation with enthusiasm that was at the peak of the peak, so it went without saying that a lethal wound was dealt once more on Kousuke's shame.



She said how magnificent the pose of Lord Abyssgate while reproducing it with a perfectly copied motion, she also chuckled 'fuh' while saying「The moon tonight is wonderful!」……. Kousuke was covering his face with both hands while shaking his head screaming「Stooop! Please, stop it alreadyyy!」.



「Why a pupil huh. I don't get how your thought process is working anymore.」



「I think that if anyone witness that numerous techniques which look like Japanese ninja, it's only natural that they will want to receive teaching though……」



「Have some self-awareness. The natural that Vanessa is saying is generally unnatural you know. Or rather, you are an agent of security bureau right? What are you going to do about that huh?」



Kousuke averted his face looking unpleasant after seeing Vanessa's fierily sparkling gaze while gently giving his refusal.



Vanessa glanced at Chief Magdanese before for some reason she went「fuh」with a smile that looked really irritating. Chief Magdanese's eyes twitched in reaction.



「In the first place, I entered security bureau because I thought that『Isn't something like an agent that fight against evil really cool?』」



「That motive is like elementary student huh……」



「Even after I safely became an agent, my heart was throbbing from thinking『Won't I get dragged into national conspiracy I wonder?』while I went through the days.」



「Your way of thinking is seriously like an elementary student.」



Chief Magdanese covered her eyes with one hand. Her emotion could be easily guessed. There were several of the troops averted their eyes a bit and others that sent Vanessa lukewarm gaze. Surely they were the same kind with this Danessa.



「I was moved when I met with the chief the first time. She is the living legend that handed down swift yet cool-headed judgment, when I actually met her and felt her atmosphere on my skin, I thought『Eh, what, isn't this a real-life M!』. I instantly decided then. 『Yosh, I'll become a real ○07』」



「Oo~i, chief-sa~n! It seems that this otaku SOUSAKAN wanted to become your 0○7!」



Chief Magdanese whispered「……The Paradis that I knew, was just an illusion」with a tired expression. And then, when she averted her gaze away as though to say that she couldn't bear to see any more than this, ahead of her gaze she witnessed the troops and bureau staffs who were giving out air that said「Yep yep, I get that~」. Her cheeks were twitching grandly.



「However, yes, However! I had seen it! I had known it! That there are things in this world that not ought to be known! Yes, it's you!」



「Guhah. I, I let my guard down. It all came back at once.」



「Compared to master's awesomeness, this M wannabe chief is just too shabby. What I should aim for is right here! Master, I beg you. Please, accept me as your pupil.」



Saying that, Danessa-san bowed her head. As for the chief-san, after getting arbitrarily treated as fictional character, getting expectation arbitrarily put on her, and in the end she was called as shabby, she pulled out her handgun with gaze that was like tundra. Seeing that, the squad captain beside her held her from behind while saying「Ca, calm down-, chieef!」to stop her.



While sending a glance to that commotion, Kousuke who was given petition from someone to be his pupil for the first time on his life sighed loudly while saying a word.



「Rejected.」



He cut down the request resolutely.



However, it seemed that Vanessa had predicted that from the beginning. She nodded once without looking particularly losing her composure. And then, she spoke a request that she seemed to have prepared beforehand, or rather this one seemed to be her heart's actual desire.



「Then, please sleep with me.」



「Your crypticness just know no bound there! What are you saying!? Just what the hell you are saying!?」



「Vanessa!? Wha wha wha wha, what is your intention!?」



Kousuke was greatly shaken, while Emily who was previously in a daze from the exchange between Vanessa and Kousuke was revived in one shot.



Vanessa was explaining with her gaze staring at Kousuke without any trace of shame in it, rather her gaze was like a hunter aiming at a prey. According to her explanation, the point was if it was impossible for her to become a pupil then 'I will become your woman!', something like that. If she received the privilege to stay at his side like that, later she would steal his technique by herself, she said.



「Impure! That's impure-, Vanessa! So, something like that, if it's not properly between two people who love each other――」



「No, Doctor Grant. I wish that you won't misunderstand me like that. I won't offer this body just for the sake of my objective whatever it is. I have fallen in love normally. Or rather, I have gotten wet.」



「W, we, weeet――」



Emily-chan buried her face on Kousuke's shoulder. Her face when bright red until not only her ears, but even until her neck. And then, the confession that was too much of a straight ball caused Kousuke to forget the hopelessness of his talking partner temporarily and he unconsciously turned red.



「Please don't worry, Kousuke-san. Perhaps I don't look like it, but actually I'm a devoted woman.」



「N, no, even if you appeal at me like that. In the first place, you see, I actually――」



「Tha, that's right! For Kousuke and Vanessa, such thing is……no good! It's absolutely no good!」



Kousuke was about to say「have a lover」, but Emily-chan who was on her absolute limit pulled tightly on Kousuke. She embraced him as though to cover him, or possibly to claim that she wouldn't let him get taken away, while her almond-shaped eyes glared really threateningly.



「Please don't worry, Doctor Grant. I'm completely okay even just as a mistress.」



「Thi, this is not that kind of problem!」



Vanessa-san's freedom was unstoppable. The bureau staffs who were working hard at dealing with the corpses laying all over the place without getting any late night overtime pay already stopped still. They were gazing fixedly at the conversation of Kousuke and co. With bloodshot eyes, and shaking fist, and then, curses that were leaking out unintelligibly.



「E, excuse me. Can I interrupt a little?」



In the middle of the growing pandemonium, a timid voice called at them. Looking toward that voice, Emily's father Carl was staring at Kousuke, Emily, and Vanessa with a really complicated expression feeling unsure of what to say.



「That, Abyssgate-san, should I call you that?」



「It's Kousuke. Are you listening? My name is Kousuke.」



Father Carl's natural mentioning of Abyssgate caused the mini Kousuke inside his heart to vomit out blood. Even while he was plainly eating damage, Kousuke vigorously pressed on to correct Carl. Father Carl nodded obediently at that even while he was feeling creeped out.



「Err, Kousuke-san. First, let me say my gratitude. You are the benefactor of Grant family. If it's something that I can possibly do, then please ask anything from me so I can express my thanks to you. I won't inquire about that mysterious power of yours. Surely there are various circumstances about that……. But, there is one thing that I want you to tell me no matter what. ……Just what is your relationship with my daughter? You two look really intimate with each other……」



Color of awkwardness was residing inside the gaze of father Carl. That gaze was seeing the figure of his beloved daughter who was hugging Kousuke firmly even now.



There, it seemed that Emily finally noticed how she was clinging all over Kousuke. She raised her voice「Awah!?」while backing away with her hands going banzai. (TN: Like when people yell banzai, they will raise their hands high)



「Aa~, no, it's not, our relationship is not like what Carl-san is thinking. I am just her bodyguard, just a friend.」



「Friend, is it……」



Carl's gaze was directed to his daughter once again. He could see the vision of dark cloud with sound effect *doyoo~n* behind Emily. She was obviously feeling down when she heard "just a friend" said so easily. Even if he wasn't her father, it was completely clear that Emily wasn't thinking of Kousuke as just a mere friend anymore.



Father Carl made a complicated expression at that condition of his beloved daughter. And then the one that threw a stone and caused ripples there, was obviously this person.



「Kousuke-san. The way you are saying that is just too much. Even though Doctor Grant had already offered her precious thing(peeing)……」



「Offering her precious thing!? E, Emily! What is the meaning of this!? Explain it to your father!」



「Yo, you are wrong, father! That, isn't something like that……that was because Kousuke was mean to me, it couldn't be helped at all!」



「Wha-. You are saying that your precious thing was stolen because you got bullied!? Su, such thing……」



Emily's cheeks were dyed red from shame and she turned small. It was her usual style, but right now, in this place, it also could be seen as a girl who crouched down because she got hurt. Actually even Emily's mama Sophia went「Emily! Aa, you are trembling like this, how pitiful!」and hugged her tightly with tragic expression.



As for Kousuke,「"Being mean" and "bullying" has really different nuance there!」he made a retort inside his heart, but it was the fact that he acted mean and shamed Emily because of that, so he was hesitating of what to say. He absolutely didn't do atrocious thing like what Carl and Sophia were imagining but……. Or rather, it was him who got dirtied that time…….



The gaze of father Carl who was desperately holding down his rage was cornering mini Kousuke inside his heart.



「Abyssgate-san. You are my family's benefactor. My words that I want to repay you with anything that I can possibly do aren't a lie. But, but-, please spare just my daughter! Like this-! Please, I beg you don't shame my daughter more than this-!」(TN: The word shame here can also mean rape or violate in Japanese)



「You are wrong! It's a misunderstanding! I'm telling you I'm not that kind of brute!」



Starting from Chief Magdanese, the bureau staffs were all giving Kousuke cold gaze. It was as though they were looking at a criminal.



After that, the misunderstanding was resolved somehow by Kousuke's desperate justification, and the flustered words of Emily who noticed that an outrageous misunderstanding had been generated.



Although, because of the fault of Danessa who put in timely interruption with mistaken good intentions, the misunderstanding that Japan was overflowing with boys who hungered for "reward" from beautiful girl permeated not just Grant family, but even until the bureau staffs. In the end, Emily's blunder of wetting her pants became known far and wide and her soul embarked on a journey. When Kousuke consoled her, seeing that and thinking that the two would go into a relationship by themselves, Danessa casually added in her mistress application. Kousuke was flustered by himself with「This isn't affair! This isn't an affair at all!」……



Through this and that kind of ruckus, the cleaning up of the site somehow was finished, and finally, really finally the discussion between Kousuke and co with Chief Magdanese's group could start. It was at that time, one of the bureau staff that was holding a communication device rushed toward Chief Magdanese.



From the condition of that staff who had tense expression on his face, it seemed that some kind of uncommon situation was occurring.



The staff handed over the communication device that seemed to be connected to somewhere, to Chief Magdanese who was looking doubtful.



「Chief. This is the smartphone recovered from Kimberly. ……The caller said to hand it over to you.」



「……I see. The preparation?」



「All okay. But, it's likely the other side is taking countermeasures. Please prolong the talk as much as possible.」



「I know. Everyone, don't make any sound. I'll put it into speaker.」



Chief Magdanese accepted the smartphone that was put on hold and quickly gave instruction. Nervousness spread between the staffs and troops. From the situation, it seemed that the organization behind Kimberly was attempting to contact them. The call was put on speaker so that Kousuke and others could grasp the situation too.



The one at the other side of the call most likely was the organization that was the ringleader of everything. Perhaps they finally contacted the phone because there was no result report from Kimberly or because he failed to make contact regularly.



Emily's expression vanished, Danessa returned into Vanessa, and Kousuke's eyes quietly narrowed.



Inside the back of the car that was loaded with specialized equipment, one of the staffs wearing a headphone made OK sign. Chief Magdanese nodded once and pushed the call button.



「This is Sharon Magdanese, the chief of national security bureau. You are?」



『How do you do, chief-done. Although it's only through a phone, it's an honor that I can talk with a living legend like you. I, let's see……can I ask you to call me Odin?』



「……Pretending to be the chief god of Norse Mythology? It's really painful listening to you trying to match your theme with Berserk's naming like that.」



For some reason Kousuke pressed on his chest. Vanessa's lips grinned broadly just for an instant. But, right now was a serious time, so everyone cordially ignored them.



『How biting. As expected from the iron woman who has shouldered the country's safety for many years until now. Even though I granted Kimberly-kun quite a lot of man power, but as expected it seems that it's too heavy of a burden for him to be your opponent.』



「Enough with the idle talk. Get straight to the point.」



『It's really sad that you are lacking in playfulness……well, I guess it's fine. I only have one demand. Hand over Emily Grant that the security bureau is sheltering.』



Emily's shoulders shook from shock. Seeing that, Carl and Sophie nestled close to her and gave her a hug to support her.



「Do you think, that I'll comply with that demand?」



『You have no choice but to comply. If not, berserkers will raise the first cry of their birth in the middle of city. Just like this』



Right after that,



「a, Ga, aAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!」



A shriek resounded in the warehouse district at night. Everyone was startled and their gaze moved toward the source of the roar.



Over there, there was the figure of Kimberly convulsing fiercely with the white of his eyes still exposed. The handcuff restraining his hand on his back was raising creaking sound, displaying how great the pressure that was being put to it.



「Get back! Everyone get back! Take distance and surround him in half-circle!」



The chief's order resounded and the troops moved simultaneously. The staffs were also moving quickly even with uneasy look emerging on their face so that they wouldn't be a hindrance for the special squad.



Everyone understood. The abnormal state of Kimberly was the symptom of him transforming into berserker. But, their expression was overflowing with bewilderment and doubt. That couldn't be helped. Kimberly wasn't seen consuming the drug of【Berserk】. If someone was dashed with the drug, then they would turn into berserker in a matter of seconds. The question was how could Kimberly who was in restrain was now displaying the symptom in this timing.



Kousuke and Vanessa shifted their position to protect Emily and Grant family while taking wait-and-see stance. During that time, Kimberly finally tore off the metallic shackle using his enlarged body and reinforced muscle.



「oOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!」



Kimberly whose looks now had overreached a little bit too much from being wild-type, glared at the surrounding with bloodshot eyes. No one understood how Kimberly suddenly turned into berserker, even so it didn't change the situation that there was a threat before them.



Therefore, the captain was about to give the shooting order.



『Kimberly-kun. Thank you for the great demonstration. ……You can die already now.』



「Gih, gah!?」



The voice of the man who introduced himself as Odin streamed out from the phone speaker. It was a death sentence that sounded really light. The next moment, Kimberly who even now was deciding of which prey to attack suddenly twitched and convulsed, and then it began to writhe in agony while raising anguished voice.



While everyone was feeling baffled, white smoke was raising from the whole body of Kimberly and his body was enlarged even further while unpleasant sound *book book* could be heard. And then, the next moment when his body height reached three meter, he dried up and shriveled all at once like a balloon that was leaking out air.



「……This is……Berserk overdose?」



Emily whispered in a daze. The symptom occurring in Kimberly's body was exactly as Emily diagnosed. It was indeed due to Berserk overdose.



「What, did you do?」



With an expressionless gaze, Chief Magdanese was staring at her former subordinate who was meeting his end in an excessively gruesome fashion while she threw a question at the smartphone she was holding.



『You can guess can't you? It's not something that is especially difficult. A capsule filled with normal dose of Berserk, and another capsule made from concentrated Berserk that is three times the amount for overdose, those capsules were set so they would broke using remote control, then I made Kimberly-kun swallowed them. Even without antidote, I can dispose him using overdose, that's how it is.』



Odin's words caused most people to be speechless. Even calling this man as inhuman still felt lacking. This act should be called as fiendish among the fiendish. But, Odin continued his speech as though to say that there was no need to even pay attention to something like that.



『Now then, I think you understand already, but if you refuse to hand over Emily Grant, perhaps a berserker will suddenly appear in a city somewhere. You know, I have faith that you who is shouldering the safety of this country will not commit any foolish action that will lead to that.』



「No negotiation with terrorist. That is the international practice.」



『Terrorist? Let's not make a joke. I am a businessman. I'm merely doing the best I can for the sake of profit. This is a transaction. I think it's only common sense for the side that makes the proposal to obtain advantage in the negotiation.』



「……」



Chief Magdanese fell silent. This man didn't think of anything about murder. No matter how many sacrifice would result, if it was for his own profit then he would surely discard everything. Her abundant experience told her that Odin's warped and broken sense of values was the real thing.



She felt a slight hesitation. The figure of Kousuke was reflected in Chief Magdanese's quietly opened eyes. He was staring straight back at Chief Magdanese.



Next, Chief Magdanese looked at Grant family. Carl and Sophia who were hugging Emily close were looking so pale they looked like they could faint anytime, their expression was a grievous one. But, as for the daughter in question Emily,



「……」



「……」



There was no word. For a moment, Emily's gaze moved away from Chief Magdanese toward Kousuke at her side. And then, within a moment, a small smile emerged on her lips. Like that, flame was blazing within the eyes that returned toward Chief Magdanese. It was flame of rage and resolve. That passion was certainly conveyed toward Chief Magdanese.



「Fine. I'll hand over Emily Grant.」



Carl and Sophia were about to protest loudly with despairing expression, but Emily herself stopped them.



『That's a heroic decision, chief-dono.』



Odin's voice turned slightly lively. His superiority complex oozed out from being put on an overwhelmingly dominant position.



After that, Odin told them the delivery place and the method of delivery before cutting off the communication.



「How is it?」



「……I'm sorry. We were led astray by dummy.」



Chief Magdanese returned a brief「I see」to the vexed staff. It seemed she really didn't expect much from that venue. In exchange, her gaze captured Kousuke.



「And? What will you do?」



Kousuke shrugged. He looked back across his shoulder at Emily. No word was exchanged between the two. But, when Kousuke nodded with a grin, Emily smiled softly without even a speck of unease there.



Kousuke who turned toward Chief Magdanese again then smiled fearlessly while saying.



「The other side expressly showed their tail to us. There is no reason to stay quiet isn't it? This is where both sides alternate the offense and defense turn. I am the hunting dog, and they are the prey. It's time to punish them grandly.」



Chief Magdanese sent a brief glance at the shivering Vanessa before making a deep sigh, and then she whispered with a faint smile.



「Hunting dog? Call yourself Fenrir instead. I'm feeling like going along with that god make-believe, just for a bit.」



The troops who seemed to catch that whisper were smiling wryly while nodding. Vanessa-san was sending Chief Magdanese a gaze that seemed to say「Even the chief can also speak a really excellent line huh」.



……For some reason, Chief Magdanese felt like she wanted to go home very much.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Postscript



I also wrote this at my activity report but, the latest chapter of the comic version was updated.



I put the activity report late at night, so just to be sure, I reported it here too.



Kaorin is super heroine, so if you have interest, please try to have a look at Overlap-sama’s homepage without fail.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 212




It was the time when the sun was reaching the peak, when warm could be felt even in this chilly air.



It was also the time for afternoon break. Places like café and the likes in the downtown were showing bustling situation as suits the occasion with housewives and company employees.



In one of such café, the wooden building complemented with furniture, table, and chair that were similarly made from wood brought out chic calm atmosphere. It was an old shop that was locally famous. Kousuke was there.



The inside of the café was spacious. Even the second floor was usable, which was rare for an old shop. About a third of the café starting from the entrance was used as atrium, so someone standing near the banister at the second floor could observe well the situation at the first floor. Kousuke and co were sitting around the table near the banister at that second floor.



「Britain has strong image of bad food, but delicious shop is normally delicious isn't it?」



「Kousuke……it's not like I'm saying that it's bad, but what are you doing eating normally like that? Even though this is a place that the enemy designated……」



Kousuke was stuffing his cheeks enthusiastically with salmon sandwich, one of the specialties of this café. Seeing that, Emily made a troubled expression while she took a sip at her own tea that had been mixed with a lot of milk.



「Isn't it fine, Doctor Grant. He doesn't lose his presence of mind in any kind of time. As expected from Kousuke-san. I'm getting wet.」



「Paradis, please bear the TPO in mind. I'll arrest you for public obscenity.」



Vanessa who in a glance looked serious with her crisp expression ran her mouth saying such obscene thing. Before her partner Emily could make a retort as the straight man, an intensely chilly warning was given. It was Chief Magdanese who was drinking black tea with a composed atmosphere.



Yesterday, after they received contact from the mastermind who introduced himself as Odin, a mail that detailed of the time and place to hand over Emily Grant was sent to the smartphone Kimberly left behind.



It was this place. It was a bit unexpected for the delivery to be done in this café at the afternoon when it was overflowing with people, but when an additional instruction that Chief Magdanese would be the one doing the handing over at that place, this method could be said very clever.



The habitual practice for something like this would be for Emily alone to be present at the designated place, but naturally the enemy would be on guard against tracking measure. And then what they would be worried about the most was in a case that a countermeasure that was beyond mere tracking measure was applied.



Yes, they feared that the security bureau would take step to erase Emily. It was hard to imagine that the security bureau would let go of Emily under their very nose to the hand of the enemy after they knew the value of【Berserk】. In this situation, such last measure had to be kept in mind.



Emily going alone to the designated place where she then got retrieved by the enemy, if here she wasn't attached with tracking measure but explosive instead……. Honestly, that would be unbearable. Even the enemy was a creature that belonged in darkness, that was why they knew about how lacking in mercy Chief Magdanese was.



But, if they designated a place that was crowded like this, and furthermore they made Chief Magdanese to also attend, then as expected even Chief Magdanese wouldn't be able to take that kind of measure without doubt. And then, they would ascertain that Emily really didn't carry anything unnecessary at the scene of the handing over.



By the way, Kousuke and Vanessa attending the handing over were due to Chief Magdanese's instruction. Naturally the enemy instructed for Chief Magdanese to do the handing over alone, but it seemed that she would take a stance of「I brought them by mistake. It can't be helped that they are here right?」.



Kousuke wasn't even hiding himself, but from the perspective of the enemy who was desiring Emily so much that hand could grasp out from their throat, it seemed that they wouldn't be able to do anything other than complaining about instruction violation of this level. Leaving that aside, it was better for Kousuke and Vanessa to be at Emily's side to show that they weren't yes-man, and also as the support Emily's heart.



Although, honestly, putting aside Kousuke, perhaps it was a bit of failure to let Vanessa attend too. That was what Chief Magdanese was thinking.



「And, it's okay that you are entranced by the salmon sandwich but, what about the surrounding's state, Mr. Abyssgate?」



「It's Kousuke. Are you listening? My name is Kousuke, okay, chief-san.」



「Yes, I understand Mr. Abyssgate. And? There isn't any report about something suspicious from the deployed personnel, but I wonder if there is anyone suspicious slipping in the crowd?」



「……The plump middle-aged man in grey suits entering the café just now, and the emaciated middle-aged female arriving right now. It's vague, but they are looking strangely nervous for someone who only arrived for lunch.」



Chief-san didn't change the way she called him no matter how many times he said it. Perhaps she was unexpectedly bearing grudge from getting her prided squad half-destroyed. She gave no damn at the reproachful gaze of Kousuke. While pretending to drink her black tea, using a receiver attached on her arm cuff, she called the attention of the personnel that were standing by without showing even a bit of unnatural sign.



Emily who was smiling faintly seeing that exchange then sighed a bit. It was as though she was unraveling her breathing that she didn't realize was tense. Kousuke who sharply noticed that moved her reproachful gaze from Chief Magdanese toward Emily.



「What's the matter Emily? As I thought, are you feeling scared?」



It seemed Emily was happy that Kousuke noticed the small change in herself. She returned a soft smile at Kousuke's worried gaze. Inside that smile, there was heat that were unmistakably filled with immense trust and an even more immense special feeling that could be peeked on in a glance.



「I'm fine Kousuke. I was a bit tense, but I'm not scared or anything. Because Kousuke is staying at my side. Surely this spot is the safest place in the world.」



「Uh huh.」



Kousuke replied curtly. However that wasn't because he was apathetic, but because he was shy from the trust and good will that a beautiful girl were sending to him without any doubt. His faintly red ears showed that more eloquently than anything.



By the way, the people of Grant family were currently safeguarded in the truest meaning at a facility of the security bureau. The elites of security bureau and Kousuke's clone body were standing on guard there, so it could be said to be completely safe. That too made it so no unease and fear existed in Emily's heart.



「I'm also not scared you know, Kousuke-san. I believe in you. I love you.」



「Wait Vanessa! What are you saying out of nowhere! It's no good if you say something like that so lightly!」



Vanessa-san nonchalantly confessed her love with extremely serious expression. Emily's cheeks turned red while she retorted, or rather she intimidated. The voice of her heart「Get your hand away from my Kousuke!」felt like it was audible somehow.



Kousuke who got good will directed at him from two women was troubled, about should he convey the truth that he couldn't properly say since last night due to the all the mess――that actually he had a beloved lover who his heart had decided on. No, he definitely should tell them about it, but the problem was choosing the timing.



Just what kind of change would occur in Emily's mental state if Rana's existence was shed light on at this series of events that showed no sign of stopping……. It was a matter that ought to be informed to her quickly, but in the worst case it would bring about bad influence at the situation from here on.



Even while Kousuke kept worrying 'uu~n', he saw how the straight (?) confession of Vanessa who knew no shame was causing Emily's face to turn red before she shook her head with her side-tail shaking left and right, her mind worriedly thinking「Uu, is it better if I properly speak out too? But, that's really embarrassing!」. That caused him to determine himself that it was better to say it clearly with urgency.



「He, hey, Emily.」



「Whaaat, Kousuke.」



Emily-chan's cheeks loosened up broadly in a smile, as though she was happy only from getting called. There was a theory that it was easy for man and woman who were sharing dangerous situation to convert the nervousness they felt at that time into emotion of love, but in Emily's case, it seemed that theory was spot on. As expected from an easy heroine.



Seeing how Emily was like that, Kousuke went「Uuh」with his words got hitched inside his throat. From Emily who was waiting for Kousuke's words, he could see the vision of dog ears on Emily's head and a dog tail on Emily's lower back. Those visions were shaken to left and right so energetically. She looked like a loyal dog that was waiting for her owner's word.



――Genius girl wearing lab coat, cat eyes, blond hair, side-tail, charisma guard, peeing girl, straight-man attribute, easy heroine. And then, loyal dog attribute toward someone she liked.



Just how many attributes she was planning to increase……



Honestly speaking, the figure of Emily waiting for his words with wide smile was really lovely and charming. But, exactly because of that, that Kousuke resolved himself and opened his mouth.



「Yo, you see, I, actually――」



「They are coming. Stop with the youthful scene there, focus yourself.」



Chief Magdanese's cool voice interrupted him decisively. Kousuke's cheeks were twitching. Emily's expression turned puzzled, but she immediately tensed her expression.



Chief Magdanese and Vanessa were looking at downstairs. There were three men wrapped in black suit and coat. Their expression couldn't be understood because of the sunglasses they were wearing, but their atmosphere was obviously different from civilian. Those who understood would understand. These three had heavy air coiling around them, air of someone used to immorality and violence.



The three men were slowly looking over inside the café, and then they noticed the gaze of Chief Magdanese looking down at them from the second floor and they lifted the corner of their lips. And then, they climbed the stairs that connected to the second floor.



「Hmph? Chief-san, what is the meaning of this?」



「Is there any problem?」



One of the men stood still and shifted his sunglasses while glaring at Vanessa. But, Chief Magdanese calmly replied to the question, and so the man only snorted before sitting down on an empty chair. The other two were sitting on the chair at the neighboring table.



The moment the man sat down, his gaze crawled all over Emily without any reservation. Emily looked aside without even hiding her disgusted look. And then, perhaps because it was his habit, the man snorted again. And then without even asking permission, he took the ginger ale Kousuke ordered and drank the content in one gulp.



「Well, no matter. Our side won't make any complain if you hand over Emily Grant to us. I think you understand, but don't have any stupid idea. Including tracking.」



The man lightly lifted his hand. In response, one of the men took out a small device from his breast pocket. And then, he pointed that device at Emily. It seemed that it was something to search for transmitter.



At the same time, the man took out something square from his breast pocket. It looked like a Zippo lighter which made *kin-* sound when its lid was opened. Inside it wasn't anything like incendiary apparatus, but a button.



「It's interesting isn't it? Just by scattering a bit of bait to cornered people, they will do anything you want. Just with a single cheque, they will believe shady words like being test subject for new nutrients and swallow unknown thing. They will even obediently follow sudden cryptic instruction to go into this café for example.」



The speech of the man who was putting on a warped smile caused Emily to grit her teeth audibly and Vanessa to glare wrathfully. Needless to say, the man meant that people who had taken capsule-type Berserk were inside this café. And then, the detonator that looked like lighter the man was holding could destroy the capsule and transformed those people into berserker that wouldn't be able to go back to normal. In the middle of this crowded café with the sun high in the sky.



The man pretended to tremble at Emily and Vanessa's wrath.



「It doesn't seem like you are that Odin. And then, what are you going to do after taking away Doctor Grant? You will make her create the antidote, cause pandemic of【Berserk】to outbreak, and then make a killing in profit……by that point of time you will be tracked down you know? It will be the same even if you sell it to some organization somewhere in the underworld. Do you think you will be able to get away from the security bureau?」



「Who knows. That's not something that lowly bunch like us will know. That will be boss's decision. Now then, we also cannot keep making pointless talk. How about we excuse ourselves soon?」



The man directed his gaze at the man who was checking for tracking device. The man who seemed to finish already his checking shook his head and reported that he found nothing. The first man nodded in satisfaction hearing that and he put his hand on Emily's shoulder. *twitch*, Emily's body trembled, not from shock or fear, but simply from disgust.



Vanessa was about to reflexively drive off that hand, but then the man showed off the lighter detonator.



He showed――



「Kufuh」



「Puh」



「Fufuh」



Vanessa spontaneously snorted. Emily also averted her face with her shoulders shaking. And in a very rare occasion, even Chief Magdanese had a small smile on her lips.



That couldn't be helped. After all what the man was lifting with expression of contempt that was full of sense of superiority as though to say 'you cannot do anything can't you huh' was……



A salmon sandwich.



Furthermore, it was a remain of one that had been eaten until a size that was about the same with the lighter, a bite-sized salmon sandwich. It was accompanied with a lot of splendid bite mark.



「!?」



The man raised a soundless voice of shock and threw that salmon sandwich to the ground. And then, he stood up while kicking down the chair before taking one, two step away from Chief Magdanese and co.



「You bitches, screwing around with me!」



The man immediately guessed that the detonator had been replaced when he didn't notice, and that the perpetrator must be Vanessa who was attending here for some reason. He was about to take out something from his breast pocket. Most likely it was a spare detonator.



The man quickly took that out and thrust it forward threateningly.



Yes, it was a bite-sized salmon sandwich.



「What the hell!?」



Emily, Vanessa, and Chief Magdanese burst out「pufuh」once again. Hearing that, the man turned beet red from shame and confusion.



「Oi-! Take out the spare! Blow up the first and the second!」



The man ordered the third man. It seemed that the third man was also in possession of the detonator. A spare on top of spare. They were really prepared.



Although, there was no response from the third man toward the first man's order. The reason was



「Oi-. You listening!? Quickly――wait, why the hell you bastard stuffing your mouth with salmon sandwich huh!?」



Yes, the third man had his mouth stuffed full with salmon sandwich. The first man was enraged and he gripped the shoulder of his subordinate who got the sauce of salmon sandwich trickling down from the corner of his mouth, and he pulled him up forcefully.



Then, with a shake the third man fell face-up limply, exposing his face, the white of his eyes were laid bare with salmon sandwich still filling his mouth. The man unconsciously raised his voice「Oo!?」in shock and backed away. *thud* A sound came from behind him and he turned around in reaction.



Over there was,



「You got salmon sandwich too!?」



As expected, there he saw another of his subordinate fainted with salmon sandwich stuffing his mouth and the white of his eyes exposed. In addition, both of his hands were joined together on his chest for some reason, like a corpse that was put inside a coffin.



「What, what is happe――」



「Isn't it simple? The salmon sandwich of this café is just too delicious. So much so that the moment they ate it, they ascended to heaven. That's all.」



「-!?」



Hearing the unknown voice resounding from right behind him, the man twitched while turning around. Over there he saw Kousuke stuffing his mouth elegantly (?) with salmon sandwich. He might be transformed halfway to Lord Abyssgate, because even though his attire was still the same but he was wearing sunglasses.



While the man stiffened seeing the unfamiliar Japanese young man with the strange atmosphere, Kousuke called「Isn't that right?」to a young female waitress stiffening in slight distance away due to the commotion, looking for agreement.



The waitress who suddenly got attention directed at her shook her head left and right forcefully while strongly denying「Our salmon sandwich is not that delicious!」. Surely she meant to imply that 'No one will want to eat sandwich that send people to heaven!'……



That voice of the waitress that unexpectedly resounded really well reached the first floor. A middle-aged man that seemed to be the shop manager looked up in wonder about what was going on there. Seeing the beautiful vein emerging on that man's head, it seemed that the waitress's implication wasn't conveyed correctly to him. The future of the girl's employment in this café from here on was in doubt.



「Yo, you think you can get away by doing something like this? We are not the only one carrying detonator you know? Even now, this place――」



「Are you talking about the five men who monitored this place? Or perhaps, about the people who were watching the image being sent by the hidden camera set up inside the café? If it's them, then right now they should be heading to a special hotel escorted by the kindly considerate troops I think. Everyone is sound asleep. It seems they cannot stand their everyday exhausting work. Don't you think that your company is too black?」(TN: Black company = a company that exploit its employee too much)



「I, impossible……」



The man tried to take out a communication device from his pocket in panic.



……What came out was a salmon sandwich.



Also, the one that made the enemy observing this café from outside to faint was of course Kousuke. The hidden cameras inside the café were searched around by Kousuke in full invisibility last night, while the bureau staffs traced the communication channel and determined the location of the observers.



During the time Kousuke was searching for hidden camera, the enemy force that was observing the café in case the bureau was setting up something to the building sometimes witnessed black shadow displayed in the camera out of nowhere. They all shrieked in complete chaos yelling things like「Tha, that's Shadowman! This is the first time I saw it!」or「Lies……even though I shouldn't have any supernatural sense」or「AMEN-, AMEEEN-!」.



Even when Kousuke normally entered their room, they were replaying the recorded video while,



「Don't you think this will be big money if we bring it to TV station?」



「Wa, wait. This is the real Shadowman you know? I, heard something before. That there are dangerous guys researching something like this.」



「Aa, I also heard that from mummy. In this world, there is occultist group who is extremely fond for something like this, so be careful she said. She also said, that even if you see it, just pretend you never saw anything. If not, you are going to get kidnapped somewhere, and turned into sacrifice for black magician.」



「Seriously……it's scary, this underworld organization……」



They said things like that to each other while making a fuss. It went without saying that Kousuke made a retort「No, you color is different, but you guys are also members of underworld organization」.



And then, Kousuke who was suddenly driven up by mischievous heart took how he was unnoticed as a good opportunity and he tried to cause several bizarre phenomenon. For example he made the door to open and close on its own accord, then he made knocking sound from outside the window, and kidnapped them one by one unnoticed, and wrote「next is you」using magic on the monitor while the panicked people didn't notice, and so on, and in the end, he twined steel thread on the legs of one of them, and pulled that person out from the room……



The expression of the remaining people who were witnessing the figure of their comrade screaming while reaching out his hand to them, however, it went in vain and he was pulled by something unseen and disappeared deep in the corridor……those were expression that had trauma completely planted in it.



And then, the bureau staffs that were watching that from the side exploded in laughter all at once. It also went without saying that Chief Magdanese covered her face with both hands while sighing.



All the enemies fell into the bottom of terror, in addition they were perfectly apprehended. Kousuke who accomplished that was welcomed by all the bureau staffs with high five and「Iyahha―!」. Seeing that, Chief Magdanese whispered「I should just go home already」. It could be seen how tired she was from that.



Now then, putting aside Chief Magdanese who was having a faraway look from remembering the event that gave her headache last night, the man who possessed nothing but salmon sandwich and whose comrades were annihilated without him noticing was drenched with cold sweat while he tried to turn around.



「Well, don't be in such a hurry. I'm thinking of making you as our guide. That's why, it will be troubling if you go home by yourself.」



「Gu, guide you say? To boss's place? Hah, that's pointless. I'm not going to say anything yeah? I know really well boss's scariness. If I betray him, just what kind of hell I'll taste then……it's better to die.」



「I see. You will surely guide us gladly after this. I'm convinced of that. Anyway, we will become nuisance staying here. Let's have a slow talk over there okay?」



Kousuke stood up from his chair and put on a smile on his face. Seeing that, the man yelled「Shit-」while trying to jump out from the terrace of the second floor. Because Kousuke was blocking the stair, he thought that he would be able to escape somehow if it was just from the second floor.



But, there was no way Kousuke could be taken by surprise just from that much,



「Abyss-style Martial Art's Secret Technique――"Inconsiderable Banquet of Gluttony(Salmon Sandwich Got No Match!)"」



「Mugah!?」



Kousuke that circled behind the man instantly stuffed his mouth full with salmon sandwich. The writhing man was completely pinioned from behind with his mouth being pressed down, unable to run away or spit out the sandwich.



The man became half-panicked and for a while he kept struggling and kicking around, but before long his eyes rolled up and exposed the white of his eyes, and he fainted powerlessly. A scrap of salmon slipped out from the mouth of the limply falling man.



「Yep, as I thought, the salmon sandwich of this café is amazing. It instantly send people to heaven.」



Kousuke nodded in satisfaction while looking at the fainting man. Everyone inside the café thought this. 「No, you just made him suffocate normally there」. But they didn't say it out loud. Because, it was scary.



Chief Magdanese whose sigh remarkably increased in number these few days was sighing even deeper while sending sign to her subordinates. The rushing subordinates quickly apprehended the three men and furthermore they also politely led away several of the guests that seemed to have【Berserk】administered into them.



The café fell into uproar from the sudden arrest. In the middle of that Emily was making a complicated expression while asking Kousuke who was going to leave the café following behind Chief Magdanese.



「Hey, Kousuke. Why are you so fixated with salmon sandwich like that? Do you love it?」



「Yep, I love it.」



「I, is that so……」



Of course, Kousuke answered that he loved salmon sandwich. But, Emily's face turned red from seeing Kousuke saying 'love' with a serious face that was staring straight at her. With a glance at Emily who was like that, Kousuke climbed down the stairs while he started to explain with exposition that was at the same level like a certain gourmet reporter whose catchphrase was 'jewel box of taste ya~', about just how amazing the salmon sandwich of this store was. (TN: In Japan there is this famous gourmet reporter named Hikomaru, with a catch phrase of 'jewel box of (insert food name here) ya~'. It seems this guy's cheerful personality and impactful comment made him the face of the present era gourmet program)



That night the moon was completely hidden by the cloud. In this dark world without light from the night sky, there was a high-rise building illuminated brilliantly by artificial light. For a normal company, at this time most of the employees would be home already and there would be few lighting, but it was only this building that was leaking out light from all of its floors.



The entrance of that high-rise building and the outer wall near the highest floor were drawn with the company name and emblem. The company name was【Gamma Pharmaceutical】.



A car's headlight was illuminating the back road of that【Gamma Pharmaceutical】. The car was stopped once by the guard in front of the gate of iron bars. The man behind the car's steering wheel showed his face to that guard and also his identification card.



It seemed that the guard knew the face of the driver. The guard showed a wry smile while giving words of appreciation「Must be hard work to come at this kind of time even though you aren't even a researcher」. He then took the identification card to the guard room and used a card reader to read the card to open the gate.



The man behind the driving seat shrugged his shoulders and said「It's the superior's command. I cannot go against it」while receiving back his identification card. At that time, the guard saw the person sitting at the backseat and he raised his eyebrows questioningly.



When the driver told the guard「This person is a genius doctor even if she look like this. It seems she will be our company's hidden ace you know」, it seemed the person in the backseat noticed that they were talking about her. The girl wearing lab coat with her hair tied into side-tail then faced toward the guard and smiled friendlily.



Being smiled at by an amiable beautiful girl, the middle-aged guard slackened down and he smiled broadly. And then he said「Even though you are still young, you mustn't force yourself too hard to work until this kind of time you know」while drawing back.



The car then passed through the gate and kept running until its figure vanished into a rear entrance for the underground parking area.



The car parked on a corner of the underground parking area before the driver and girl in lab coat――Emily got down.



「Is this place really where the mastermind is staying? This is a large company that can be counted in one hand even at Britain.」



「So you doesn't believe it Miss? I said already that I am the direct subordinate of this place's president――Kaysis Wentworks.」



「Shut up. I won't talk to you.」



「……Ou.」



The man who received that really piercing reply got sullen. Even so he obediently backed down. He, the man who fainted after eating Kousuke's secret technique――Woody urged Emily to move with a pouting face.



Following Woody's guidance, they rode an exclusive elevator that would only move using employee ID card. This high-rise building had 66 floors in total with a height that surpassed 200 meters. They could see the night view of the city from the high-speed elevator that was attached on the outside. The higher the elevator got, the wider the view that could be seen.



「It's beautiful……」



「Yeah, this scenery――」



「I'm not talking to you.」



「……Got it.」



Woody's feeling was hurt from that second piercing reply. A beautiful girl with sparkling eyes clinging at the scenery outside, and a tough man exposing pouting face beside her. The scene was really surreal.



Before long, *ting* along with such sound, the elevator's floor display showed they were at the highest floor. Emily who came back to her senses from that sound turned around and followed behind Woody who had exited the elevator first. They passed over several corners and rooms, through several electronic locks, and in the end reached a heavy door that was engraved with the company's emblem.



Woody walked toward the display installed beside the two-leaf door and pressed a button.



「Boss, this is Woody. Just as my message, I arrived just now. I'm bringing Doctor Grant.」



『Finally. I'm opening the door now.』



The door of the president's office was constructed so it could only be opened from inside. Because of that, Woody and Emily waited for the room's owner Kaysis to open the door.



*pushu* With the sound of air spurting out, the two-leaf door opened. The two of them entered with Woody in the lead. The door immediately closed behind them. Emily looked at that across her shoulder and inside her heart she evaluated that the enemy was really cautious.



When her gaze returned to the front, she saw a man at his early thirty sitting deeply on a luxurious chair. He was a slender and blond man. His narrow eyes that looked like fox and his loose and slovenly smile gave a frivolous impression that didn't suit a president of a large company.



But, the moment that man saw the figure of Emily behind Woody, Emily saw inside the man's slightly opened eyes and unconsciously felt gooseflesh in her spine.



She thought that this man was like a snake. His gaze was that of a snake catching sight of a mouse that would be the prey. She must not be deceived by this man's external frivolous impression. Cunning and malice were compressed inside this man. Yes, detestable aura that made her unconditionally believed that was expressed in this man's eyes.



Emily unconsciously stopped walking all of a sudden. Seeing that caused Kaysis's smile to deepen further. His evil smile that gave no hint of humanity made Emily to spontaneously gulp loudly. Even Woody that was slightly in front of her also gulped loudly like her. Surely he understood just how evil that smile was.



「Hey, Emily-chan. Nice of you to come. My company welcomes you with open arms.」



Kaysis stood up and detoured around his large desk while spreading his hands open in a welcoming gesture. Emily almost shrank back from the approaching mass of malice, however, she suddenly noticed what she was about to do and she gritted her teeth.



And then, she returned her drawing back foot to its former spot and glared back threateningly with piercing cat-eyes.



Kaysis displayed emotion of surprise for a moment, but he soon started to stare with a gaze of unconcealed sadism.



「How nice, that arouse me. A girl making that kind of eye is just my favorite. How about it Emily-chan? Won't you become mine instead of just being a researcher in my company? You will be able to obtain anything you wish by doing that you know?」



「And, you will torment me who naturally is going to refuse, and then want to make me say that with my own mouth isn't that right? Anyway, go through plastic surgery first. The vulgarity of your character is coming out on your face you know?」



Even while Emily was still shaking a bit, but she threw back a scathing reply boldly. Woody looked back to her with a slightly shocked expression. Kaysis's expression was increasingly changing as though there was a delicious fruit put in front of him.



「That's a hurtful way of speaking. But, it arouses me instead. Just how long you can continue with that kind of attitude, aa, I'm really looking forward to it more and more.」



「Your disgusting behavior doesn't matter. Rather than that, are you Odin?」



While nodding, Kaysis approached until he was in short distance from Emily who was asking that to him with undisguised revulsion.



「Indeed, that's correct. I am Odin. Well, that name is just for a jest though. My real name is Kaysis Wentworks.」



「You were……the one that stole【Berserk】? The one that released the infected person in the middle of city?」



Kaysis's fingertip stroked Emily's cheek. Even while feeling nausea from that touch, Emily asked for confirmation to him. She wanted to confirm, 'are you the main culprit of everything?', like that.



「You can say that, but you can also say that it's not so.」



「What do you mean? Answer me!」



「Fufu, you are really strong-willed. Just like a cute cat.」



Kaysis dodged Emily's questioning noncommittally. His snake-like eyes shined while his hand touched Emily's slender neck. Of course, just with that it would be impossible to choke the neck and kill a person. But, most likely he just wanted to see Emily's suffering face for fun.



Emily's face slightly grimaced when that hand jerked with strength. Kaysis's expression was increasingly filled with joy by that but……



「……What are you doing?」



「I cannot just stay quiet watching more than this. Can I ask you to take off that hand from the miss?」



The one that grasped Kaysis's hand and forcefully jerked it away from Emily's neck was the man at her side――Woody. Kaysis sent him a dangerous gaze. Kaysis's eyes were tinged with dangerous light from how his subordinate showed an unforeseen rebellious attitude, and from how he called Emily as「miss」.



「I wonder if you understand just who are you opening your mouth to. Or else, don't tell me you are cajoled by this child? No matter how unlikely I think that is.」



「No way, such thing is unimaginable to happen between me and miss. Besides, I'm doing this with full preparedness for everything.」



Kaysis shook off Woody's arm roughly, then he took out a handgun offhandedly from his breast pocket and pointed it at Woody. At the same time, he snapped his finger *pachin* and armed men appeared from hidden doors set up everywhere inside the room. They pointed their gun muzzle toward Woody.



However, Woody who knew about the existence of the guards standing by inside the room naturally wasn't perturbed.



「Full preparedness? I really don't get you. Just what in the world happened?」



「Nothing special. If I'm forced to say, then it's because I found a place with better employment term than here I guess. Any humble salary man will change their job to a place with better condition right?」



「Hou. I see, so you are cajoled by the security bureau. Just how much you can receive from them? Aa, just to be clear, I'm not planning to ask you to come back by offering you more than their offer. Your fate is decided already here.」



「Even if you told me to come back, I absolutely won't. After all, it's remuneration that you cannot possibly prepare.」



「……It's that much money? Answer, how much that you got?」



So much remuneration to the degree that a president of a large company that was in the top five of Britain couldn't match it. Kaysis's expression was slightly colored with interest when he was told something like that. He was wondering, just what kind of world the security bureau used to steal his subordinate.



Seeing Kaysis like that, the corner of Woody's lips rose up in a wide grin. And then with a boastful, elated, and joyful expression that couldn't be suppressed!!, he spoke the detail of the remuneration he obtained.



「Kukuh, listen and be astonished! My reward iiis, the finest quality of salmon sandwich, FOR A YEARRRR-!」



「……………………………………………………hm?」



Kaysis-san was confused. His heinous air was unconsciously scattered apart and he tilted his head plainly thinking「Am I mishearing?」. The other guards were also the same like that.



Amidst such confusion, Emily who knew about the circumstance made a complicated expression as expected. And then, for the second time she asked the same question like before in the café.



「Hey, Kousuke. Why is it salmon sandwich? Do you like it that much?」



Hearing Emily calling a name of a person he had never heard before, Kaysis sent a suspicious gaze at her.



But, at the next moment, he turned around in shock.



「Aa, yeah. Honestly, even I myself am thinking, perhaps this hypnotist is wrong.」



The guards also turned around.



Over there, before anyone knew it, a young man in black clothes was sitting on the president chair while scratching on his cheek with a wry smile.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



About the salmon sandwich pressuring of this chapter.



If I have to say why, that's because the author is getting fixated with it.



Salmon sandwich that is unexpectedly off-the-shelf.



If I made a handmade one, it was doubtful the chapter posting would make it in time……



I'm sorry.



The next update is planned at 6 P.M Saturday too.





Chapter 213




With magnificent night sky as the background, a young man in black clothes was sitting on the president chair.



Such a sight made even Kaysis to be struck dumb and lost for word. The guards at the surrounding too, they were guards that were under the direct control of the president, usually no matter what the situation was they wouldn’t be shaken and able to react swiftly, but it was only at this time that they exposed a stupid expression without being able to aim their gun.



「Emily, over here.」



「Yes!」



Kousuke beckoned with his hand and Emily rushed toward him with an excited voice. Even though her external appearance was like a haughty cat, but dog ears and dog tail could be hallucinated to be attached on her. That energetically shaking ears and tail truly made her fit to be doggy Emily-chan……



Emily circled around the large desk with cute sound of footsteps *pata-pata* and without stopping she stopped still right beside Kousuke.



After that, ‘Don’t leave me behind!’ with such feel, Woody followed behind in hurry while his footsteps were loudly resounding. And then he came to a stop at the opposite side of Emily and slightly behind.



……Someone sitting snugly on the president chair, waited on by a beautiful girl beside him and a scary-looking man standing by behind him.



No matter how anyone looked, it was Kousuke that looked like a mastermind. Perhaps it should be said that it was just as expected from the right-hand man of the demon king.



「……What are you? Where did you enter from?」



Kaysis recovered quickly from his agitation, and then he asked toward Kousuke who was sitting on his chair while staring angrily.



That question was only natural to be asked. The elevator that Emily and Woody were riding was the only route that could lead to this president office. Naturally that elevator was installed with security cameras which could be watched from the president office. There were countless security cameras existing between the elevator until the president office, and naturally there was also a security camera in front of the door of the president office.



Naturally Kaysis himself checked on all those cameras, and the guards who now finally moved their gun muzzle, they should have also checked the monitors at the observation room located at the other side of the hidden door of the president room.



But, there wasn’t even a single one among them who detected Kousuke’s existence.



To enter this room located at the highest floor, it could only by getting through the front door that could only be opened by Kaysis from inside. If that door was closed, the room would completely become a closed room. The air duct’s size couldn’t be entered by human and it would be absurd for someone to enter from the window.



From the point of view of Kaysis and others, in this situation there was no other way to describe it other than this young man suddenly appearing out of nowhere.



Although, the answer of Kousuke was simple.



「Even if you ask me from where, wasn’t it you who invited me in? From that door over there.」



「Impossible. I don’t know someone like you……」



「Well, that’s because I’m just a little bit inconspicuous. I won’t be bothered even if you overlooked me, not at all. I’m speaking the truth you know?」



Kousuke shrugged. This time he was following Emily from behind using full power invisibility while making use of the blind spot of the security cameras, so it was justified that they didn’t notice him, and he was also really not bothered by it. It was his habit, of making excuse「I’m not bothered okay? I’m really not hurt okay?」when other people couldn’t notice him.



Kaysis naturally couldn’t believe Kousuke’s answer, and he guessed that Kousuke didn’t plan to disclose the trick. So he straightened up his collar and took a pompous attitude before changing the topic.



「……Well, no matter. By the way, you, the one sitting there in my chair as though it is your own. Who are you? You seem to be Japanese, and I cannot believe that you are from security bureau but……even so, you infiltrate to this place by yourself. By any chance, there is even a Japanese young man among the agents of “JD Agency”?」



Kaysis’s expression was clearly displeased seeing his chair occupied by someone else while he spoke his prediction. But indeed, that prediction was the most possible one.



「Hee, that JD Agency is supposed to be a “non-existent organization” but……it’s normally known like this.」



「It’s not normally known. But, that’s a common knowledge among the highly positioned people of this side of the world. They are paying the maximum caution to the security bureau chief and intelligent department chief, and toward the “erasure organization” these two are leading.」



「Well, if you are the top of underworld organization, I guess you would have them getting in your way many times and dealt you a hard blow. That kind of people should be able to grasp their existence from the piling up facts……but, won’t it be a problem that the name of the organization is exposed?」



Chief Magdanese was grasping the situation at this place through a device that was attached on Kousuke. She was shrugging inside a surveillance car that was slight distance away from the building.



『This is what you called an open secret. Having it be known to a certain degree will also become a deterrence.』



Kousuke nodded「I see」to the words transmitted to him through the device. Kaysis guessed from that, that Kousuke was communicating with outside and he became convinced that Kousuke was a member of security bureau.



Though in truth he was the vanguard of a more dangerous group……



「Fumu, should I say that it’s just as expected from the chief of the security bureau. To be able to subvert an enemy at that kind of situation and then sending in a skilled agent……. Yet, I cannot help but say that you are a little bit too rash.」



Kaysis said that and took out a smartphone from his breast pocket. Then his finger suddenly slid through its display.



「Aa, that again. That’s a switch for【Berserk】activation right?」



「Fufu, so you understand. Once I pushed this button, a lot of berserkers would rampage at the middle of several dozen cities. Aah, let me correct one thing. This is certainly an “activation” button, but this smartphone is originally used for “cancellation”.」



「……I see. I had been thinking about it even before entering this room, but you are really a wary person huh. If a password isn’t entered into that smartphone in regular interval to cancel the activation state, then the drug will activate on their own accord. Is it something like that?」



「You have a good understanding. Exactly. Therefore, even if you steal this from me, even if you kill me, it would be meaningless. Rather, that will become the opening curtain of an unprecedented disaster. It’s not something that can be risked by you people who are shouldering the security of this country isn’t it?」



Kaysis talked with a broad grin and snake-like gaze. Surely the cancellation password wasn’t known by anyone except Kaysis. And it didn’t seem like he would talk even if he was captured, and if he was killed then a great disaster would definitely occur.



Kaysis believed without doubt that he was in an overwhelmingly superior position. It seemed his selling point was this craftiness of him. He lifted the smartphone that was his lifeline in one hand while his other hand moved forward in inviting gesture.



「Now then, Emily. Come to my side. That is if you don’t want a great number of sacrifice to be created in this country because of something that you created.」



「-, this low-life」



Emily’s skin felt goosebumps from the gaze of Kaysis who was immersed in joy. She cursed him without even hiding her feeling of disgust. But Kaysis’s smile was deepening. It seemed that even that disgust felt pleasant for him.



「That’s right. It’s already inevitable that you will become mine, but a punishment is needed after you dragged this uninvited person here isn’t it? How about you give me a kiss of oath after you come here.」



「Wha, what are――」



「Fufu, it seems that young agent-kun over there is a special existence for you. Then, it will be a lovely punishment if I make you offer that body to other man in front of his eyes as the proof of parting. Don’t you think so?」



Surely when someone talked about the height of low-life, it would refer to a person like this. Making other people submit, and smeared them with humiliation and shame were the greatest happiness for this man. The unhappiness of other people was exactly the nourishment for his life. His smoothly moving tongue moved even smoother from imagining the future that was smeared with unhappiness.



「Aa, while we are at it, perhaps it will also be good to torture him in front of you who are crying pleadingly. And then, after he become unable to endure the pain, I will make him say this. ――『Please, just do whatever you like to Emily, spare me already』like that. When I imagine the face of Emily at that time――」



「So it’s true that a third-class villain like to prattle on and on.」



A calm voice reached Kaysis who was continuing to talk with expression of ecstasy. That voice sounded exasperated, as though it was directed to a worthless existence, an apathetic voice that was really lacking in emotion.



Kaysis stared suspiciously at Kousuke who wasn’t showing even a speck of unease at this situation.



「You are saying, that I’m a third-class villain?」



「Yeah. I don’t know if it’s because you have prepared an absolute superiority(trump card) or because you are like this from the start, but you who can play around in this situation, is without a doubt a third-class.」



「……」



Kaysis fell silent. He wracked his brain and reconfirmed whether there was anything that could shake his superiority, but he was holding a switch that could instantly open the curtain of tragedy if it was pressed, and if something happened to him then the tragedy would act on its own anyway in less than an hour. Such card was something that wouldn’t become a worthless card that easily.



Kaysis reached a conclusion that this might be a bluff. But Kousuke suddenly stood up while speaking.



「According to the demon king, it seems that what is called a trump card is something mass produced……what about you I wonder?」



「What? Demon king? Just what are you talking a――」



Kaysis talked in suspicion, but instantly, he opened wide his eyes and his word cut off.



That was because without any advance sign, Kousuke was right in front of him.



Kaysis immediately tried to draw back his body, but the next moment, his field of vision was reversed and he was falling into confusion. But, he immediately felt an intense impact hitting his back and his voice got caught in his throat.



His gaze was wandering while he was filled with pain and confusion of what in the world had happened to him. And then what entered his sight was only the ceiling and the LED lighting. From that he understood that he had been thrown on the floor.



「Yo, you bastard, do you not care, what will happen to the city――」



「Well, that will be for later.」



His mind was flooded with pain, however Kaysis made use of his astonishment to wring out words from his mouth. But the reply he got was a casual sentence along with the back of a shoe that filled his field of vision. Simultaneously an intense impact assaulted him and his consciousness was cut off with a snap.



「Bubeh!? Hah, wha, what!? What happe――hih!?」



The pain and impact suddenly running on his cheek made Kaysis woke up. His face grimaced from the dull pain he felt on his back and forehead, but even in such state he tried to rally his confused mind somehow.



However, the moment his hazy visual field became clear, he raised a shriek that he had never made until now.



Although, no one would be able to laugh at him from doing such thing. After all the cause that made Kaysis scream was a sight that was just that bizarre.



「Wha, what!? You guys, just what the hell you are doing!?」



Kaysis called out with an obviously shocked voice. Ahead of his gaze, there were his subordinates that he was familiar with.



……However, each of his subordinate was perfectly making chuni pose.



They were the guards under Kaysis’s direct supervision who were inside the room with him just now. One of them had a pose where one of his legs was lifted with both his hands extended straight to both sides. It was a magnificent pose, as though he was a savage eagle that would fly away anytime.



Another person was standing in low stance with his legs spread apart widely, one of his hands was on his hip while his other hand was held crossing his chest diagonally. That pose looked as though the man was going to transform into a masked warrior in any second now.



And another pose was taking pose where his body tilted slightly forward while his right shoulder was lifted slightly, his right arm extended to below and his left hand was covering his face with his five fingers spread wide open. The angle of his waist was extremely sexy. That pose looked as though something would come out anytime now from his back.



The other too, the guards who were inside the room just before Kaysis lost consciousness, all of them were lined up with everyone taking some kind of chuuni pose. So to speak it was like a museum of posing statue. The gallery was using the whole spacious president office.



Those people didn’t answer even when Kaysis was yelling in extreme panic. Everyone of them was wearing sunglasses so their eyes couldn’t be seen, but perhaps they were unconscious seeing how they weren’t reacting at all. When Kaysis strained his eyes to the limit, those posing guards had their body and four limbs entangled in very fine strings, and he could see that they were being hung up like marionettes.



At the same time, Kaysis noticed that he was being restrained on his chair. His four limbs were being restrained by a similar super-fine string.



「Hey, Kousuke. Is it necessary to do this?」



「……If you ask whether there is any necessity, then the answer is definitely negative. This is bad, the damned Lord Abyssgate is easily showing out his face. Perhaps, it’s hopeless already for me.」



Hearing that casual conversation in this bizarre space caused Kaysis to return to his sense in surprise. When he turned his gaze toward the voices’ direction, he confirmed that there were several people right beside him.



Three of them were Kousuke, Emily, and Woody who were inside the room before this. But, in addition of them, there were further three more people.



「As expected from Kousuke-san. You don’t forget this thing called “beauty” even in the middle of battle. I have underestimated you.」



「……Indeed, you suppressed the enemies in less than a minute, and during just the few minutes from you contacting us, you created this kind of artwork. This can be said as terrific. Though now I’m completely filled with the desire to go home.」



「Ahahaha, it’s great that I can move now after having something unknown done to me but……this case that made even the chief to be haggard is really a heavy burden huh. I wish I could keep losing consciousness without waking up……」



Vanessa who for some reason looked dejected even though her expression was enraptured, praised Kousuke. Chief Magdanese was having a faraway look while his gaze wouldn’t move toward the posing men no matter what. And then, Allen who was made to drink restorative medicine made in another world and healed until a point where he could at least move.



In Allen’s case, Emily wished that he would exit the stage with his face still disfigured like before, but Chief Magdanese said「This idiot who kept making mistake cannot be allowed to rest more than this. He has to be made to work like a cart-horse」. And so without any other choice, he was healed.



Even so, he was still far from being fully healed, for the time being his swelling was suppressed and his broken jaw repaired so he could talk. His broken teeth and lacerated nose and cheek were left alone. His face was wrapped with bandage all over like a mummy, making Allen’s figure looked really painful, but there wasn’t anyone who cared about that.



By the way, regarding the restorative medicine made in another world that healed Allen (the highest class of product sold for the general public), Kousuke skillfully hid it and explained that Allen was healed using his ability, so it was currently ignored by everyone thinking that Kousuke also had that kind of power.



Though it seemed that Emily was really bothered with a power that could heal bone fracture in the blink of eye but……. Naturally there was no power that could heal people turned into berserker, so Kousuke told her that while saying that he would explain to her later. Hearing that caused Emily to obediently withdraw.



「……My word, for the chief-sama of the state security bureau to be personally here. What an honor. However, you have made an extremely poor move. As expected, even a living legend has finally gone senile hasn’t it?」



Kaysis implicitly conveyed that at this rate berserkers would be released in the middle of city with his sarcastic and obstinate words. His expression was also sneering at Chief Magdanese.



In a glance he looked composed, but if observed carefully, it could be seen that his eyes were twitching faintly and his voice was slightly shaking. The cause of that went without saying.



Because, there were his subordinates making chuuni pose within his view after all!



「Mister Abyssgate. I’ll leave this to you..」



「That’s why I told you that my name is Kousuke」



Chief Magdanese didn’t show any particular concern to Kaysis’s words and her gaze moved at Kousuke. Kousuke punctually said his request for correction before sighing. Then he put down a chair in front of Kaysis roughly.



Kousuke put the chair so the back of the chair was facing Kaysis and he sat down on it. He put his arms on the top of the chair’s back and he gazed straight at Kaysis.



「Mister Abyssgate……. So that’s your codename inside the agency. Fufu, I’ll remember that. I will surely investigate your background. And then, your important people will――UBAoAa!?」



「Just who do you think you are talking to? Hold down that tongue.」



Right in the middle of Kaysis’s curse toward Kousuke, immediately after that, he directly received a kick on his crotch from Vanessa who had been reduced into a believer of Lord Abyssgate, and he raised a weird scream. Actually he wanted to writhe around, but he couldn’t do so because he was tied on the chair and he could only twitch repeatedly while desperately enduring the pain.



「Aa~, Vanessa. Let me do it, okay?」



「Forgive me. Against my better judgment, it annoyed me seeing his attitude that is making light of Kousuke-san.」



Just where had the Vanessa-san who was always calm, cool, and collected gone at? Even though she absolutely wasn’t someone who would instantly make ‘Direct Attack!’ to the crotch because of provocation……



Allen and Woody similarly turned pigeon-toed while drawing away from being creeped out. Kousuke faced toward the writhing Kaysis once more while they were like that.



「Now then, Kaysis. I’ll have you spit out everything. Not just the cancellation code, but also how this case started, your plan from here on, and then the location of all the【Berserk】that you stole.」



「Do, do you seriously believe, I’ll talk――」



「You will. I said it right? The one who doesn’t understand the situation is you. Why do you think you who is holding the trump card is getting captured like this without question? Why did Woody change side? Didn’t you think about that?」



「That’s……」



Of course Kaysis noticed about those abnormalities. No matter how, it was unthinkable that his subordinate would get lured away by salmon sandwich, he didn’t want to think about it. Also, it was unthinkable that the security bureau would make a gamble that could involve a lot of people’s life using a baseless method like torture, because there was no way he would easily confess just from that.



But, even so, there should be nothing that could shake his absolutely superior position with him taking hostage of this country’s people, as long as he didn’t confess anything, then there was nothing the security bureau could do except doing whatever Kaysis told them. It was undeniable that such believe was curbing down his feeling of danger toward the abnormalities. It was when he was thinking like that,



「I also told you this didn’t I? That’s why you are a third-rate. Honestly, regarding the mastermind of this case, well, I have no doubt that it’s really you but, I think there is high possibility that there is still another existence behind you. The existence that granted you the seat as president of this large company……something like that.」



Kaysis’s expression didn’t change. There wasn’t even any turmoil inside his eyes. His breathing was also not shaken at all. But, there also wasn’t any sarcasm coming from him right away. Kousuke was convinced just from that.



Surely there was another person that knew about the existence of【Berserk】and stole it the very first. After all an impetus was necessary for Kaysis to know about the existence of【Berserk】.



At the same time, there was no doubt that this man was cunning, merciless, and excellent, but, no matter how, Kousuke couldn’t believe that Kaysis had the status that counterbalanced with the organizational power Kousuke expected, so surely his conjecture that this【Gamma Pharmaceutical】wasn’t at the deepest bottom of everything was correct.



While thinking so, Kousuke suddenly took out from his breast pocket a string that was attached with something that looked like five-yen coin. The size was about the same with five-yen coin, but the material looked like an amber crystal. There was a round hole at the center, and the string was tied there.



Once Chief Magdanese and others saw that item, they made a really complicated expression.



「……I don’t know what you are planning to do, but if you don’t release me, a lot of people will die you know? After all no matter what you are going to do to me, I absolutely won’t speak.」



「You know, the world is overflowing with irrationality. Do you forget that just because you are at the side that is scattering around irrationality?」



Saying that, Kousuke then dangled the string. The crystal shaped like a five-yen coin swung back and forth in front of Kaysis’s eye.



Kousuke coughed once *gohon* for a moment and he straightened up his sitting posture, before he suddenly opened his mouth.



「You are gradually becoming stra~ngee~, you are gradually becoming straa~ngee~」



「??? Just what are you saying……. Is your head having a screw looseee-hee~」



The crystal five-yen coin systematically swaying like a pendulum in front of Kaysis’s eyes. At the other side of the coin was a suspicious incantation (?) that sounded strangely stupid. Kaysis’s was doubting Kousuke’s sanity that matched Kousuke’s expression that looked complicatedly embarrassed.



But, right after that, the end of Kaysis’s sentence crumbled. Light slipped off from his eyes, and his snake-like atmosphere dispersed as though it was just a lie, where now he seemed like a mere simple man.



「You are gradually wanting to taa~lkk~. You want to talk about everything, everyy~thii~ng」



「I, I want to taa~lkk~. I want to talk about everything, everyy~thii~ng」



「If you are asked you will want to anss~werr~. You will be unable to not anss~werr~」



「I will want to anss~werr~. I become unable to not anss~werr~」



「You will be happy by telll~ingg~. You will be wanting to tell everyy~thii~ng」



「Will will wiilll~」



The slow and stupid voices resounded inside the room. Kaysis was completely transformed into a repeating machine. At the same time, light of expectation was starting to grow inside those eyes. His atmosphere was like a Villager A who was called out by a hero party, who for some reason knew about a local legend and would tell it to the hero party without leaving anything out.



――Soul magic enchanted-type brainwashing artifact “Staking the Pride of a Villager”



The villager in RPG would tell everything they knew if they were talked to. If they were addressed by hero party, ordinarily they would obediently listen. They also wouldn’t say even a single complain when their house was entered by a hero party as they pleased, and even if their home was rummaged and in the end their possession got taken away without permission.



This artifact would turn the targeted human into such lovely villager. This was an artifact for dealing with the aftermath of an incident, bestowed by the demon king to the abyss lord for his personal use.



A minute later, the president of a large company that could be counted as one of the top five even in Britain finished his job-change into a splendid Villager A. He happily spouted out everything that he knew.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Thank you very much for the festival of salmon sandwich’s review column.



It’s a happy feeling that something I liked is shared by other people!



Now then, the end of this extra compilation too is gradually coming into view.



I think it will be 2, 3 more chapters.



But even though I said that, even Hakumei don’t know how this tale without any plot or anything will roll in the future.



When it’s over what will I write then I wonder.



The next update is planned to be at 6 P.M. Saturday too.





Chapter 214




Beloved people of Narou, good evening.



Recently, you know that I'm spending an increasingly good chuuni life.



This is Chuuni Suki, the one who have the privilege of posting「Arifureta Shokugyou de Sekai Saikyou」.



Now then, in this occasion, I have the privilege of reporting that「Arifureta Shokugyou de Sekai Saikyou」will be published by Overlap Bunko-sama.



It seems that there will be even a special site created at the official website of Overlap-sama.



The detail will be announced in the near future.



「Arifureta」will change shape to be on paper page, but please keep taking care of me from here on too.



I write a bit extra story for the commemoration of the book publication.



It's a what-if story unrelated with the main story.



「Haa, haa, kuu, what persistence-. I should just obediently follow Hajime-san's warning.」



Shia cursed while nimbly running with her beautiful faint bluish-white hair trailing behind her. Her usual innocent smile couldn't be seen on her face, her own failure and the evil hand that was currently cornering her into this bitter situation caused her prided rabbit ears to busily twitching around in vigilance against the surrounding.



Shia was pushing her way through the narrow path among the buildings while nimbly evading the trash cans and plumbing like an acrobat. It was as though she was in the middle of a desperate escape……no, in fact Shia was really forced to escape no matter how hard to believe it was.



Shia who was categorized as inhuman person along with Hajime and others didn't have any existence that could be a threat for her. Her ability was such that even made the magic cheat Yue to say「Your physical ability is bugged」. An existence that could force such Shia to escape……



「I, I found herrr! The rabbit-eared girl Shia-chaaaaan!」



「Hii!?」



A person carrying a backpack on his back, wearing a T-shirt with moe character design, blazing eye glint peeking from the gap of his long hair, with his hand carrying a tough camera――he was The Otaku.



Just before Shia could get out from the back alley, that otaku youth appeared from the back door of a building that opened roughly, which caused Shia to reflexively raise a pitiful shriek.



That was only natural. The reason was because Shia's rabbit ears detected his presence to be at the other side of the building just a moment ago. Yet despite so, he appeared before her eyes right after she got distracted for a moment. It wouldn't be that strange even if an absurd existence like this existed at the previous world, but that was impossible.



That was because this was earth, the home world of Hajime.



The otaku youth faced Shia whose face was shuddering. He readied his camera and suddenly he lowered his head in a snap.



「Pho, photo, please!!」



「I told you no already-!」



Shia reflexively retorted back. However, the otaku young man wasn't discouraged at all. 「E, even so please-!」Even though he was stuttering, but he lowered his head even deeper with a force that strangely emitted a formidable will.



Seeing how she made no progress, Shia used the wall of the building to make a wall-kick jump and flew over the head of the otaku youth. She came out into a street somewhere.



Then, it seemed that the angry yell of Shia was heard, the fellows who were chasing after Shia until just now――the otaku group was gathering bustlingly.



「Ra, Rabbit ear-san, please, let me take a photo-!」



「One snap, just one snap is fine-」



「Ca, can I call you Shia-tan-」



「Tha, that gaze, please turn it over here!」



「Can I ask you, to pose? I, if possible please make gun shape with your fingers. Also, can you make the rabbit ear's shape to droop a bit more? Or rather, I, I have a uniform here, ca, can I ask you to change into it?」



In the blink of eye, otaku young men (middle-aged men included) and the curious onlookers who were wondering if there was some kind of event, were starting to form a crowd.



「Uu, just why this is happening desuu? Even though there are people wearing cat ear or dog ear, why is it only me……thi, this is just like what Hajime-san said, 『the neighborhood of Akiba is rough』desuu」



Shia's face contorted and about to cry. The surrounding was already packed with the warriors of Akiba, they were waiting impatiently for Shia's permission of photo opportunity.



Yes, the place where Shia was currently at, was Earth's Tokyo metropolis, right in the middle of Akibahara. If it was asked about why Shia who came to earth together with Hajime was now at Akibahara, it was because of a reason that wasn't particularly deep……



Putting that aside, Shia who was showing an interest to Akihabara was given a serious warning by Hajme. He said, if Shia entered the neighborhood of Akiba as she was, there would be a great commotion without a doubt.



'That was because Shia's rabbit ear was the real thing', that wasn't the only reason. Thinking normally, no matter how real it looked, surely there wouldn't be anyone thinking that it was actually real. But, in this occasion, it was irrelevant whether it was the real thing or not.



Her beautiful long hair with faint bluish white color that could be mistaken as moonlight, her beautiful face that could make foreign idol to run away with tail between their legs, her perfect proportion that could put model to shame, her loveliness that came from her gentle atmosphere despite her beauty, which made anyone wanted to look at her forever. That kind of miraculous girl, was completed with twitching rabbit ears.



For the humans at Akiba, no, as long as someone was a man, it would be impossible for their heart to be not stolen!



That was why, Hajime firmly warned Shia to not go to Akiba by herself, and in the case she went anyway, Hajime handed her a disguise artifact to change her look.



Shia was thinking「This is exaggerated desuu」, even so she wore the artifact and in the end she went to Akiba by herself but……here she made a sorrowful miss. Everything at her surrounding was unusual, and her eyes were stolen by girls intentionally putting on animal ears by themselves, seeing that Shia carelessly took off her artifact.



When she did that, naturally Shia's beauty and charm were exposed. And then, the otakus swarmed like hyenas.



If here the warriors of Akiba committed rudeness to Shia and tried to force her, Shia would send them flying mercilessly and then she would vanish right away.



However, as expected from them who was a gentleman despite being a warrior. They would lower their head and ask for permission without fail before taking their camera, even though they were passionately making request without reservation, but they didn't bulldoze their way through.



Shia who had received warning from Hajime in the beginning, and what's more she even committed mistake of getting rid of her artifact, she became unable instead to act forceful toward the otaku group who was like that.



And so she attempted to escape from Akiba, but the warriors of Akiba weren't that soft. Just like how the craftsmen of Hairihi Kingdom chased after Hajime before, they were earnestly coming to beg at Shia using wondrous tracking skill, physical ability, and coordination between fellow warriors that made Shia couldn't help but making retort「Are you guys really normal human!?」. Their figures made it as though the OTAKU nesting in AKIBA was really a different race.



Shia was thinking, 「The station of Akiba is far away……」, like that.



「Fuu, it cannot be helped. I didn't really want to do preposterous thing in Hajime-san's world but……it's already too late for that like this.」



By the time the voice of「Please, let us take a picture」was starting to become a great chorus, Shia sighed deeply while starting to walk briskly. The crowd surrounding Shia in circle became noisy, but Shia walked straight ahead without minding that and came to a stop in front of a young man.



The young man was muttering「Eh, eh? M, me? By any chance, it's coming? My springtime is coming?」, but as expected Shia didn't pay that any attention and she firmly grabbed the shoulders of the young man.



The young man went beet red from having both his shoulders grabbed by a foreign super beautiful girl wearing rabbit ears that couldn't be compared even with the countless idols he had seen. The surrounding was getting noisier.



The young man was making an expression that was vaguely containing hope. However, Shia gifted him with words that were heartless, that could also be considered as reward for a part of peculiar kind of human.



「I'm sorry. Can I ask you to kneel for a bit?」



「Eh?」



「Can you kneel, for me?」



Shia smiled sweetly while putting on strength that was just barely the limit. The young man was befuddled for a moment, but for some reason his face got even redder, then he bent his knee while breathing roughly in excitement. It seemed that this young man was also "a part of peculiar kind of human".



Shia put her foot on the shoulder of that young man. The young man gulped his saliva seeing the beautiful leg peeking out from the skirt. The surrounding people were also holding their breath, wondering if an abnormal play was really going to start in front of a crowd this big. Camera lenses were gleaming here and there.



But, the next moment, they were blinking in astonishment.



「Well then everyone, forgive me for making ruckus.」



Saying that, Shia put her weight on the foot stepping on the young man's shoulder, and then the next moment she leaped high. The young man surprisingly didn't feel the feedback that would normally come from getting used as footstool for jumping even though he was slightly lurching forward. He felt surprised while coming back to his senses and turned around quickly.



There, he saw the figure of Shia twirling through a rotation midair while making the head of a bald uncle at the back as the next footstool. Like that, Shia was making the warriors of Akiba as footstool while advancing rapidly through the crowd.



「I, I was used as footstool!?」



「Shi, Shia-tan's beautiful foot, o, on my head, haa haa」



「Ste, step on me toooo! Shia-tan's footsie, grind on meee!!」



「Rabbit ear going pyon pyon……it's the real thing. It's the real rabbit-eared GIRLLLLL!! I cannot hold it in-」



「Right now, I'm witnessing a miracle……」



The warriors were greatly stimulated by Shia hopping around overhead the crowd. Her rabbit ears twitching *pyoko pyoko*, her rabbit tail shaking left and right *furi furi*, and then the brutally prancing melons *barun barun* pushed them to the verge of madness.



Of course, Shia wasn't aiming for that by doing this. Originally it was something easy for her to break out of the crowd with a single jump. However, doing that was only possible for a true inhuman person. Using people as footholds and jumped around was barely still in the range that could be processed using common sense.



Ignoring the commotion from the warriors of Akiba, Shia landed firmly at the end with a great jump that was accompanied with a splendid midair somersault that would make gymnastic athlete to go blue, and then without pause she sprinted away like a fleeing rabbit. The warriors who went 'hah' in realization started to move all at once.



「This time for sure, I swear I will reach Akiba stationnn! Don't look down at the rabbit that overcame even the apostle of god desu!」



Surely the god apostles too would cry in the shadow if they knew they were compared with Akiba warrior.



Like that, Shia dashed through the last alley, and she caught the sight of Akihabara station ahead, her mouth burst into a broad smile thinking that she would quickly return to Hajime and receive punishment, it was at that time,



A second tale that was completely involuntary for Shia was starting.



In the shape of a hole that was like a pitch dark black hole suddenly appeared right under the foot of Shia who was stepping forward.



「Eh?」



Losing the place where her foot could step, Shia lurched forward and she was falling toward the hole. However, this person was one of the inhuman monsterr~s. She instantly activated the Air Force that was instilled into her shoes and used that as foothold in her attempt to escape to the opposite side.



But,



「Wha-!? I'm sucked!?」



Yes, the expression of black hole fitted that hole perfectly. It captured Shia with a radical absorbing force that was hard to oppose, as though it was the Absolute Catastrophe that Yue was controlling.



「Kuh, Hajime-san-!」



Because of the completely unexpected surprise attack, and because her combat senses had been receding since she came to earth, Shia was unable to deal with the absorption and in the end she called at the name of her beloved lover while being swallowed into the abyss.



Silence returned at the alley where Shia vanished. There was already no sign remaining that Shia had been there, a breeze blew through the alley vainly.



◇◆◇◆◇◆◇◆◇◆◇◆



Shia felt a solid ground under her butt after a terrible sense of weightlessness. Light was overflowing her field of vision that she couldn't see clearly. However, her excellent sensing ability to detect presence detected multiple presences surrounding her at the other side of the light.



「It seems I avoided an instant death but……this place smell strongly with troublesomeness.」



Shia was smiling bitterly while pouring magic power into the ruby encrusted ring on her left hand's ring finger. At the same time she lifted her palm to the side and clenched it into fist. Vire Doryukken manifested with a superb timing and settled inside her grasp.



It was an unforeseen situation, but the profound weight of her partner caused a fearless smile to emerge on Shia's face. No matter what happened, she had the confidence that she would smash through all of them and her resolve that she would reunite with Hajime without fail was dwelling brightly inside her eyes as though it had been engraved there.



Like that, when Shia observed the situation while putting up her vigilance, the light was vanishing before long as though it was melting into the space.



'Now then, what kind of bunches had done the idiotic action of kidnapping me', ahead of Shia's gaze that narrowed dangerously was,



「Oo, is it a success!?」



「As expected from the palace's head magician-done.」



「Look at that beauty. It is as though she is the goddess of the moon.」



「No, more important than that, that thing growing at that person's head……it could be, that she is a retainer of Spinea-sama.」



There were around twenty people who seemed to be soldiers wearing clothes like priest robe and armor. They were making noise of shock and happiness. Shia was looking around at the surrounding while keeping silent. A young man that looked slightly exhausted stepped forward to such Shia.



The young man was wearing a robe that was decorated with geometrical pattern of splendid ultramarine and silver, his hand was holding a cane that was created from tree that seemed to be a twisted evergreen oak, a jewel that looked like sapphire was attached on its tip. His vibrant silver long hair was tied at its root. He was wearing a small pince-nez glasses and his eyes of long slits gave an intellectual impression. He was a dreadfully handsome man of intellectual type.



That kind of intellectual handsome man faced Shia and he opened his mouth, however, someone grabbed his shoulder from behind and stopped him from speaking.



「Wait Reed. Don't approach carelessly. That woman is holding a weapon. We don't know what she might do.」



The one who was saying that while sending vigilant and suspicious gaze at Shia was another dreadfully handsome man. He had vibrant blonde hair and golden eyes. His sharp gaze resembled carnivore beast, and his body was obviously well-trained even through the light armor he was wearing. He was a man that gave an impression as though he was a wild lion.



「Ee~, is that so? I think she is a really cute young woman though? I want to approach her right away.」



「Phil, just shut your mouth. I don't need to hear the opinion of a playboy.」



「Even though you said that, But Erick is also thinking inside your heart 'Su~per cute', right? Besides, look, Greg who normally has no interest to girl is completely charmed there.」



The one who spoke with frivolous tone was also a handsome man as expected. His appearance was slovenly with his chest greatly exposed and his hand playing around with his wavy deep green hair.



Furthermore, there was one more man whose body built was larger than the others, however, as expected he was also a handsome man as though it had been arranged beforehand. This man with short black hair was focusing his gaze at Shia.



Looking at them, Shia who was considerably growing impatient opened her mouth while tapping Vire Doryukken on her shoulder.



「Excuse me, I don't know what is your objective in kidnapping me, but if you are not hostile, then can you explain the situation already? I also want to go home quickly, so if possible I want you to teach me the method to go home without any antagonism.」



Hearing that, the blonde haired man who seemed to have a really haughty and prideful personality might be taking offense from Shia's attitude, his eyes narrowed while he opened his mouth.



This time it was the silver haired gentle man who stopped the blond hair. He then made a gentle smile while speaking about their objective.



「My apologies. We are calling you here, is because we wish for you to save this world. My deepest apologies of our rudeness in doing this for our own convenience. But, please, I beg you to bring salvation to our world.」



Like that, the word that was the template, and in a sense was commonplace word was said decisively.



「――Hero-sama.」



After that, during the few months before Hajime was coming to pick her up, a great tale was unfolding, like splattering the monsters threatening the world, or splattering the fighting between countries, or splattering the handsome army that became the prisoner of Shia's charm, or splattering the demon king together with the handsome men who weren't discouraged even with the splattering they experienced, or getting showered with marriage proposals as the hero that saved the world from the princes of many countries, dragon king, spirit king, etc., anyway they were all handsome men, or having Hajime who came to pick her up going *DOPAN-* at them, but……all those would be told at another chance someday.



The End



'Thinking carefully, Shia is really made up with main character qualities huh', I tried to write this from that kind of thinking. If you like, please try to have your imagination run wild with a tale of Shia shooing off handsome men in another world that is overflowing with them while playing an active role by grandly beating enemy to death.



Well then, please kindly treat well the published version too.





Chapter 215




*bara-bara-bara-bara-* The peculiar sound of rotor was reverberating.



Under the cloudy sky of early morning, the things that were spreading such noise were three large helicopters. The three were forming a triangle formation and pushed on through the cloudy sky in a straight line.



Each of those helicopters was boarded by a fully armed special forces of the security bureau, in addition Kousuke, Emily, Vanessa, and Allen who was wafting off a pathetic aura were boarding one of the helicopters.



「O, oi, Allen. Are you okay?」



Riding on the same helicopter was the commander of the special force who was also the captain of Alpha squad, Bernard Pays. He asked Allen with some hesitation. He belonged under security bureau’s assault section, so he was quite acquainted with Allen who was working as analyst in the surface where they often shared information.



Even though they weren’t quite friend, but their relationship with each other was at the level of close coworker at least. Therefore, when he saw Allen who was usually acting flippant with light atmosphere was now sitting on the bench in a style as though he was a certain boxer who had burned out into pure white, he couldn’t help but called out to him.



「Aa, Pays-san. Thanks for your concern. If I have to say whether I’m fine or not, I’m not fine, so it’s fine.」



「No, that reply is already not fine there.」



Bernard made an expression that didn’t know what to say at Allen whose face was still changed into mummy man.



「You see, Pays-san. I’m specialized in killing secretly. My job is to stealthily and quietly go ‘pshuu’. Yet despite so, I was told to steal, spurred on to become bodyguard, made to beaten viciously by a demonic young man, sentenced with the caving in of my face by a beautiful girl, and on top of all that, I was told ‘go fight a war against monsters’ you know? Even though this is the order from the chief that I respected so much, I’ll still feel tired from it. I’m just a step away from getting burned out. It’s nice isn’t it, for Pays-san and others. All of you received healing. As for me, my molars or inside my nose are still feeling throbbing with pain……head-on fighting isn’t my territory you know? Yet despite so, I’m being sent out in this state, I’ll die for sure this time.」



‘Heheh’ Allen chuckled while his gaze was getting distant and his mutter getting sluggish. Bernard’s cheeks couldn’t stop twitching seeing such an Allen. Inside his heart he was thinking. 「This is bad. This guy, he is seriously getting cornered」, like that.



Allen’s figure was like a salary man who had become worn-out from continuously working in a black company, sitting melancholically on a bench of a public park while visioning an impossible dream of changing job. The final blow was dealt on Allen who was exposing such appearance.



「That’s depressing, Mr. K (lol). Even though it will be the final decisive battle after this, what are you doing getting low spirits like that. I’ll gouge you out you know?」



「Scary-. What do you mean gouging!? Where are you going to gouge!? Or rather, what did you add just now when you said Mr. K?」



The cold words that came from Vanessa who was sitting beside Allen had gone passed being sharp and inspired terror instead. Allen was shivering while talking back.



「Please read the mood a little. Right now is a serious time. A lot of lives are hanging on this, and we have to fight an army of berserker after this you know? Please don’t make that kind of funny face and act seriously.」



「The one turning my face into funny one like this is particularly because of the fault of you guys though! Besides, I don’t want to be told to act seriously by Vanessa――」



「Oi, who said you can call my name casually like that. You want me to turn your face into something that will inevitably invite roar of laughter?」



「I, I’m sorry. But, even if you aren’t so angry that your tone change……a, it hurts-. It really hurts I said! Please don’t grind on my injury! Please forgive me, Paradis-san.」



When Allen casually called Vanessa’s name, he was given back with indignation that surpassed the imagination. His injury was getting grinded from above the bandage which caused Allen to scream while writhing around.



Certainly, Allen was the perpetrator that scattered around Berserk in the research building. But, in the first place it was the chief that ordered the theft, then unexpected situation happened on top of another unexpected situation, so to speak what happened was something like an accident.



Allen too pretty much felt guilt about the tragedy that occurred at the research building, and he was also feeling apologetic toward Emily, but because his habitual frivolous attitude was ingrained deeply in his self, he didn’t look like he was reflecting in a glance which invited biting attitude from other no matter what he did.



A situation that could only be said as tough luck, and behavior that didn’t convey the inside of his heart. If it was said that it was him sowing what he sow then that would be the end of it but……



Starting with Bernard, the squad members boarding the same helicopter couldn’t help but sending gaze of sympathy toward Allen who was still screaming while his face was getting grinded by Vanessa.



Vanessa and others were unfolding a scene that could be seen as comedic in a sense. The one who was seeing them acting like that with a faint smile on her face was Emily. But, there was a gloom in that smile.



Vanessa stole a glance at Emily while grinding on Allen. From that it could be understood that the dialogue to some extent was also to clear up Emily’s feeling.



「Emily. Are you okay……I won’t ask you that. There is no way you are okay. It’s just like what Vanessa said, right now is the critical moment that will be the turning point. That’s why, keep standing firm. We are with you.」



「……Yes. Thank you Kousuke. Also Vanessa too. I was saying selfish thing to come along with you all. So I won’t run away with tail between my legs in the middle.」



There wasn’t any change with the gloom in her smile, but the strength dwelling in her eyes wasn’t withering. Kousuke nodded at Emily before quietly peeking outside from the window.



At the outside, there was cloudy sky spreading looking as though rain might pour anytime. While thinking that the sky currently was like Emily’s heart, Kousuke put his mind in order about the operation that was currently unfolding.



After destroying all the data and drug of Berserk they found in【Gamma Pharmaceutical】, Kousuke and others scrutinized the flashdisk they confiscated from Kaysis once more. Inside that flashdisk, the data that listed the multiple research facilities where Berserk’s data were transferred to was saved in it.



Most of them were research facilities inside a corporation that was unrelated with typical medicine manufacture, but there were several places among them that couldn’t be ignored. Those places were dam or water purification plant. Every one of those places was facility that was related to Hydra in some kind of shape, and it seemed there was also a research facility inside them.



It was a terrifying story after they knew about Kaysis’s plan.



Naturally, for the security bureau it was urgent to suppress those irrigation-related facilities. Improved version of Berserk still didn’t exist, but in the small chance that the existing Berserk was spilled, it would create a tragedy that would be unbearable to witness.



And so, because the number of facilities was a lot, it was insufficient with just the manpower of the security bureau, they also cooperated with the army and currently a simultaneous suppression operation was currently unfolding toward those multiple research facilities.



「O, oi, Paradis. Don’t go further than that. Even like this, he is more or less a precious fighting strength. We really aren’t planning to lose, but the opponent is an army of berserker. We had prepared the best equipment, but it’s still an unfavorable comparison compared to the army.」



「Muh. I can only draw back if Captain Pays told me that. Mr. K, you narrowly escaped death.」



「U, uu. Is there, any girl that will be gentle to me somewhere in this world……」



Allen broke down crying as though he had been assaulted by a hoodlum. Gazes of sympathy were focused toward him. Bernard was sighing deeply toward that state of Allen before he moved his gaze toward Kousuke.



Inside Kaysis’s flashdisk, it included the list of the many people that were transferred to the research facilities. There were many people who were unrelated with research work in it……there was no way they wouldn’t understand what was the meaning of that. Most likely, they were for human experiment, and also to be put around as senseless fighting strength in addition.



A group of berserker that would continue to fight without knowing pain and fear, and they would recover instantly as long as their head wasn’t destroyed……putting it bluntly, this was completely outside of the security bureau’s domain. This was obviously a scene where the army should move out.



But, it was undesirable for both Chief Magdanese and also Kousuke to have Kousuke’s true identity became exposed to a group that didn’t belong under security bureau. Therefore, the special forces of the army were heading to other facilities, but the facility that they were currently heading toward had to be dealt somehow with only the special force of the security bureau and Kousuke and co.



Bernard had the resolve. He wouldn’t hesitate to offer his life anytime if it was for the country’s safety. But, even so, he couldn’t avoid from his hand getting sweaty. He was planning to be meticulous in putting countermeasure and vigilance, but depending on the situation, there was also the possibility that he would have to shoot his comrade that was turned into berserker.



No matter how he was a veteran leader of the assault section and someone that was appointed as the captain of the special force, it still couldn’t be helped that he would unconsciously send gaze of expectation and prayer toward the being(Kousuke) that wielded supernatural power.



Perhaps noticing the gaze of such Bernard, Kousuke who was gazing outside through a small window suddenly returned his gaze and looked at Bernard.



「What’s the matter, captain-san?」



Bernard reflexively smiled wryly seeing that light attitude where he couldn’t feel any particular fervor from it.



「No, I’m thinking that you are really calm there. I think there is nothing as terrifying as you as an enemy, but when I think that you are fighting together with us as ally, there is nothing as reliable as this.」



「Well, even though you said that they are lying in wait for us, but they are just a muscle-brain group after all. I feel regretful for the people who were simply tricked and turned into berserker, but based from the data, it seems that the majority is underworld people, so I don’t feel that much guilt. They also have a clear weak point. Even if it’s just captain-san and others, I think if you fight calmly, you will manage it somehow you know?」



「You are saying that really lightly. It’s like you are a warrior that has gone through many bloodshed even more than me. Do you have experience fighting similar thing like this?」



Bernard’s wry smile was increasingly getting deeper from hearing Kousuke’s light tone. He suddenly asked something like that. The other squad members were directing their gaze at Kousuke with deep curiosity. It seemed that they were thinking that it might be a reference for the battle after this depending on the situation. But more than half of that interest was just out of curiosity though.



Kousuke returned a wry smile at Bernard’s question. When Emily and Vanessa were also directing gaze of deep interest at Kousuke, Kousuke answered while getting a faraway look.



「Well, I actually have, if it’s a battle against warriors of god. Although, those guys weren’t cute bunches like berserker.」



「Ber, berserker is cute?」



「That’s right. Their face was super beautiful, but their fighting ability was bad news on top of bad news. They were moving so fast they didn’t even leave behind afterimage, flying freely in the sky, disintegrated everything while ignoring something like defensive power, they neutralized all attack using twin swords and wings, furthermore they were gushing out like cockroaches……I made do somehow by dealing one hit kill from behind invisibility, but if I fought them right from the front, honestly, whether I can survive or not is……yep, thinking back, it’s a miracle we could survive.」



「「「「「……」」」」」



The troops including Bernard turned wordless hearing Kousuke’s reminiscence that was said with a bitter smile. Inside their heart, all of them were fiercely retorting「What is that joke-like existence!? It’s a joke right? Right?」, but no one said it out loud.



At the same time, a faint confidence「Compared to that, we can win can’t we?」was welling up inside them. Unexpectedly, it seemed that their morale was raising from the question of Bernard who was wondering of how to encourage the troops.



「We will arrive at the point soon! Start preparing!」



The helicopter pilot gave his report. Bernard nodded to that and gave instruction to the troops. The expression of Emily and Vanessa was also containing nervousness.



The place where they would land at was a lumber storehouse that was slightly distanced from the water purification plant. The water purification plant was in a riverside that was surrounded by forest. It seemed that the research facility was jointly established with that water purification plant.



As for their plan, they would land at a lumber storehouse that was slightly far from the water purification plant, and from there they would advance through land route and suppressed the facility while the enemy wasn’t aware of their presence. The biggest point was to raid them with full secrecy and made the related research facility to not realize the attack.



They would silently and swiftly suppress the area without even giving the enemy the chance to activate Berserk. That was their greatest objective ideally.



They would attempt to land at a vacant land that was a temporary storage site for lumber that was lumbered from the forest, then approached the water purification plant from an angle that was completely the opposite side. Even if they couldn’t land, there would be no problem if the helicopter descended down until a height where they could drop down using rope.



But, it seemed that the matter couldn’t progress that easily……



「-, wait a second pilot-san! There are people inside the forest! There are more than ten!」



「Wha-. Don’t tell me」



Kousuke threw a warning at the pilot who was making the helicopter descending for the landing. Bernard rushed toward the cockpit and Kousuke’s side.



「Mister Abyssgate. You don’t think those people are worker of the lumbering site?」



「It’s Kousuke. Certainly there is possibility that they are lumbering worker. But, even though a helicopter is approaching, they are moving inside the forest as though to surround the lumbering site……do you think that lumbering worker will surround the landing point when they see helicopter?」



「……I see. I don’t want to see that kind of woodcutter.」



Bernard’s expression turned bitter from the information he was given. Obviously the enemy was on guard against an approach from the lumbering site and placed their personnel here. Inside the list, there were also people who were formerly police or member of a violent organization, Every single one of them was criminal that had dirtied their hand thickly in crime and backed into corner. They were useful resources to be ordered to act like this.



Most likely they themselves didn’t even imagine that they could be changed into monster. However, they were undoubtedly lured by money and told to eliminate approaching enemy.



「Most likely they have reported our approach too……」



「That’s likely. The plan to silently suppress them is meaningless already now.」



「Aa, we can only assault them hard.」



When the grim-faced Bernard instructed the pilot, the pilot made the helicopter climbed back to head directly toward the water purification plant. The next moment, one of the troops who was looking at the situation below from a window made a report that sounded like a shout.



「Missile-! Evade!」



「-, Bastard-」



The pilot cursed while tilting the helicopter greatly to the side. Emily screamed from the radical motion while a portable surface-to-air missile was flying out from inside the forest and approached them in a straight line. The pilot’s reaction was splendid, but in the end it was doubtful whether they would be able to evade or not.



The color of resolution dyed the face of Bernard and the troops, in the middle of that,



「――”Black Vortex”」



The moment Kousuke muttered those words with one of his hand on the floor, the helicopter lowered its altitude drastically with a jerk. It was unnatural as though something grasped it from below and dragged it down.



――Gravity magic “Black Vortex”



It was the gravitational field generation magic that Kousuke specialized the most at. If a gravitational field was generated at the selected spot, then he could stand on the ceiling or perform pseudo flight in the sky by “falling”. It was a technique that could be said as the basic of the basic of gravitation magic, a magic that could be used without chant right from the start by someone like Yue.



Due to the gravitational field that was suddenly generated, the helicopter received gravity that was several times the normal and it descended down drastically. In a moment, the missile was passing through above the helicopter.



「Wha, what!? Just now, what happened!?」



The pilot raised a bewildered voice, but surely it was the group on the ground that was looking at the situation who wanted to say that. After all, the helicopter shifted with a jerk to below just before the missile hit and it was in the middle of swiveling widely. That maneuver could only be said as abnormal.



「I won’t let you fire that for the second time.」



Kousuke unraveled the gravitational field and took a glance at the pilot who was recovering the helicopter control while he muttered so with his hand forming seal. He formed a seal even though it had no meaning!



Right after that, with a *poof* a clone body of Kousuke popped out outside the cockpit screen. The clone could be called out within the radius of three meter with the real body as the center, so it was possible to perform pseudo wall slip by using that.



The pilot was busy screaming from seeing a person materializing outside the window. The troops also went「It, it came ouutt!」, they were screaming as though they had encountered a ghost. It seemed that multiple Kousuke had became a considerable trauma for them.



The existence that was barely still Kousuke silently put on a sunglasses outside the window, and then he leaped down while deploying twelve kunais around him like satellites. The next moment,



「I won’t ask for forgiveness. Die while resenting me as much as you want. ――”Zekkou Senjin – Hikuusen”」(TN: Hikuusen = Flying Devouring Flash)



The twelve kunais floating around Kousuke flew out all at once. Each of them was heading to a different target like a streak of flash. It went without saying what their targets were.



Including the person who somehow recovered from the shock of witnessing the abnormal maneuver of the helicopter and now was in the middle of preparing the second shot, all the latent berserkers lurking inside the forest immediately got their head’s crown pierced in unison and breathed their last.



Kousuke stood midair with black ripples spreading below himw while making floating kunais flying freely. Bernard gave a lukewarm gaze at the pilot who was flustered from seeing such sight while giving him instruction to haste toward the water purification plant.



The pilot cursed「What the hell this is, shit」in small voice, however, he still controlled the helicopter without faltering as fitting for a veteran pilot.



Before long, they could see an open space. The water purification plant and a joined white building that in a glance was unclear what its purpose was, were coming into view. They could also see water supply facility at the downstream slight distance away. The whole water purification plant was surrounded by two layers of fence with barbed wire on top of them in addition. It seemed that traveling using helicopter was also taken into account from the start, they caught sight of a large open space and a heliport.



「Chih. They had called in just as expected. They are coming one after another. ……Doesn’t seem like they are a normal security huh.」



Using a binocular, Bernard saw a great number of people coming out in groups from the joint building toward the open space that was in front of the water purification plant. His face frowned. Most of the people didn’t look like honest people, they were people with air that was obviously thuggish in a glance, but among them there were also the figures of slim young man, female, and also old man.



「Oi oi, you mean all those people are going to get turned into monsters? What now Captain Pays? If we descend until an altitude where you can drop down using rope, we are going to get shot down if we are hit by a rock that is thrown by a berserker’s power you know?」



「Can’t be helped. We can only use sniping or grenade from slight distance away to decrease their number as much as……」



The heliport was already crowded with latent berserkers. The pilot’s had a point with his worry, so Bernard decided their tactic with a bitter expression. It was at that timing that Kousuke told them to wait.



「Captain-san. I’ll go there. Please open the hatch when we arrive above them. I’ll secure the landing place.」



「Don’t tell me, you are going there alone? The opponent is a monster group that can only be killed by destroying their brain you know?」



「Yes. But, sniping won’t work unless you go through the trouble of making headshot from a flying helicopter, while it’s uncertain if grenade can destroy their brain reliably even if it can blow them away. The more time passed, the more the berserkers will come out one after another and we won’t be able to take control. There is also the possibility that the crucial targets will run away during that time.」



「That’s……certainly, it’s just as you say. That was why we decided to land at the lumbering site five kilometers away from here so that the enemy won’t notice us.」



Bernard scratched his head roughly. They got their start spoiled right from the very beginning, and now to make up for that they would make Kousuke who originally should be an unrelated person with this case to clear up the problem. Surely this matter was something shameful for him as a member of security bureau’s assault section.



Kousuke who seemed to see through that sentiment of Bernard, clapped on his shoulder thinking that it was unexpected.



「Please don’t think that I’m unrelated or anything. Rather, this is my battle. I’ll eliminate those who stand in Emily’s way, protect her, and lead her to where her hand is reaching at. Rather, it’s captain-san and others who are our cooperator here.」



「Mister Abyssgate……」



「It’s Kousuke. Well, that’s how it is, so everyone, please give me covering okay? Aa, also just to make sure, I’m Kousuke.」



The words of Kousuke that were said with a fearless smile naturally caused Emily’s eyes to grow moist from feeling moved, while Vanessa was making a triumphant look for some reason. And then, because the troops knew about Kousuke’s monstrous power, they felt cheered up and sense of trust in their heart.



All of them saluted with a crisp expression and responded to Kousuke’s instruction.



「「「「「YES-, ABYSSGATE-!!」」」」」



「That’s why-, I told you already that I’m Kousuke-!! Is this intentional!? You are doing this intentionally!?」



「Mister Abyssgate-! We are going to arrive above them before long! It’s really okay that I don’t lower the altitude isn’t it!?」



「Aargh-, pilot! So you too-! The altitude is fine as it is, damn it all-!」



「Abyss! Those guys are starting to turn berserk!」



「Captaiiin! What’s with that friendly call name! You want me to punish you with compulsory rope-less bungee jump!? There are about twenty berserkers there huh, son of a bitch!」



「Abyssgate-san! I’m opening the hatch! Good luck!」



「Thank you for the perfect salute! But I’ll punch you later! Then, I’ll go become the vanguard now!」



「Come all of you! Fix your eyes without blinking! This is the descend of Abyssgate-sama!」



「Danessa. I’ll turn you into a lovely villager later you bastaaard! Prepare yourself!」



「Abys――Kousuke-. Do your best!」



「Oi oi oi oi, Emily-chan. You almost called me Abyssgate just now aren’t you!? What’s the meaning of this!? That’s quite shocking though!?」



Even while making fierce retorts, Kousuke leaned out his body from the opened hatch with his head turning toward Emily. Emily was averting her eyes toward the direction of the day after tomorrow. It seemed that she was plainly gotten carried away by the troops saying Abyssgate on and on.



But at the next moment, the helicopter tilted greatly. It seemed that one of the berserkers had thrown a block with a force like a cannon and the pilot took emergency evasion.



As the result,



「Aa」



Kousuke whose guard was down with his head turned toward Emily left behind that kind of stupid voice and got thrown out of the hatch. The troops went「Aa」in unison while staring at Kousuke who was getting smaller away.



「Ko, KOUSUKEEEEEE-」



While Emily’s voice was echoing, Kousuke was freefalling face-up while his shoulders skillfully dropped in dejection. To fall like this from the helicopter by incident was really a sloppy way to start a fight.



「Well, I’m this kind of character after all. Surely.」



Kousuke muttered that with a sigh, then with a twirl he rotated midair and looked down to the ground. There, berserkers who were already nearly twenty in number roared while waiting impatiently for the prey.



With those terrifying monsters below, Kousuke took out a sunglasses from his breast pocket and calmly put it on. Right after that, the corner of his lips grinned widely. That was the mark of the descent of the abyss.



「Good work with the welcome. As thanks, I’ll present you with a magnificent headhunting!」



He kicked on the air. One of the berserkers waiting on the ground reflexively waved up his hand around like a child seeing the falling prey suddenly changing direction.



Lord Abyssgate shifted his landing point. It wasn’t because he wanted to avoid getting surrounded by berserkers. Rather, it was the opposite. He flew toward right in the middle of a spot with the highest concentration of berserkers without hesitation.



And then, just before the landing, *shan-* a clear sound resounded while two short swords were drawn out, his body rotated like a spinning top. Jet black sword flash that could be mistaken as spiral gale was blowing violently, caressing the thick neck of the berserkers that looked like a log.



*step*, while a light landing sound that was unthinkable coming from a high-altitude descent resounded, the lord stayed unmoving in a chuuni pose. He was kneeling on one knee, the two short swords were held in reverse grip, one at the front and the other one at the back.



At the next moment, four sounds *goto-* resounded behind the four berserkers surrounding the lord. Those sounds unmistakably came from the neck of the berserkers. Looking again, all the four berserkers had cleanly lost everything above their neck. The wounds might be burned or frozen, because no blood spurted out.
